VOL. II. B
THE HISTORY
OF
NEW YORK, &c.
BOOK V.
Containing the first part of the reign of Peter
Stuyvesant
and his troubles with the Amphyctionic
Council.
CHAP. I.
In which the death of a great man is shewn to be
no such inconsolable matter of sorrowand how
Peter Stuyvesant acquired a great name from
the uncommon strength of his head
.
To a profound philosopher, like myself, who
am apt to see clear through a subject, where the
penetration of ordinary people extends but half
way, there is no fact more simple and manifest,
than that the death of a great man, is a matter of
very little importance. Much as we think of
ourselves
,
and much as we may excite the empty
plaudits
of the million, it is certain that the greatest
among us do actually fill but an exceeding small
space in the world; and it is equally certain, that
even that small space is quickly supplied, when we
leave it vacant. Of what consequence is it, said
the elegant Pliny, that individuals appear, or
make their exit? the world is a theatre whose
scenes and actors are continually changing.
Never
did philosopher speak more correctly, and I
only wonder, that so wise a remark could have
existed
so many ages, and mankind not have laid it
more to heart. Sage follows on in the footsteps of
sage; one hero just steps out of his triumphant car,
to make way for the hero who comes after him;
and of the proudest monarch it is merely said, that
he slept with his fathers, and his successor
reigned in his stead.
The world, to tell the private truth, cares but
little for their loss, and if left to itself would soon
forget to grieve; and though a nation has often
been figuratively drowned in tears on the death of
a great man, yet it is ten chances to one if an
individual
tear has been shed on the melancholy occasion,
excepting from the forlorn pen of some hungry
author
.
It is the historian, the biographer, and the
poet, who have the whole burden of grief to
sustain
;
whounhappy varlets!like undertakers in
England, act the part of chief mournerswho
inflate
a nation with sighs it never heaved, and deluge
it with tears, it never dreamed of shedding. Thus
while the patriotic author is weeping and howling,
in prose, in blank verse, and in rhyme, and
collecting
the drops of public sorrow into his volume, as
into a lachrymal vase, it is more than probable his
fellow citizens are eating and drinking, fiddling and
dancing; as utterly ignorant of the bitter
lamentations
made in their name, as are those men of straw,
John, Doe, and Richard Roe, of the plaintiffs for
whom they are generously pleased on divers
occasions
to become sureties.
The most glorious and praise-worthy hero that
ever desolated nations, might have mouldered into
oblivion among the rubbish of his own monument,
did not some kind historian take him into favour,
and benevolently transmit his name to posterity
and much as the valiant William Kieft worried,
and bustled, and turmoiled, while he had the
destinies
of a whole colony in his hand, I question
seriously
,
whether he will not be obliged to this
authentic
history, for all his future celebrity.
His exit occasioned no convulsion in the city of
New Amsterdam, or its vicinity: the earth
trembled
not, neither did any stars shoot from their
spheresthe heavens were not shrowded in black,
as poets would fain persuade us they have been, on
the unfortunate death of a herothe rocks (hard
hearted vagabonds) melted not into tears; nor did
the trees hang their heads in silent sorrow; and as
to the sun, he laid abed the next night, just as long,
and shewed as jolly a face when he arose, as he
ever did on the same day of the month in any year,
either before or since. The good people of New
Amsterdam, one and all, declared that he had been
a very busy, active, bustling little governor; that
he was the father of his countrythat he was
the noblest work of Godthat he was a man,
take him for all in all, they never should look upon
his like againtogether with sundry other civil
and affectionate speeches that are regularly said on
the death of all great men; after which they
smoked
their pipes, thought no more about him, and
Peter Stuyvesant succeeded to his station.
Peter Stuyvesant was the last, and like the
renowned
Wouter Van Twiller, he was also the best,
of our ancient dutch governors. Wouter having
surpassed all who preceded him; and Pieter, or
Piet, as he was sociably called by the old dutch
burghers, who were ever prone to familiarize
names, having never been equalled by any
successor
.
He was in fact the very man fitted by nature
to retrieve the desperate fortunes of her beloved
province, had not the fates or parc, Clotho,
Lachesis
and Atropos, those most potent, immaculate
and unrelenting of all ancient and immortal
spinsters
,
destined them to inextricable confusion.
To say merely that he was a hero would be
doing him unparalleled injusticehe was in truth
a combination of heroesfor he was of a sturdy,
raw boned make like Ajax Telamon, so famous for
his prowess in belabouring the little Trojanswith
a pair of round shoulders, that Hercules would
have given his hide for, (meaning his lion's hide)
when he undertook to ease old Atlas of his load.
He was moreover as Plutarch describes
Coriolanus
,
not only terrible for the force of his arm, but
likewise of his voice, which sounded as though it
came out of a barrel; and like the self same
warrior
,
he possessed a sovereign contempt for the
sovereign people, and an iron aspect, which was
enough of itself to make the very bowels of his
adversaries quake with terror and dismay. All
this martial excellency of appearance was
inexpressibly
heightened by an accidental advantage,
with which I am surprised that neither Homer
nor Virgil have graced any of their heroes, for it
is worth all the paltry scars and wounds in the
Iliad and Eneid, or Lucan's Pharsalia into the
bargain
.
This was nothing less than a redoubtable
wooden leg, which was the only prize he had
gained
,
in bravely fighting the battles of his country;
but of which he was so proud, that he was often
heard to declare he valued it more than all his
other limbs put together; indeed so highly did he
esteem it, that he caused it to be gallantly enchased
and relieved with silver devices, which caused it to
be related in divers histories and legends that he
wore a silver leg.
[1]
[1]
See the histories of Masters Josselyn and Blome.
Like that choleric warrior Achilles, he was
somewhat subject to extempore bursts of passion,
which were oft-times rather unpleasant to his
favourites and attendants, whose perceptions he
was apt to quicken, after the manner of his
illustrious
imitator, Peter the Great, by anointing their
shoulders with his walking staff.
But the resemblance for which I most value
him was that which he bore in many particulars to
the renowned Charlemagne. Though I cannot
find that he had read Plato, or Aristotle, or
Hobbes
,
or Bacon, or Algernon Sydney, or Tom Paine,
yet did he sometimes manifest a shrewdness and
sagacity in his measures, that one would hardly
expect from a man, who did not know Greek, and
had never studied the ancients. True it is, and I
confess it with sorrow, that he had an
unreasonable
aversion to experiments, and was fond of
governing his province after the simplest manner
but then he contrived to keep it in better order
than did the erudite Kieft, though he had all the
philosophers ancient and modern, to assist and
perplex him. I must likewise own that he made
but very few laws, but then again he took care that
those few were rigidly and impartially enforced---
and I do not know but justice on the whole, was as
well administered, as if there had been volumes of
sage acts and statutes yearly made, and daily
neglected
and forgotten.
He was in fact the very reverse of his
predecessors
,
being neither tranquil and inert like
Walter
the Doubter, nor restless and fidgetting, like
William the Testy, but a man, or rather a governor, of
such uncommon activity and decision of mind that
he never sought or accepted the advice of others;
depending confidently upon his single head, as did
the heroes of yore upon their single arms, to work
his way through all difficulties and dangers. To
tell the simple truth he wanted no other requisite
for a perfect statesman, than to think always right,
for no one can deny that he always acted as he
thought, and if he wanted in correctness he made
up for it in perseveranceAn excellent quality!
since it is surely more dignified for a ruler to be
persevering and consistent in error, than wavering
and contradictory, in endeavouring to do what is
right; this much is certain, and I generously make
the maxim public, for the benefit of all legislators,
both great and small, who stand shaking in the wind,
without knowing which way to steera ruler
who acts according to his own will is sure of
pleasing himself, while he who seeks to consult the
wishes and whims of others, runs a great risk of
pleasing nobody. The clock that stands still, and
points resolutely in one direction, is certain of being
right twice in the four and twenty hourswhile
others may keep going continually, and continually
be going wrong.
Nor did this magnanimous virtue escape the
discernment of the good people of Nieuw
Nederlants
;
on the contrary so high an opinion had they
of the independent mind and vigorous intellects of
their new governor, that they universally called
him
Hard-koppig Piet
, or
Peter the
Headstrong
a
great compliment to his understanding!
If from all that I have said thou dost not gather,
worthy reader, that Peter Stuyvesant was a tough,
sturdy, valiant, weatherbeaten, mettlesome,
leathernsided
,
lion hearted, generous spirited, obstinate,
old seventy six of a governor, thou art a very
numscull at drawing conclusions.
This most excellent governor, whose character I
have thus attempted feebly to delineate, commenced
his administration on the 29th of May 1647: a
remarkably
stormy day, distinguished in all the
almanacks of the time, which have come down to
us, by the name of
Windy Friday
. As he was
very jealous of his personal and official dignity, he
was inaugurated into office with great ceremony;
the goodly oaken chair of the renowned Wouter
Van Twiller, being carefully preserved for such
occasions; in like manner as the chair and stone
VOL. II. C
were reverentially preserved at Schone in Scotland,
for the coronation of the caledonian monarchs.
I must not omit to mention that the tempestuous
state of the elements, together with its being that
unlucky day of the week, termed hanging day,
did not fail to excite much grave speculation, and
divers very reasonable apprehensions, among the
more ancient and enlightened inhabitants; and
several of the sager sex, who were reputed to be
not a little skilled in the science and mystery of
astrology and fortune telling, did declare outright,
that they were fearful omens of a disastrous
administrationan event that came to be
lamentably
verified, and which proves, beyond dispute, the
wisdom of attending to those preternatural
intimations
,
furnished by dreams and visions, the flying
of birds, falling of stones and cackling of geese, on
which the sages and rulers of ancient times placed
such judicious relianceor to those shootings of
stars, eclipses of the moon, howlings of dogs and
flarings of candles, carefully noted and interpreted
by the oracular old sybils of our day; who,
in my humble opinion, are the legitimate possessors
and preservers of the ancient science of divination.
This much is certain, that governor Stuyvesant
succeeded to the chair of state, at a turbulent
period; when foes thronged and threatened from
without; when anarchy and stiff necked opposition
reigned rampant within; and when the authority
of their high mightinesses the lords states
general
,
though founded on the broad dutch bottom
of unoffending imbecility; though supported by
economy, and defended by speeches, protests,
proclamations, flagstaffs, trumpeters and windmills
vacillated, oscillated, tottered, tumbled and was
finally prostrated in the dirt, by british invaders, in
much the same manner that our majestic,
stupendous
,
but ricketty shingle steeples, will some
day or other be toppled about our ears by a brisk
north wester.
CHAP. II.
Shewing how Peter the Headstrong bestirred himself
among the rats and cobwebs on entering into
office
And
the perilous mistake he was guilty of,
in his dealings with the Amphyctions
.
The
very first movements of the great Peter, on
taking the reins of government, displayed the
magnanimity
of his mind, though they occasioned not a
little marvel and uneasiness among the people of the
Manhattoes. Finding himself constantly
interrupted
by the opposition and annoyed by the sage
advice
of his privy council, the members of which
had acquired the unreasonable habit of thinking and
speaking for themselves during the preceding reign;
he determined at once to put a stop to such a
grievous
abomination. Scarcely therefore had he
entered
upon his authority than he kicked out of office
all those meddlesome spirits that composed the
factious cabinet of William the Testy, in place of
whom he chose unto himself councillors from
those fat, somniferous, respectable families, that
had flourished and slumbered under the easy reign
of Walter the Doubter. All these he caused to be
furnished with abundance of fair long pipes, and to
be regaled with frequent corporation dinners,
admonishing
then to smoke and eat and sleep for the
good of the nation, while he took all the burden of
government upon his own shouldersan
arrangement
to which they all gave a hearty grunt of
acquiescence
.
Nor did he stop here, but made a hideous rout
among the ingenious inventions and expedients of
his learned predecessordemolishing his
flagstaffs
and wind-mills, which like mighty giants,
guarded the ramparts of New Amsterdam
pitching
to the duyvel whole batteries of quaker guns
rooting up his patent gallows, where caitiff
vagabonds
were suspended by the breech, and in a word,
turning topsy-turvy the whole philosophic,
economic
and wind-mill system of the immortal sage of
Saardam.
The honest folk of New Amsterdam, began to
quake now for the fate of their matchless
champion
Antony the trumpeter, who had acquired
prodigious favour in the eyes of the women by
means of his whiskers and his trumpet. Him did
Peter the Headstrong, cause to be brought into his
presence, and eyeing him for a moment from head
to foot, with a countenance that would have
appalled
any thing else than a sounder of brass
Prythee
who and what art thou? said he.Sire,
replied
the other in no wise dismayed,for my
name, it is Antony Van Corlearfor my
parentage
,
I am the son of my motherfor my
profession
c 2
I am champion and garrison of this great city
of New Amsterdam.---I doubt me much, said
Peter Stuyvesant, that thou art some scurvy
costard-monger
knavehow didst thou acquire this
paramount honour and dignity?Marry sir,
replied the other, like many a great man before
me, simply
by sounding my own trumpet
.Aye,
is it so? quoth the governor, why then let us have
a relish of thy art. Whereupon he put his
instrument
to his lips and sounded a charge, with such
a tremendous outset, such a delectable quaver, and
such a triumphant cadence that it was enough to
make your heart leap out of your mouth only to be
within a mile of it. Like as a war-worn charger,
while sporting in peaceful plains, if by chance he
hears the strains of martial music, pricks up his
ears, and snorts and paws and kindles at the noise,
so did the heroic soul of the mighty Peter joy to
hear the clangour of the trumpet; for of him might
truly be said what was recorded of the renowned
St. George of England, there was nothing in all
the world that more rejoiced his heart, than to hear
the pleasant sound of war, and see the soldiers
brandish forth their steeled weapons. Casting
his eyes more kindly therefore, upon the sturdy
Van Corlear, and finding him to be a jolly, fat little
man, shrewd in his discourse, yet of great
discretion
and immeasurable wind, he straightway
conceived an astonishing kindness for him; and
discharging him from the troublesome duty of
garrisoning
,
defending and alarming the city, ever
after retained him about his person, as his chief
favourite, confidential envoy and trusty squire.
Instead
of disturbing the city with disastrous notes,
he was instructed to play so as to delight the
governor
,
while at his repasts, as did the minstrels
of yore in the days of glorious chivalryand on
all public occasions, to rejoice the ears of the
people
with warlike melodythereby keeping alive a
noble and martial spirit.
Many other alterations and reformations, both
for the better and for the worse, did the governor
make, of which my time will not serve me to
record
the particulars, suffice it to say, he soon
contrived
to make the province feel that he was its
master, and treated the sovereign people with such
tyrannical rigour, that they were all fain to hold
their tongues, stay at home and attend to their
business
;
insomuch that party feuds and distinctions
were almost forgotten, and many thriving keepers
of taverns and dram-shops, were utterly ruined for
want of business.
Indeed the critical state of public affairs at this
time, demanded the utmost vigilance, and
promptitude
.
The formidable council of the Amphyctions,
which had caused so much tribulation to the un
fortunate Kieft, still continued augmenting its
forces, and threatened to link within its union, all
the mighty principalities and powers of the cast.
In the very year following the inauguration of
governor
Stuyvesant a grand deputation departed
from the city of Providence (famous for its dusty
streets, and beauteous women,) in behalf of the
puissant plantation of Rhode Island, praying to be
admitted into the league.
The following mention is made of this
application
in the records still extant, of that assemblage
of worthies.
[2]
[2]
Haz. Col. Stat. pap.
Mr. Will Cottington and captain Partridg of
Rhoode Hand presented this insewing request to the
commissioners in wrighting
Our request and motion is in behalfe of
Rhoode Hand, that wee the Handers of Rhoode
Iland may be rescauied into combination with all
the united colonyes of New England in a firme and
perpetuall league of friendship and amity of ofence
and defence, mutuall advice and succor upon all
just occasions for our mutuall safety and
wellfaire
,
&c.
Will Cottington,
Alicxsander Partridg.
I confess the very sight of this fearful
document
,
made me to quake for the safety of my
beloved
province. The name of Alexander, however
misspelt, has been warlike in every age, and though
its fierceness is in some measure softened by being
coupled with the gentle cognomen of Partridge,
still, like the colour of scarlet, it bears an exceeding
great resemblance to the sound of a trumpet.
From the style of the letter, moreover, and the
soldierlike
ignorance of orthography displayed by the
noble captain Alicxsander Partridg in spelling his
own name, we may picture to ourselves this mighty
man of Rhodes like a second Ajax, strong in arms,
great in the field, but in other respects, (meaning
no disparagement) as great a dom cop, as if he had
been educated among that learned people of Thrace,
who Aristotle most slanderously assures us, could
not count beyond the number four.
But whatever might be the threatening aspect
of this famous confederation, Peter Stuyvesant
was not a man to be kept in a state of incertitude
and vague apprehension; he liked nothing so much
as to meet danger face to face, and take it by the
beard. Determined therefore to put an end to all
these petty maraudings on the borders, he wrote
two or three categorical letters to the grand council,
which though neither couched in bad latin, nor yet
graced by rhetorical tropes about wolfs and lambs,
and beetle flies, yet had more effect than all the
elaborate epistles, protests and proclamations of his
learned predecessor, put together. In consequence
of his urgent propositions, the sage council of the
amphyctions agreed to enter into a final adjustment
of grievances and settlement of boundaries, to the
end that a perpetual and happy peace might take
place between the two powers. For this purpose
governor Stuyvesant deputed two ambassadors, to
negotiate with commissioners from the grand
council
of the league, and a treaty was solemnly
concluded
at Hartford. On receiving intelligence of this
event, the whole community was in an uproar of
exultation. The trumpet of the sturdy Van
Corlear
,
sounded all day with joyful clangour from the
ramparts of Fort Amsterdam, and at night the city
was magnificently illuminated with two hundred
and fifty tallow candles; besides a barrel of tar,
which was burnt before the governor's house, on
the cheering aspect of public affairs.
And now my worthy, but simple reader, is
doubtless, like the great and good Peter,
congratulating
himself with the idea, that his feelings will
no longer be molested by afflicting details of stolen
horses, broken heads, impounded hogs, and all the
other catalogue of heart-rending cruelties, that
disgraced
these border wars. But if my reader should
indulge in such expectations, it is only another proof,
among the many he has already given in the course
of this work, of his utter ignorance of state affairs
and this lamentable ignorance on his part, obliges
me to enter into a very profound dissertation, to
which I call his attention in the next chapter
wherein I will shew that Peter Stuyvesant has
already
committed a great error in politics; and by
effecting a peace, has materially jeopardized the
tranquility of the province.
CHAP. III.
Containing divers philosophical speculations on war
and negociationsand shewing that a treaty of
peace is a great national evil
.
It was the opinion of that poetical philosopher
Lucretius, that war was the original state of man;
whom he described as being primitively a savage
beast of prey, engaged in a constant state of hostility
with his own species, and that this ferocious spirit
was tamed and ameliorated by society. The same
opinion has been advocated by the learned Hobbes,
nor have there been wanting a host of sage
philosophers
to admit and defend it.
For my part, I am prodigiously fond of these
valuable speculations so complimentary to human
nature, and which are so ingeniously calculated
to make beasts of both writer and reader; but in
this instance I am inclined to take the proposition
by halves, believing with old Horace,
[3]
[3]
Quum prorepserunt primis animalia terris,
Mutum ac turpe pecus, glandem atque cubilia propter,
Unguibus et pugnis, dein fustibus, atque ita porro
Pugnabant armis, qu post fabricaverat usus.
Hor.
Sat.
L. i. S 3.
that though
war may have been originally the favourite
amusement
and industrious employment of our
progenitors
,
yet like many other excellent habits, so far
from being ameliorated, it has been cultivated and
confirmed by refinement and civilization, and
encreases
in exact proportion as we approach
towards
that state of perfection, which is the
ne plus
ultra
of modern philosophy.
The first conflict between man and man was the
mere exertion of physical force, unaided by auxiliary
weaponshis arm was his buckler, his fist was his
mace, and a broken head the catastrophe of his
encounters. The battle of unassisted strength,
was succeeded by the more rugged one of stones
and clubs, and war assumed a sanguinary aspect.
As man advanced in refinement, as his faculties
expanded, and his sensibilities became more
exquisite
,
he grew rapidly more ingenious and experienced,
in the art of murdering his fellow beings. He
invented a thousand devices to defend and to
assaultthe helmet, the cuirass and the buckler;
the sword, the dart and the javelin, prepared him
to elude the wound, as well as to launch the blow.
Still urging on, in the brilliant and philanthropic
career of invention, he enlarges and heightens his
powers of defence and injuryThe Aries, the
Scorpio, the Balista and the Catapulta, give a horror
and sublimity to war, and magnify its glory, by
encreasing its desolation. Still insatiable; though
armed with machinery that seemed to reach the
limits of destructive invention, and to yield a power
of injury, commensurate, even to the desires of
VOL. II. D
revengestill deeper researches must be made in
the diabolical arcana. With furious zeal he dives
into the bowels of the earth; he toils midst
poisonous
minerals and deadly saltsthe sublime
discovery of gunpowder, blazes upon the world
and finally the dreadful art of fighting by
proclamation
,
seems to endow the demon of war, with
ubiquity and omnipotence!
By the hand of my body but this is grand!this
indeed marks the powers of mind, and bespeaks that
divine endowment of reason, which distinguishes us
from the animals, our inferiors. The
unenlightened
brutes content themselves with the native force
which providence has assigned them. The angry
bull butts with his horns, as did his progenitors
before
himthe lion, the leopard, and the tyger, seek
only with their talons and their fangs, to gratify
their sanguinary fury; and even the subtle serpent
darts the same venom, and uses the same wiles, as
did his sire before the flood. Man alone, blessed
with the inventive mind, goes on from discovery to
discoveryenlarges and multiplies his powers of
destruction; arrogates the tremendous weapons of
deity itself, and tasks creation to assist him, in
murdering
his brother worm!
In proportion as the art of war has increased in
improvement, has the art of preserving peace
advanced
in equal ratio. But as I have already been
very prolix to but little purpose, in the first part of
this truly philosophic chapter, I shall not fatigue my
patient, but unlearned reader, in tracing the history
of the art of making peace. Suffice it to say, as we
have discovered in this age of wonders and
inventions
,
that proclamation is the most formidable
engine
in war, so have we discovered the no less
ingenious
mode of maintaining peace by perpetual
negociations
.
A treaty, or to speak more correctly a
negociation
,
therefore, according to the acceptation of your
experienced statesmen, learned in these matters, is
no longer an attempt to accommodate differences, to
ascertain rights, and to establish an equitable
exchange
of kind offices; but a contest of skill between
two powers, which shall over-reach and take in the
other. It is a cunning endeavour to obtain by
peaceful manuvre, and the chicanery of cabinets,
those advantages, which a nation would otherwise
have wrested by force of arms.In the same
manner
that a conscientious highway-man reforms and
becomes an excellent and praiseworthy citizen
contenting
himself with cheating his neighbour out of
that property he would formerly have seized with
open violence.
In fact the only time when two nations can be
said to be in a state of perfect amity, is when a
negociation
is open, and a treaty pending. Then as
there are no stipulations entered into, no bonds to
restrain the will, no specific limits to awaken that
captious jealousy of right implanted in our nature,
as both parties have some advantage to hope and
expect from the other, then it is that the two
nations
are as gracious and friendly to each other, as
two rogues making a bargain. Their ministers
professing the highest mutual regard, exchanging
billets-doux, making fine speeches and indulging
in all those little diplomatic flirtations, coquetries
and fondlings, that do so marvelously tickle the
good humour of the respective nations. Thus
it may paradoxically be said, that there is never
so good an understanding between two nations,
as when there is a little misunderstandingand
that so long as they are on no terms, they are on
the best terms in the world!
As I am of all men in the world, particularly
historians, the most candid and unassuming, I would
not for an instant claim the merit of having made
the above political discovery. It has in fact long
been secretly acted upon by certain enlightened
cabinets, and is, together with divers other notable
theories, privately copied out of the common place
book of an illustrious gentleman, who has been
member of congress, and enjoyed the unlimited
confidence
of heads of department. To this principle
may be ascribed the wonderful ingenuity that has
been shewn of late years in protracting and
interrupting
negociations.Hence the cunning measure
of appointing as ambassador, some political
pettifogger
skilled in delays, sophisms, and
misconstructions
,
and dexterous in the art of baffling argument
or some blundering statesman, whose stupid errors
and misconstructions may be a plea for refusing to
ratify his engagements. And hence too that most
notable expedient, so popular with our government,
of sending out a brace of ambassadors; who having
each an individual will to consult, character to
establish, and interest to promote, you may as well
look for unanimity and concord between them, as
between two lovers with one mistress, two dogs
with one bone, or two naked rogues and one pair
of breeches. This disagreement therefore is
continually
breeding delays and impediments, in
consequence
of which the negociation goes on
swimmingly
inasmuch
as there is no prospect of its
ever coming to a close. Nothing is lost by these
delays and obstacles but
time
, and in a negociation,
according to the theory I have exposed, all time
lost, is in reality so much time gainedwith what
delightful paradoxes, does the modern arcana of
political economy abound!
Now all that I have here advanced is so
notoriously true, that I almost blush to take up the
time of my readers, with treating of matters which
must many a time have stared them in the face.
But the proposition to which I would most earnestly
call their attention is this, that though a negociation
D 2
is the most harmonizing of all national transactions,
yet a treaty of peace is a great political evil and one
of the most fruitful sources of war.
I have rarely seen an instance in my time, of
any special contract between individuals, that did
not produce jealousies, bickerings, and often
downright
ruptures between them; nor did I ever know
of a treaty between two nations, that did not keep
them continually in hot water. How many worthy
country neighbours have I known, who after living
in peace and good fellowship for years, have been
thrown into a state of distrust, cavilling and
animosity
,
by some ill starred agreement about fences,
runs of water, and stray cattle. And how many
well meaning nations, who would otherwise have
remained in the most amiable disposition towards
each other, have been brought to loggerheads
about the infringement, or misconstruction of some
treaty, which in an evil hour they had constructed
by way of making their amity more sure.
Treaties at best are but complied with so long as
interest requires their fulfillment; consequently they
are virtually binding on the weaker party only, or
in other words, they are not really binding at all.
No nation will wantonly go to war with another if
it has nothing to gain thereby, and therefore needs
no treaty to restrain it from violence; and if it has
any thing to gain, I much question, from what I
have witnessed of the righteous conduct of nations,
whether any treaty could be made so strong, that
it could not thrust the sword throughnay I would
hold ten to one, the treaty itself, would be the very
source to which resort would be had, to find a
pretext for hostilities.
Thus therefore I sagely concludethat though it
is the best of all policies for a nation to keep up a
constant negociation with its neighbours, it is the
utmost summit of folly, for it ever to be beguiled
into a treaty; for then comes on the non-fulfilment
and infraction, then remonstrance, then altercation,
then retaliation, then recrimination and finally open
war. In a word, negociation is like courtship, a
time of sweet words, gallant speeches, soft looks
and endearing caresses, but the marriage ceremony
is the signal for hostilitiesand thus ends this very
abstruse though very instructive chapter.
CHAP. IV.
How Peter Stuyvesant was horribly belied by his
adversaries the Moss Troopersand his
conduct
thereupon
.
If
my pains-taking reader, whose perception,
it is a hundred to one, is as obtuse as a beetle's, is
not somewhat perplexed, in the course of the
ratiocination
of my last chapter; he will doubtless, at
one glance perceive, that the great Peter, in
concluding
a treaty with his eastern neighbours, was
guilty
of a most notable error and heterodoxy in
politics
.
To this unlucky agreement may justly be
ascribed
a world of little infringements, altercations,
negociations and bickerings, which afterwards took
place between the irreproachable Stuyvesant, and
the evil disposed council of amphyctions; in all
which, with the impartial justice of an historian, I
pronounce the latter to have been invariably in the
wrong. All these did not a little disturb the
constitutional
serenity of the good and substantial
burghers of Mannahataotherwise called
Manhattoes
,
but more vulgarly known by the name of
Manhattan
.
But in sooth they were so very scurvy
and pitiful in their nature and effects, that a grave
historian like me, who grudges the time spent in
any thing less than recording the fall of empires,
and the revolution of worlds, would think them
unworthy
to be recorded in his sacred page.
The reader is therefore to take it for granted,
though I scorn to waste in the detail, that time,
which my furrowed brow and trembling hand,
inform
me is invaluable, that all the while the great
Peter was occupied in those tremendous and bloody
contests, that I shall shortly rehearse, there was a
continued series of little, dirty, snivelling,
pettifogging
skirmishes, scourings, broils and maraudings
made on the eastern frontiers, by the notorious
moss troopers of Connecticut. But like that
mirror
of chivalry, the sage and valourous Don
Quixote
,
I leave these petty contests for some future
Sancho Panza of an historian, while I reserve my
prowess and my pen for achievements of higher
dignity.
Now did the great Peter conclude, that his
labours
had come to a close in the east, and that he
had nothing to do but apply himself to the internal
prosperity of his beloved Manhattoes. Though a
man of great modesty, he could not help boasting
that he had at length shut the temple of Janus, and
that, were all rulers like a certain person who should
be nameless, it would never be opened again. But
the exultation of the worthy governor was put to a
speedy check, for scarce was the treaty concluded,
and hardly was the ink dried on the paper, before
the crafty and discourteous council of the league
sought a new pretence for reilluming the flames of
discord.
In the year 1651, with a flagitious hardihood
that makes my gorge to rise while I write, they
accused
the immaculate Peterthe soul of honour
and heart of steelthat by divers gifts and
promises
he had been secretly endeavouring to instigate
the Narrohigansett (or Narraganset) Mohaque and
Pequot Indians, to surprize and massacre the
English
settlements. For, as the council maliciously
observed, the Indians round about for divers
hundred
miles cercute, seeme to have drunke deep of
an intoxicating cupp, att or from the Monhatoes
against the English, whoe have sought there good,
both in bodily and sperituall respects. To
support
their most unrighteous accusation, they
examined
divers Indians, who all swore to the fact as
sturdily
as if they had been so many christian troopers.
And to be more sure of their veracity, the knowing
council previously made every mother's son of them
devoutly drunk, remembering the old proverb
In
vino veritas
.
Though descended from a family which
suffered
much injury from the losel Yankees of those
times; my great grandfather having had a yoke of
oxen and his best pacer stolen, and having received
a pair of black eyes and a bloody nose, in one of
these border wars; and my grandfather, when a
very little boy tending the pigs, having been
kidnapped
and severely flogged by a long sided
Connecticut
schoolmasterYet I should have passed
over all these wrongs with forgiveness and oblivion
I could even have suffered them to have broken
Evert Ducking's head, to have kicked the doughty
Jacobus Van Curlet and his ragged regiment out
of doors, carried every hog into captivity, and
depopulated
every hen roost, on the face of the earth
with perfect impunityBut this wanton, wicked
and unparalleled attack, upon one of the most
gallant and irreproachable heroes of modern times,
is too much even for me to digest, and has overset,
with a single puff, the patience of the historian and
the forbearance of the Dutchman.
Oh reader it was false!I swear to thee it
was false!if thou hast any respect for my word
if the undeviating and unimpeached character for
veracity, which I have hitherto borne throughout
this work, has its due weight with thee, thou wilt
not give thy faith to this tale of slander; for I
pledge my honour and my immortal fame to thee,
that the gallant Peter Stuyvesant, was not only
innocent of this foul conspiracy, but would have
suffered his right arm, or even his wooden leg to
consume with slow and everlasting flames, rather
than attempt to destroy his enemies in any other
way, than open generous warfareBeshrew those
caitiff scouts, that conspired to sully his honest
name by such an imputation!
Peter Stuyvesant, though he perhaps had never
heard of a Knight Errant; yet had he as true a
heart of chivalry as ever beat at the round table of
King Arthur. There was a spirit of native
gallantry
,
a noble and generous hardihood diffused
through his rugged manners, which altogether gave
unquestionable tokens of an heroic mind. He was,
in truth, a hero of chivalry struck off by the hand
of nature at a single heat, and though she had taken
no further care to polish and refine her
workmanship
,
he stood forth a miracle of her skill.
But not to be figurative, (a fault in historic
writing which I particularly) eschew the great Peter
possessed in an eminent degree, the seven
renowned
and noble virtues of knighthood; which, as he
had never consulted authors, in the disciplining and
cultivating of his mind, I verily believe must have
been stowed away in a corner of his heart by dame
nature herselfwhere they flourished, among his
hardy qualities, like so many sweet wild flowers,
shooting forth and thriving with redundant
luxuriance
among stubborn rocks. Such was the mind
of Peter the Headstrong, and if my admiration for
it, has on this occasion, transported my style beyond
the sober gravity which becomes the laborious
scribe of historic events, I can plead as an apology,
that though a little, grey headed Dutchman, arrived
almost at the bottom of the down-hill of life, I
still retain some portion of that celestial fire, which
sparkles in the eye of youth, when contemplating
the virtues and atchievements of ancient worthies.
Blessed, thrice and nine times blessed, be the good
St. Nicholasthat I have escaped the influence of
that chilling apathy, which too often freezes the
sympathies of age; which like a churlish spirit,
sits at the portals of the heart, repulsing every
genial sentiment, and paralyzing every spontaneous
glow of enthusiasm.
No sooner then, did this scoundrel imputation
on his honour reach the ear of Peter Stuyvesant,
than he proceeded in a manner which would have
redounded to his credit, even if he had studied for
years, in the library of Don Quixote himself. He
immediately dispatched his valiant trumpeter and
squire, Antony Van Corlear, with orders to ride
night and day, as herald, to the Amphyctionic
council, reproaching them in terms of noble
indignation
,
for giving ear to the slanders of heathen
infidels
,
against the character of a Christian, a
gentleman
and a soldierand declaring, that as to the
treacherous and bloody plot alledged against him,
whoever affirmed it to be true, he lied in his teeth!
to prove which he defied the president of the
council and all of his compeers, or if they pleased,
their puissant champion, captain Alicxsander
Partridg
that mighty man of Rhodes, to meet him in
single combat, where he would trust the vindication
of his innocence to the prowess of his arm.
VOL. II. E
This challenge being delivered with due
ceremony
,
Antony Van Corlear sounded a trumpet of
defiance before the whole council, ending with a
most horrific and nasal twang, full in the face of
captain Partridg, who almost jumped out of his
skin in an extacy of astonishment, at the noise. This
done he mounted a tall Flanders mare, which he
always rode, and trotted merrily towards the
Manhattoes
passing
through Hartford, and Pyquag
and Middletown and all the other border towns
twanging his trumpet like a very devil, so that the
sweet vallies and banks of the Connecticut
resounded
with the warlike melodyand stopping
occasionally
to eat pumpkin pies, dance at country
frolicks
,
and bundle with the beauteous lasses of those
partswhom he rejoiced exceedingly with his soul
stirring instrument.
But the grand council being composed of
considerate
men, had no idea of running a tilting with
such a fiery hero as the hardy Peteron the
contrary
they sent him an answer, couched in the
meekest, the most mild and provoking terms, in
which they assured him that his guilt was proved
to their perfect satisfaction, by the testimony of
divers sage and respectable Indians, and
concluding
with this truly amiable paragraph.For
youer confidant denialls of the Barbarous plott
charged, will waigh little in ballance against such
evidence, soe that we must still require and seeke
due satisfaction and cecuritie, soe we rest,
Sir,
Youres in wayes of Righteousness, &c.
I am conscious that the above transaction has
been differently recorded by certain historians of the
east, and elsewhere; who seem to have inherited
the bitter enmity of their ancestors to the brave
Peterand much good may their inheritance do
them. These moss troopers in literature, whom I
regard with sovereign scorn, as mere vampers up of
vulgar prejudices and fabulous legends, declare, that
Peter Stuyvesant requested to have the charges
against him, enquired into, by commissioners to be
appointed for the purpose; and yet that when such
commissioners were appointed, he refused to
submit
to their examination. Now this is partly true
he did indeed, most gallantly offer, when that he
found a deaf ear was turned to his challenge, to
submit
his conduct to the rigorous inspection of a court
of honourbut then he expected to find it an august
tribunal, composed of courteous gentlemen, the
governors
and nobility, of the confederate plantations,
and of the province of New Netherlands; where he
might be tried by his peers, in a manner worthy of
his rank and dignitywhereas, let me perish, if
they did not send on to the Manhattoes two lean
sided hungry pettifoggers, mounted on Narraganset
pacers, with saddle bags under their bottoms, and
green satchels under their arms, as if they were
about to beat the hoof from one county court to
anotherin search of a law suit.
The chivalric Peter, as well he might, took no
notice of these cunning varlets; who with professional
industry fell to prying and sifting about, in quest of
ex parte
evidence; bothering and perplexing divers
simple Indians and old women, with their cross
questioning, until they contradicted and forswore
themselves most horriblyas is every day done in
our courts of justice. Thus having dispatched
their errand to their full satisfation, they returned
to the grand council with their satchels and
saddlebags
stuffed full of the most scurvy rumours,
apocryphal
stories and outrageous heresies, that ever
were heardfor all which the great Peter did not
care a tobacco stopper; but I warrant me had they
attempted to play off the same trick upon William
the Testy, he would have treated them both to an
rial gambol on his patent gallows.
The grand council of the east, held a very solemn
meeting on the return of their envoys, and after they
had pondered a long time on the situation of affairs,
were upon the point of adjourning without being able
to agree upon any thing. At this critical moment one
of those little, meddlesome, indefatigable spirits, who
endeavour to establish a character for patriotism by
blowing the bellows of party, until the whole
furnace
of politics is red-hot with sparks and cinders
and who have just cunning enough to know, that
there is no time so favourable for getting on the
people's
backs, as when they are in a state of turmoil,
and attending to every body's business but their
ownThis aspiring imp of faction, who was called
a great politician, because he had secured a seat in
council by calumniating all his opponentsHe I
say, conceived this a fit opportunity to strike a blow
that should secure his popularity among his
constituents
,
who lived on the borders of Nieuw
Nederlandt
,
and were the greatest poachers in
Christendom
,
excepting the Scotch border nobles. Like a
second Peter the hermit, therefore, he stood forth
and preached up a crusade against Peter
Stuyvesant
,
and his devoted city.
He made a speech which lasted three days,
according
to the ancient custom in these parts, in which
he represented the dutch as a race of impious
heretics
,
who neither believed in witchcraft, nor the
sovereign virtues of horse shoeswho, left their
country for the lucre of gain, not like themselves
for the enjoyment of
liberty of conscience
who, in
short, were a race of mere cannibals and
anthropophagi
,
inasmuch as they never eat cod-fish on
saturdays
,
devoured swine's flesh without molasses, and
held pumpkins in utter contempt.
This speech had the desired effect, for the
council
,
being awakened by their serjeant at arms,
rubbed
E 2
their eyes, and declared that it was just and
politic to declare instant war against these
unchristian
anti-pumpkinites. But it was necessary that
the people at large should first be prepared for this
measure, and for this purpose the arguments of the
little orator were earnestly preached from the
pulpit
for several sundays subsequent, and earnestly
recommended to the consideration of every good
Christian, who professed, as well as practised the
doctrine of meekness, charity, and the forgiveness
of injuries. This is the first time we hear of the
Drum Ecclesiastic beating up for political
recruits
in our country; and it proved of such signal
efficacy, that it has since been called into frequent
service throughout our union. A cunning politician
is often found skulking under the clerical robe, with
an outside all religion, and an inside all political
rancour. Things spiritual and things temporal are
strangely jumbled together, like poisons and
antidotes
on an apothecary's shelf, and instead of a
devout
sermon, the simple church-going folk, have
often a political pamphlet, thrust down their throats,
labeled with a pious text from Scripture.
CHAP. V.
How the New Amsterdammers became great in
arms, and of the direful catastrophe of a mighty
armytogether with Peter Stuyvesant's
measures
to fortify the Cityand how he was the
original founder of the Battery
.
But
notwithstanding that the grand council, as
I have already shewn, were amazingly discreet in
their proceedings respecting the New
Netherlands
,
and conducted the whole with almost as much
silence and mystery, as does the sage British
cabinet
one of its ill star'd
secret expeditions
yet did the
ever watchful Peter receive as full and accurate
information
of every movement, as does the court of
France of all the notable enterprises I have
mentioned
.He
accordingly set himself to work, to
render the machinations of his bitter adversaries
abortive.
I know that many will censure the precipitation
of this stout hearted old governor, in that he
hurried
into the expenses of fortification, without
ascertaining
whether they were necessary, by
prudently
waiting until the enemy was at the door.
But they should recollect Peter Stuyvesant had not
the benefit of an insight into the modern arcana of
politics, and was strangely bigotted to certain
obsolete
maxims of the old school; among which he
firmly believed, that, to render a country respected
abroad, it was necessary to make it formidable at
homeand that a nation should place its reliance
for peace and security, more upon its own strength,
than on the justice or good will of its neighbours.
He proceeded therefore, with all diligence, to put
the province and metropolis in a strong posture
of defence.
Among the few remnants of ingenious
inventions
which remained from the days of William the
Testy, were those impregnable bulwarks of public
safety, militia laws; by which the inhabitants were
obliged to turn out twice a year, with such military
equipmentsas it pleased God; and were put
under
the command of very valiant taylors, and man
milliners, who though on ordinary occasions, the
meekest, pippen-hearted little men in the world,
were very devils at parades and court-martials,
when they had cocked hats on their heads, and
swords by their sides. Under the instructions of
these periodical warriors, the gallant train bands
made marvellous proficiency in the mystery of
gunpowder
.
They were taught to face to the right, to
wheel to the left, to snap off empty firelocks
without
winking, to turn a corner without any great
uproar
or irregularity, and to march through sun and
rain from one end of the town to the other without
flinchinguntil in the end they became so
valourous
that they fired off blank cartridges, without so
much as turning away their headscould hear the
largest field piece discharged, without stopping
their ears or falling into much confusionand would
even go through all the fatigues and perils of a
summer
day's parade, without having their ranks much
thinned by desertion!
True it is, the genius of this truly pacific
people
was so little given to war, that during the
intervals
which occurred between field days, they
generally
contrived to forget all the military tuition they
had received; so that when they re-appeared on
parade
,
they scarcely knew the butt end of the musket
from the muzzle, and invariably mistook the right
shoulder for the lefta mistake which however
was soon obviated by shrewdly chalking their left
arms. But whatever might be their blunders and
aukwardness, the sagacious Kieft, declared them to
be of but little importancesince, as he judiciously
observed, one campaign would be of more
instruction
to them than a hundred parades; for though
two-thirds of them might be food for powder, yet
such of the other third as did not run away, would
become most experienced veterans.
The great Stuyvesant had no particular
veneration
for the ingenious experiments and institutions
of his shrewd predecessor, and among other things,
held the militia system in very considerable
contempt
,
which he was often heard to call in jokefor
he was sometimes fond of a jokegovernor Kieft's
broken reed. As, however, the present emergency
was pressing, he was obliged to avail himself of such
means of defence as were next at hand, and
accordingly
appointed a general inspection and parade of
the train bands. But oh! Mars and Bellona, and
all ye other powers of war, both great and small,
what a turning out was here!Here came men
without officers, and officers without menlong
fowling pieces, and short blunderbussesmuskets
of all sorts and sizes, some without bayonets, others
without locks, others without stocks, and many
without lock, stock, or barrel.Cartridge-boxes,
shot belts, powder-horns, swords, hatchets,
snicker-snees
,
crow-bars, and broomsticks, all mingled
higgledy, piggledylike one of our continental
armies
at the breaking out of the revolution.
The sturdy Peter eyed this ragged regiment
with some such rueful aspect, as a man would eye
the devil; but knowing, like a wise man, that all
he had to do was to make the best out of a bad
bargain
,
he determined to give his heroes a seasoning.
Having therefore drilled them through the
manual
exercise over and over again, he ordered the
fifes to strike up a quick march, and trudged his
sturdy boots backwards and forwards, about the
streets of New Amsterdam, and the fields
adjacent
,
till I warrant me, their short legs ached, and
their fat sides sweated again. But this was not
all; the martial spirit of the old governor caught
fire from the sprightly music of the fife, and he
resolved
to try the mettle of his troops, and give
them a taste of the hardships of iron war. To
this end he encamped them as the shades of evening
fell, upon a hill formerly called Bunker's hill, at
some distance from the town, with a full intention
of initiating them into the dicipline of camps, and
of renewing the next day, the toils and perils of
the field. But so it came to pass, that in the night
there fell a great and heavy rain, which descended
in torrents upon the camp, and the mighty army
of swing tails strangely melted away before it; so
that when Gaffer Phbus came to shed his
morning
beams upon the place, saving Peter Stuyvesant
and his trumpeter Van Corlear, scarce one was to
be found of all the multitude, that had taken roost
there the night before.
This awful dissolution of his army would have
appalled a commander of less nerve than Peter
Stuyvesant; but he considered it as a matter of
but small importance, though he thenceforward
regarded the militia system with ten times greater
contempt than ever, and took care to provide
himself
with a good garrison of chosen men, whom
he kept in pay, of whom he boasted that they at
least possessed the quality, indispensible in
soldiers
,
of being
water proof
.
The next care of the vigilant Stuyvesant, was
to strengthen and fortify New Amsterdam. For
this purpose he reared a substantial barrier that
reached across the island from river to river, being
the distance of a full half a mile!a most
stupendous
work, and scarcely to be rivalled in the opinion
of the old inhabitants, by the great wall of China,
or the Roman wall erected in Great Britain against
the incursions of the Scots, or the wall of brass
that Dr. Faustus proposed to build round
Germany
,
by the aid of the devil.
The materials of which this wall was
constructed
are differently described, but from a majority of
opinions I am inclined to believe that it was a
picket fence of especial good pine posts, intended
to protect the city, not merely from the sudden
invasions
of foreign enemies, but likewise from the
incursions of the neighbouring Indians.
Some traditions it is true, have ascribed the
building of this wall to a later period, but they are
wholly incorrect; for a memorandum in the
Stuyvesant
manuscript, dated towards the middle of the
governor's reign, mentions this wall particularly, as
a very strong and curious piece of workmanship,
and the admiration of all the savages in the
neighbourhood
.
And it mentions moreover the
alarming
circumstance of a drove of stray cows, breaking
through the grand wall of a dark night; by which
the whole community of New Amsterdam was
thrown into as great panic, as were the people of
Rome, by the sudden irruptions of the Gauls, or
the valiant citizens of Philadelphia, during the
time of our revolution: by a fleet of empty kegs
floating down the Delaware.
[4]
[4]
In an antique view of Nieuw Amsterdam, taken some few
years after the above period, is an accurate representation of this
wall, which stretched along the course of
Wall-street
, so called in
commemoration of this great bulwark. One gate, called the
Land-poort
opened upon Broadway, hard by where at present
stands the Trinity Church; and another called the
Water-poort
,
stood about where the Tontine coffee-house is at presentopening
upon
Smits Vleye
, or as it is commonly called Smith fly; then a
marshy valley, with a creek or inlet, extending up what we call
maiden lane.
But the vigilance of the governor was more
especially manifested by an additional fortification
which he erected as an out work to fort
Amsterdam
,
to protect the sea bord, or water edge. I
have ascertained by the most painful and minute
investigation, that it was neither fortified
according
to the method of Evrard de Bar-le-duc, that
earliest inventor of complete system; the dutch
plan of Marollois; the French method invented by
by Antoine de Ville; the Flemish of Stevin de
Bruges; the Polish of Adam de Treitach, or the
Italian of Sardi.
He did not pursue either of the three systems
of Pagan; the three of Vauban; the three of
Scheiter
;
the three of Coehorn, that illustrious
dutchman
,
who adapted all his plans to the defence of
VOL II. F
low and marshy countriesor the hundred and
sixty methods, laid down by Francisco Marchi of
Bologna.
The fortification did not consist of a Polygon,
inscribed in a circle, according to Alain Manesson
Maillet; nor with four long batteries, agreeably to
the expensive system of Blondel; nor with the
fortification a rebours
of Dona Rosetti, nor the
Caponiere Couverte
, of the ingenious St. Julien;
nor with angular polygons and numerous
casemates
,
as recommended by Antoine d'Herbert; who
served under the duke of Wirtemberg,
grandfather
to the second wife, and first queen of Jerome
Bonaparteotherwise called Jerry Sneak.
It was neither furnished with bastions,
fashioned
after the original invention of Zisca, the
Bohemian; nor those used by Achmet Bassa, at
Otranto in 1480; nor those recommended by San
Micheli of Verona; neither those of triangular
form, treated of by Specle, the high dutch engineer
of Strasbourg, or the famous wooden bastions,
since erected in this renowned city, the destruction
of which, is recorded in a former chapter. In
fact governor Stuyvesant, like the celebrated
Montalembert
,
held bastions in absolute contempt; yet
did he not like him substitute a
tenaille angulaire
des polygons  ailerons
.
He did not make use of Myrtella towers, as
are now erecting at Quebec; neither did he erect
flagstaffs and windmills as was done by his
illustrious
predecessor of Saardam; nor did he employ
circular castellated towers, or batteries with two
tier of heavy artillery, and a third of columbiads on
the top; as are now erecting for the defence of this
defenceless city.
My readers will perhaps be surprized, that out
of so many systems, governor Stuyvesant should
find none to suit him; this may be tolerably
accounted
for, by the simple fact, that many of them
were unfortunately invented long since his time;
and as to the rest, he was as ignorant of them, as
the child that never was and never will be born.
In truth, it is more than probable, that had they all
been spread before him, with as many more into
the bargain; that same peculiarity of mind, that
acquired him the name of Hard-kopping Piet,
would have induced him to follow his own plans,
in preference to them all. In a word, he pursued
no system either past, present or to come; he
equally disdained to imitate his predecessors, of
whom he had never heardhis contemporaries,
whom he did not know; or his unborn successors,
whom, to say the truth, he never once thought of
in his whole life. His great and capacious mind
was convinced, that the simplest method is often
the most efficient and certainly the most expeditious,
he therefore fortified the water edge with a
formidable
mud breast work, solidly faced, after the
manner of the dutch ovens common in those days,
with clam shells.
These frowning bulwarks in process of time,
came to be pleasantly overrun by a verdant carpet
of grass and clover, and their high embankments
overshadowed by wide spreading sycamores, among
whose foilage the little birds sported about, making
the air to resound with their joyous notes. The
old burghers would repair of an afternoon to smoke
their pipes under the shade of their branches,
contemplating
the golden sun as he gradually sunk
into the west an emblem of that tranquil end toward
which themselves were hasteningwhile the young
men and the damsels of the town would take many
a moonlight stroll among these favourite haunts,
watching the silver beams of chaste Cynthia,
tremble
along the calm bosom of the bay, or light up
the white sail of some gliding bark, and
interchanging
the honest vows of constant affection.
Such was the origin of that renowned walk,
the
Battery
, which though ostensibly devoted to the
purposes of war, has ever been consecrated to the
sweet delights of peace. The favourite walk of
declining agethe healthful resort of the feeble
invalidthe sunday refreshment of the dusty
tradesman
the
scene of many a boyish gambolthe
rendezvous of many a tender assignationthe
comfort of the citizenthe ornament of New York,
and the pride of the lovely island of Mannahata.
CHAP. VI.
How the people of the east country were suddenly
afflicted with a diabolical eviland their
judicious
measures for the extirpation thereof
.
Having
thus provided for the temporary
security
of New Amsterdam, and guarded it against
any sudden surprise, the gallant Peter took a
hearty
pinch of snuff, and snapping his fingers, set the
great council of Amphyctions, aud their champion,
the doughty Alicxsander Partridg at defiance. It
is impossible to say, notwithstanding, what might
have been the issue of this affair, had not the great
council been all at once involved in huge perplexity,
and as much horrible dissension sown among its
members, as of yore was stirred up in the camp of
the brawling warriors of Greece.
The all potent council of the league, as I have
shewn in my last chapter, had already announced its
hostile determinations, and already was the mighty
colony of New Haven and the puissant town of
Pyquag
,
otherwise called Wethersfieldfamous for
its onions and its witchesand the great trading
house of Hartford, and all the other redoubtable
little
border towns, in a prodigious turmoil, furbishing
up their rusty fowling pieces and shouting aloud for
war; by which they anticipated easy conquests, and
F 2
gorgeous spoils, from the little fat dutch villages.
But this joyous brawling was soon silenced by the
conduct of the colony of Massachusetts. Struck
with the gallant spirit of the brave old Peter, and
convinced by the chivalric frankness and heroic
warmth of his vindication, they refused to believe
him guilty of the infamous plot most wrongfully
laid at his door. With a generosity for which I
would yield them immortal honour, they declared,
that no determination of the grand council of the
league, should bind the general court of
Massachusetts
,
to join in an offensive war, which should appear
to such general court to be unjust.
[5]
[5]
Haz. Col. S. Pap.
This refusal immediately involved the colony
of Massachusetts and the other combined colonies,
in very serious difficulties and disputes, and would
no doubt have produced a dissolution of the
confederacy
,
but that the great council of Amphyctions,
finding that they could not stand alone, if mutilated
by the loss of so important a member as
Massachusetts
,
were fain to abandon for the present their
hostile
machinations against the Manhattoes. Such is
the marvellous energy and puissance of those
notable
confederacies, composed of a number of sturdy,
self-will'd, discordant parts, loosely banded
together
by a puny general government. As it is
however
,
the warlike towns of Connecticut, had no
cause to deplore this disappointment of their
martial
ardour; for by my faiththough the combined
powers of the league might have been too potent
in the end, for the robustious warriors of the
Manhattoes
yet
in the interim would the lion hearted
Peter and his myrmidons, have choaked the
stomachful
heroes of Pyquag with their own onions,
and have given the other little border towns such a
scouring, that I warrant they would have had no
stomach to squat on the land, or invade the
hen-roost
of a New Nederlander for a century to come.
Indeed there was more than one cause to divert
the attention of the good people of the east, from
their hostile purposes; for just about this time were
they horribly beleagured and harassed by the
inroads
of the prince of darkness, divers of whose
liege subjects they detected, lurking within their
camp, all of whom they incontinently roasted as so
many spies, and dangerous enemies. Not to speak
in parables, we are informed, that at this juncture,
the unfortunate east countrie was exceedingly
troubled and confounded by multitudes of losel
witches, who wrought strange devices to beguile
and distress the multitude; and notwithstanding
numerous
judicious and bloody laws had been enacted,
against all solem conversing or compacting with
the divil, by way of conjuracon or the like,
[6]
[6]
New Plymouth record.
yet
did the dark crime of witchcraft continue to
encrease
to an alarming degree, that would almost
transcend belief, were not the fact too well
authenticated
to be even doubted for an instant.
What is particularly worthy of admiration is,
that this terrible art, which so long has baffled the
painful researches, and abstruse studies of
philosophers
,
astrologers, alchymists, theurgists and other
sages, was chiefly confined to the most ignorant,
decrepid, ugly, abominable old women in the
community
,
who had scarcely more brains than the
broomsticks they rode upon. Where they first
acquired
their infernal educationwhether from the
works of the ancient Theurgiststhe demonology
of the Egyptiansthe belomancy, or divination by
arrows of the Scythiansthe spectrology of the
Germansthe magic of the Persiansthe
enchantment
of the Laplanders, or from the archives of
the dark and mysterious caverns of the Dom
Daniel
,
is a question pregnant with a host of learned
and ingenious doubtsparticularly as most of them
were totally unversed in the occult mysteries of the
alphabet.
When once an alarm is sounded, the public,
who love dearly to be in a panic, are not long in
want of proofs to support itraise but the cry of
yellow fever, and immediately every head-ache,
and indigestion, and overflowing of the bile is
pronounced
the terrible epidemicIn like manner in
the present instance, whoever was troubled with a
cholic or lumbago, was sure to be bewitched, and
woe to any unlucky old woman that lived in his
neighbourhood. Such a howling abomination could
not be suffered to remain long unnoticed, and it
accordingly
soon attracted the fiery indignation of the
sober and reflective part of the communitymore
especially of those, who, whilome, had evinced so
much active benevolence in the conversion of
quakers
and anabaptists. The grand council of the
amphyctions publicly set their faces against so
deadly and dangerous a sin, and a severe scrutiny
took place after those nefarious witches, who were
easily detected by devil's pinches, black cats,
broomsticks
,
and the circumstance of their only being
able to weep three tears, and those out of the left
eye.
It is incredible the number of offences that were
detected, for every one of which, says the
profound
and reverend Cotton Mather, in that
excellent
work, the history of New Englandwe have
such a sufficient evidence, that no reasonable man
in this whole country ever did question them;
and
it will be unreasonable to do it in any other
.
Mather's hist. N. Eng B. 6. ch.
7.
Indeed, that authentic and judicious historian
John Josselyn, Gent. furnishes us with
unquestionable
facts on this subject. There are none,
observes
he that beg in this country, but there be
witches too manybottle bellied witches and others,
that produce many strange apparitions, if you will
believe
report of a shalop at sea manned with women
and of a ship and great red horse standing by the
main mast; the ship being in a small cove to the
eastward
vanished of a sudden, &c.
The number of delinquents, however, and their
magical devices, were not more remarkable than
their diabolical obstinacy. Though exhorted in the
most solemn, persuasive and affectionate manner,
to confess themselves guilty, and be burnt for the
good of religion, and the entertainment of the
public
;
yet did they most pertinaciously persist in
asserting
their innocence. Such incredible obstinacy
was in itself deserving of immediate punishment,
and was sufficient proof, if proof were necessary,
that they were in league with the devil, who is
perverseness
itself. But their judges were just and
merciful, and were determined to punish none that
were not convicted on the best of testimony; not
that they needed any evidence to satisfy their
own minds, for, like true and experienced judges
their minds were perfectly made up, and they
were thoroughly satisfied of the guilt of the
prisoners before they proceeded to try them; but
still something was necessary to convince the
community at largeto quiet those prying quid
nuncs who should come after themin short, the
world must be satisfied. Oh the worldthe world!
all the world knows the world of trouble the world
is eternally occasioning!The worthy judges
therefore
,
like myself in this most authentic, minute and
satisfactory of all histories, were driven to the
necessity
of sifting, detecting and making evident as
noon day, matters which were at the
commencement
all clearly understood and firmly decided upon
in their own own pericraniumsso that it may truly
be said, that the witches were burnt, to gratify the
populace of the daybut were tried for the
satisfaction
of the whole world that should come after
them!
Finding therefore that neither exhortation, sound
reason, nor friendly entreaty had any avail on these
hardened offenders, they resorted to the more
urgent
arguments of the torture, and having thus
absolutely
wrung the truth from their stubborn lips
they condemned them to undergo the roasting due
unto the heinous crimes they had confessed. Some
even carried their perverseness so far, as to expire
under the torture, protesting their innocence to the
last; but these were looked upon as thoroughly and
absolutely possessed, and governed by the devil,
and the pious bye-standers, only lamented that they
had not lived a little longer, to have perished in the
flames.
In the city of Ephesus, we are told, that the
plague was expelled by stoning a ragged old
beggar
to death, whom Appolonius pointed out as
being
the evil spirit that caused it, and who actually
shewed himself to be a demon, by changing into a
shagged dog. In like manner, and by measures
equally sagacious, a salutary check was given to
this growing evil. The witches were all burnt,
banished or panic struck, and in a little while
there was not an ugly old woman to be found
throughout New Englandwhich is doubtless one
reason why all their young women are so handsome.
Those honest folk who had suffered from their
incantations
gradually recovered, excepting such as
had been afflicted with twitches and aches, which,
however assumed the less alarming aspects of
rheumatisms
,
sciatics and lumbagosand the good
people of New England, abandoning the study of
the occult sciences, turned their attention to the
more profitable hocus pocus of trade, and soon
became
expert in the legerdemain art of turning a
penny
.
Still however, a tinge of the old leaven is
discernable
,
even unto this day, in their characters
witches occasionally start up among them in
different
disguises, as physicians, civilians, and divines.
The people at large shew a 'cuteness, a cleverness,
and a profundity of wisdom, that savours strongly
of witchcraftand it has been remarked, that
whenever
any stones fall from the moon, the greater part
of them are sure to tumble into New England!
CHAP VII.
Which records the rise and renown of a valiant
commander, shewing that a man, like a bladder,
may be puffed up to greatness and importance,
by mere wind
.
When
treating of these tempestuous times, the
unknown writer of the Stuyvesant manuscript,
breaks out into a vehement apostrophe, in praise of
the good St. Nicholas; to whose protecting care he
entirely ascribes the strange dissentions that broke
out in the council of the amphyctions, and the
direful witchcraft that prevailed in the east country
whereby the hostile machinations against the
Nederlanders were for a time frustrated, and his
favourite city of New Amsterdam, preserved from
imminent peril and deadly warfare. Darkness
and lowering superstition hung over the fair valleys
of the east; the pleasant banks of the Connecticut,
no longer echoed with the sounds of rustic gaiety;
direful phantoms and portentous apparitions were
seen in the airgliding spectrums haunted every
wildbrook and dreary glenstrange voices, made by
viewless forms, were heard in desart solitudesand
the border towns were so occupied in detecting and
punishing the knowing old women, that had
produced
these alarming appearances, that for a while
VOL. II. G
the province of New Nederlandt and its inhabitants
were totally forgotten.
The great Peter therefore, finding that nothing
was to be immediately apprehended from his eastern
neighbours, turned himself about with a
praiseworthy
vigilance that ever distinguished him, to put
a stop to the insults of the Swedes. These lossel
freebooters my attentive reader will recollect had
begun to be very troublesome towards the latter part
of the reign of William the Testy, having set the
proclamations of that doughty little governor at
naught, and put the intrepid Jan Jansen Alpendam
to a perfect non plus!
Peter Stuyvesant, however, as has already been
shewn, was a governor of different habits and turn
of mindwithout more ado he immediately issued
orders for raising a corps of troops to be stationed
on the southern frontier, under the command of
brigadier general Jacobus Von Poffenburgh. This
illustrious warrior had risen to great importance
during the reign of Wihelmus Keift, and if histories
speak true, was second in command to the gallant
Van Curlet, when he and his ragged regiment were
inhumanly kicked out of Fort Good Hope by the
Yankees. In consequence of having been in such
a memorable affair, and of having received
more wounds on a certain honourable part that
shall be nameless, than any of his comrades, he was
ever after considered as a hero, who had seen
some service. Certain it is, he enjoyed the
unlimited
confidence and friendship of William the
Testy; who would sit for hours and listen with
wonder to his gunpowder narratives of surprising
victorieshe had never gained: and dreadful
battles
from
which he had run away; and the governor
was once heard to declare that had he lived in
ancient times, he might unquestionably have claimed
the armour of Achillesbeing not merely like
Ajax, a mighty blustering man of battle, but in the
cabinet a second Ulysses, that is to say, very valiant
of speech and long windedall which, as nobody
in New Amsterdam knew aught of the ancient
heroes in question, passed totally uncontradicted.
It was tropically observed by honest old Socrates,
of hen-pecked memory, that heaven had infused
into some men at their birth a portion of intellectual
gold; into others of intellectual silver; while others
were bounteously furnished out with abundance of
brass and ironnow of this last class was
undoubtedly
the great general Von Poffenburgh, and from
the great display he continually made, I am inclined
to think that dame nature, who will sometimes be
partial, had blessed him with enough of those
valuable materials to have fitted up a dozen ordinary
braziers. But what is most to be admired is, that he
contrived to pass off all his brass and copper upon
Wilhelmus Kieft, who was no great judge of base
coin, as pure and genuine gold. The consequence
was, that upon the resignation of Jacobus Van
Curlet
,
who after the loss of fort Goed Hoop retired
like a veteran general, to live under the shade of
his laurels, the mighty copper captain was
promoted
to his station. This he filled with great
importance, always styling himself commander
in chief of the armies of the New Netherlands;
though to tell the truth the armies, or rather army,
consisted of a handful of half uniformed, hen
stealing, bottle bruizing raggamuffins.
Such was the character of the warrior appointed
by Peter Stuyvesant to defend his southern frontier,
nor may it be uninteresting to my reader to have a
glimpse of his person. He was not very tall, but
notwithstanding, a huge, full bodied man, whose
size did not so much arise from his being fat, as
windy; being so completely inflated with his own
importance, that he resembled one of those puffed
up bags of wind, which old Eolus, in an incredible
fit of generosity, gave to that vagabond warrior
Ulysses.
His dress comported with his character, for he
had almost as much brass and copper without, as
nature had stored away withinHis coat was
crossed
and slashed, and carbonadoed, with stripes of
copper lace, and swathed round the body with a
crimson sash, of the size and texture of a fishing
net, doubtless to keep his valiant heart from bursting
through his ribs. His head and whiskers were pro
fusely powdered, from the midst of which his full
blooded face glowed like a fiery furnace; and his
magnanimous soul seemed ready to bounce out at
a pair of large glassy blinking eyes, which projected
like those of a lobster.
I swear to thee, worthy reader, if report belie
not this great general, I would give half my
fortune
(which at this moment is not enough to pay
the bill of my landlord) to have seen him
accoutered
cap-a-pie, in martial arraybooted to the
middlesashed to the chincollared to the ears
whiskered to the muzzlecrowned with an
overshadowing
cocked-hat, and girded with a leathern
belt ten inches broad, from which trailed a faulchion
of a length that I dare not mention.
Thus equipped, he strutted about, as bitter
looking
a man of war as the far-famed More of More
Hall, when he sallied forth, armed at all points, to
slay the Dragon of Wantley
Had you but seen him in this dress
How fierce he look'd and how big;
You would have thought him for to be
Some Egyptian Porcupig.
He frighted all, cats, dogs and all,
Each cow, each horse, and each hog;
For fear they did flee, for they took him to be
Some strange outlandish hedge hog.
[7]
[7]
Ballad of Drag of Want.
G 2
Notwithstanding all the great endowments and
transcendent qualities of this renowned general, I
must confess he was not exactly the kind of man
that the gallant Peter the Headstrong would have
chosen to command his troopsbut the truth is, that
in those days the province did not abound, as at
present
,
in great military characters; who like so many
Cincinnatuses people every little village
marshalling
out cabbages, instead of soldiers, and
signalizing
themselves in the corn field, instead of the
field of battle. Who have surrendered the toils of
war, for the more useful but inglorious arts of
peace, and so blended the laurel with the olive, that
you may have a general for a landlord, a colonel
for a stage driver, and your horse shod by a valiant
captain of volunteersNeither had the great
Stuyvesant an opportunity of choosing, like modern
rulers, from a loyal band of editors of newspapers
no mention being made in the histories of the times,
of any such class of mercenaries, being retained in
pay by government, either as trumpeters,
champions
,
or body guards. The redoubtable general
Von Poffenburgh, therefore, was appointed to the
command of the new levied troops; chiefly because
there were no competitors for the station, and partly
because it would have been a breach of military
etiquette, to have appointed a younger officer over
his headan injustice, which the great Peter would
rather have died than have committed.
No sooner did this thrice valiant copper
captain
receive marching orders, than he conducted
his army undauntedly to the southern frontier;
through wild lands and savage deserts; over
insurmountable
mountains, across impassable floods
and through impenetrable forests; subduing a vast
tract of uninhabited country, and overturning,
discomfiting
and making incredible slaughter of
certain
hostile hosts of grass-hoppers, toads and
pismires
,
which had gathered together to oppose his
progressan achievement unequalled in the pages
of history, save by the farfamed retreat of old
Xenephon and his ten thousand Grecians. All
this accomplished, he established on the South (or
Delaware) river, a redoubtable redoubt, named
Fort Casimer
, in honour of a favourite pair of
brimstone coloured trunk breeches of the
governor's
.
As this fort will be found to give rise to
very important and interesting events, it may be
worth while to notice that it was afterwards called
Neiuw Amstel, and was the original germ of the
present flourishing town of
New Castle
, an
appellation
erroneously substituted for
No Castle
,
there neither being, nor ever having been a castle,
or any thing of the kind upon the premises.
The Swedes did not suffer tamely this
menacing
movement of the Nederlanders; on the
contrary
Jan Printz, at that time governor of New
Sweden, issued a sturdy protest against what he
termed an encroachment upon his jurisdiction.
But the valiant Von Poffenburgh had become too
well versed in the nature of proclamations and
protests
,
while he served under William the Testy,
to be in any wise daunted by such paper warfare.
His fortress being finished, it would have done
any man's heart good to behold into what a
magnitude
he immediately swelled. He would stride in
and out a dozen times a day, surveying it in front
and in rear; on this side and on that.Then would
he dress himself in full regimentals, and strut
backwards
and forwards, for hours together, on the top
of his little rampartlike a vain glorious cock
pidgeon vapouring on the top of his coop. In a
word, unless my readers have noticed, with
curious
eye, the petty commander of a little,
snivelling
,
military post, swelling with all the vanity
of new regimentals, and the pomposity derived
from commanding a handful of tatterdemalions,
I despair of giving them any adequate idea of
the prodigious dignity of general Von
Poffenburgh
.
It is recorded in the delectable romance of
Pierce Forest, that a young knight being dubbed
by king Alexander, did incontinently gallop into an
adjoining forest, and belaboured the trees with such
might and main, that the whole court were
convinced
that he was the most potent and courageous
gentleman on the face of the earth. In like
manner
the great general Von Poffenburgh would ease
off that valourous spleen, which like wind is so apt
to grow unruly in the stomachs of new made
soldiers
,
impelling them to box-lobby brawls, and
broken
headed quarrels.For at such times, when he
found his martial spirit waxing hot within him, he
would prudently sally forth into the fields, and
lugging
out his trusty sabre, of full two flemish ells in
length, would lay about him most lustily,
decapitating
cabbages by platoonshewing down whole
phalanxes of sunflowers, which he termed gigantic
Swedes; and if peradventure, he espied a colony of
honest big bellied pumpkins quietly basking
themselves
in the sun, ah caitiff Yankees, would he
roar, have I caught ye at last!so saying, with
one sweep of his sword, he would cleave the
unhappy
vegetables from their chins to their waistbands:
by which warlike havoc, his choler being in some
sort allayed, he would return to his garrison with a
full conviction, that he was a very miracle of
military
prowess.
The next ambition of general Von Poffenburgh
was to be thought a strict disciplinarian. Well
knowing that discipline is the soul of all military
enterprize, he enforced it with the most rigorous
precision; obliging every man to turn out his toes,
and hold up his head on parade, and prescribing the
breadth of their ruffles to all such as had any shirts
to their backs.
Having one day, in the course of his devout
researches
in the bible, (for the pious Eneas himself,
could not exceed him in outward religion)
encountered
the history of Absalom and his melancholy
end; the general in an evil hour, issued orders for
cropping the hair of both officers and men
throughout
the garrison. Now it came to pass, that among
his officers was one Kildermeester; a sturdy old
veteran, who had cherished through the course of a
long life, a rugged mop of hair, not a little
resembling
the shag of a Newfoundland dog;
terminating
with an immoderate queue, like the handle of
a frying pan; and queued so tightly to his head,
that his eyes and mouth generally stood ajar, and
his eye-brows were drawn up to the top of his
forehead
.
It may naturally be supposed that the
possessor
of so goodly an appendage would resist with
abhorrence, an order condemning it to the shears.
Sampson himself could not have held his wig more
sacred, and on hearing the general orders, he
discharged
a tempest of veteran, soldier-like oaths,
and dunder and blixumsswore he would break any
man's head who attempted to meddle with his tail
queued it stiffer than ever, and whisked it about
the garrison, as fiercely as the tail of a crocodile.
The eel-skin queue of old Kildermeester, became
instantly an affair of the utmost importance. The
commander in chief was too enlightened an officer
not to perceive, that the discipline of the garrison,
the subordination and good order of the
armies
of
the Nieuw Nederlandts, the consequent safety of
the whole province, and ultimately the dignity and
prosperity of their high mightinesses, the lords
states general, but above all, the dignity of the
great general Von Poffenburgh, all imperiously
demanded
the docking of that stubborn queue. He
therefore patriotically determined that old
Kildermeester
should be publicly shorn of his glories in
presence of the whole garrisonthe old man as
resolutely
stood on the defensivewhereupon the
general, as became a great man, was highly
exasperated
,
and the offender was arrested and tried
by a court martial for mutiny, desertion and all the
other rigmarole of offences noticed in the articles of
war, ending with a videlicit, in wearing an eel-skin
queue, three feet long, contrary to ordersThen
came on arraignments, and trials, and pleadings,
and convictings, and the whole country was in a
ferment about this unfortunate queue. As it is
well known that the commander of a distant frontier
post has the power of acting pretty much after his
own will, there is little doubt but that the old
veteran
would have been hanged or shot at least, had he
not luckily fallen ill of a fever, through mere
chagrin
and mortificationand most flagitiously
deserted
from all earthly command, with his beloved
locks unviolated. His obstinacy remained
unshaken
to the very last moment, when he directed that
he should be carried to his grave with his eel-skin
queue sticking out of a knot hole in his coffin.
This magnanimous affair obtained the general
great credit as an excellent disciplinarian, but it is
hinted that he was ever after subject to bad dreams,
and fearful visitations in the nightwhen the
grizly
spectrum of old Kildermeester would stand
centinel
by his bed side, erect as a pump, his
enormous
queue strutting out like the handle.
BOOK VI.
Containing the second part of the reign of Peter
the Headstrongand his gallant atchievements on
the Delaware.
CHAP. I.
In which is presented a warlike portrait of the
Great Peter.And how General Von
Poffenburgh
gave a stout carousal, for which he got
more kicks than coppers
.
Hitherto
most venerable and courteous reader,
have I shewn thee the administration of the
valourous
Stuyvesant, under the mild moonshine of
peace; or rather the grim tranquillity of awful
preparation
;
but now the war drum rumbles, the
brazen
trumpet brays its thrilling note, and the rude
clash of hostile arms, speaks fearful prophecies of
coming troubles. The gallant warrior starts from
soft repose, from golden visions and voluptuous
ease; where in the dulcet, piping time of peace,
he sought sweet solace after all his toils. No more
in beauty's syren lap reclined, he weaves fair
garlands
for his lady's brows; no more entwines with
VOL. II. H
flowers his shining sword, nor through the live-long
lazy summers day, chaunts forth his lovesick soul
in madrigals. To manhood roused, he spurns the
amorous flute; doffs from his brawny back the robe
of peace, and clothes his pampered limbs in panoply
of steel. O'er his dark brow, where late the
myrtle
waved; where wanton roses breathed enervate
love, he rears the beaming casque and nodding
plume; grasps the bright shield and shakes the
pondrous
lance; or mounts with eager pride his fiery
steed; and burns for deeds of glorious chivalry!
But soft, worthy reader! I would not have you
go about to imagine, that any
preux chevalier
thus
hideously begirt with iron existed in the city of
New Amsterdam.This is but a lofty and gigantic
mode in which we heroic writers always talk of
war, thereby to give it a noble and imposing
aspect
;
equipping our warriors with bucklers, helms
and lances, and a host of other outlandish and
obsolete
weapons, the like of which perchance they
had never seen or heard of; in the same manner
that a cunning statuary arrays a modern general or
an admiral in the accoutrements of a Csar or an
Alexander. The simple truth then of all this
oratorical
flourish is this.That the valiant Peter
Stuyvesant all of a sudden found it necessary to
scour his trusty blade, which too long had rusted
in its scabbard, and prepare himself to undergo
those hardy toils of war, in which his mighty soul
so much delighted.
Methinks I at this moment behold him in my
imaginationor rather I behold his goodly
portrait
,
which still hangs up in the family mansion of
the Stuyvesantsarrayed in all the terrors of a
true dutch general. His regimental coat of
German
blue, gorgeously decorated with a goodly
shew of large brass buttons, reaching from his
waistband to his chin. The voluminous skirts
turned up at the corners and separating gallantly
behind, so as to display the seat of a sumptuous
pair of brimstone coloured trunk breechesa
graceful
style still prevalent among the warriors of our
day, and which is in conformity to the custom of
ancient heroes, who scorned to defend themselves
in rear.His face rendered exceeding terrible and
warlike by a pair of black mustachios; his hair
strutting out on each side in stiffly pomatumed ear
locks and descending in a rat tail queue below his
waist; a shining stock of black leather supporting
his chin, and a little, but fierce cocked hat stuck
with a gallant and fiery air, over his left eye. Such
was the chivalric port of Peter the Headstrong;
and when he made a sudden halt, planted himself
firmly on his solid supporter, with his wooden leg,
inlaid with silver, a little in advance, in order to
strengthen his position; his right hand stuck
akimbo
,
his left resting upon the pummel of his
brass hilted sword; his head dressing spiritedly
to the right, with a most appalling and hard
favoured
frown upon his browhe presented altogether
one of the most commanding, bitter looking, and
soldierlike figures, that ever strutted upon canvass.
Proceed we now to enquire the cause of this
warlike preparation.
The encroaching disposition of the Swedes, on
the south, or Delaware river, has been duly
recorded
in the Chronicles of the reign of William
the Testy. These encroachments having been
endured
with that heroic magnanimity, which is the
corner stone, or according to Aristotle, the left
hand neighbour of true courage, had been repeated
and wickedly aggravated.
The Swedes, who, were of that class of cunning
pretenders to Christianity, that read the Bible
upside
down, whenever it interferes with their
interests
,
inverted the golden maxim, and when their
neighbour suffered them to smite him on the one
cheek, they generally smote him on the other also,
whether it was turned to them or not. Their
repeated
aggressions had been among the numerous
sources of vexation, that conspired to keep the
irritable sensibilities of Wilhelmus Kieft, in a
constant
fever, and it was only owing to the
unfortunate
circumstance, that he had always a hundred
things to do at once, that he did not take such
unrelenting
vengeance as their offences merited. But
they had now a chieftan of a different character to
deal with; and they were soon guilty of a piece of
treachery, that threw his honest blood in a ferment,
and precluded all further sufference.
Printz, the governor of the province of New
Sweden, being either deceased or removed, for of
this fact some uncertainty exists; he was succeeded
by Jan Risingh, a gigantic Swede, and who, had he
not been rather in-kneed and splay-footed, might
have served for the model of a Sampson, or a
Hercules
.
He was no less rapacious than mighty, and
withal as crafty as he was rapacious; so that in fact
there is very little doubt, had he lived some four or
five centuries before, he would have made one of
those wicked giants, who took such a cruel pleasure
in pocketing distressed damsels, when gadding about
the would, and locking them up in enchanted castles,
without a toilet, a change of linen, or any other
convenience.In consequence of which enormities
they fell under the high displeasure of chivalry,
and all true, loyal and gallant knights, were
instructed
to attack and slay outright any miscreant
they might happen to find above six feet high;
which is doubtless one reason that the race of large
men is nearly extinct, and the generations of latter
ages so exceeding small.
No sooner did governor Risingh enter upon
his office, than he immediately cast his eyes upon
the important post of Fort Casimer, and formed the
H 2
righteous resolution of taking it into his possession.
The only thing that remained to consider, was the
mode of carrying his resolution into effect; and
here I must do him the justice to say, that he
exhibited
a humanity rarely to be met with among
leaders; and which I have never seen equalled in
modern times, excepting among the English, in
their glorious affair at Copenhagen. Willing to
spare the effusion of blood, and the miseries of open
warfare, he benevolently shunned every thing like
avowed hostility or regular seige, and resorted to
the less glorious, but more merciful expedient of
treachery.
Under pretence therefore, of paying a sociable,
neighbourly visit to general Von Poffenburgh, at
his new post of Fort Casimer, he made requisite
preparation, sailed in great state up the Delaware,
displayed his flag with the most ceremonious
punctilio
,
and honoured the fortress with a royal salute,
previous to dropping anchor. The unusual noise
awakened a veteran dutch centinel, who was
napping
faithfully on his post, and who after hammering
his flint for good ten minutes, and rubbing its edge
with the corner of his ragged cocked hat, but all to
no purpose, contrived to return the compliment,
by discharging his rusty firelock with the spark of
a pipe, which he borrowed from one of his comrades.
The salute indeed would have been answered by
the guns of the fort, had they not unfortunately
been out of order, and the magazine deficient in
ammunitionaccidents to which forts have in all
ages been liable, and which were the more
excusable
in the present instance, as Fort Casimir had
only been erected about two years, and general
Von Poffenburgh, its mighty commander, had been
fully occupied wish matters of much greater self
importance.
Risingh, highly satisfied with this courteous
reply to his salute, treated the fort to a second,
for he well knew its puissant and pompous leader,
was marvellously delighted with these little
ceremonials
,
which he considered as so many acts of
homage paid unto his greatness. He then landed
in great state, attended by a suite of thirty men
a prodigious and vain-glorious retinue, for a petty
governor of a petty settlement, in those days of
primitive simplicity; and to the full as great an
army as generally swells the pomp and marches in
the rear of our frontier commanders at the present
day.
The number in fact might have awakened
suspicion
,
had not the mind of the great Von
Poffenburgh
been so completely engrossed with an all
pervading idea of himself, that he had not room to
admit a thought besides. In fact he considered
the concourse of Risingh's followers as a
compliment
to himselfso apt are great men to stand
between themselves and the sun, and completely
eclipse the truth by their own shadow.
It may readily be imagined how much general
Von Poffenburgh was flattered by a visit from so
august a personage; his only embarrassment was,
how he should receive him in such a manner as to
appear to the greatest advantage, and make the
most advantageous impression. The main guard
was ordered immediately to turn out, and the arms
and regimentals (of which the garrison possessed
full half a dozen suits) were equally distributed
among the solidiers. One tall lank fellow, appeared
in a coat intended for a small man, the skirts of
which reached a little below his waist, the buttons
were between his shoulders and the sleeves half way
to his wrists, so that his hands looked like a couple
of huge spadesand the coat not being large enough
to meet in front, was linked together by loops,
made of a pair of red worsted garters. Another
had an old cocked hat, stuck on the back of his
head and decorated with a bunch of cocks tails
a third had a pair of rusty gaiters hanging about
his heelswhile a fourth, who was a short duck
legged little trojan, was equipped in a huge pair of
the general's cast off breeches, which he held up
with one hand, while he grasped his firelock with
the other. The rest were accoutred in similar
style, excepting three graceless raggamuffins, who
had no shirts and but a pair and half of breeches
between them, wherefore they were sent to the
black hole, to keep them out of view. There is
nothing in which the talents of a prudent commander
are more completely testified, than in thus setting
matters off to the greatest advantage; and it is for
this reason that our frontier posts at the present
day (that of Niagara in particular) display their
best suit of regimentals on the back of the centinel
who stands in sight of travellers.
His men being thus gallantly arrayedthose
who lacked muskets shouldering shovels and pick
axes, and every man being ordered to tuck in his
shirt tail and pull up his brogues, general Von
Poffenburgh first took a sturdy draught of foaming
ale, which like the magnanimous More of
Morehall
[8]
[8]
as soon as he rose,
To make him strong and mighty,
He drank by the tale, six pots of ale,
And a quart of Aqua Vit.
was his invariable practice on all great
occasions
which
done he put himself at their head,
ordered
the pine planks, which served as a draw bridge,
to be laid down, and issued forth from his castle,
like a mighty giant, just refreshed with wine. But
when the two heroes met, then began a scene of
warlike parade and chivalric courtesy, that beggars
all description. Risingh, who, as I before hinted,
was a shrewd, cunning politician, and had grown
grey much before his time, in consequence of his
craftiness, saw at one glance the ruling passion of
the great Von Poffenburgh, and humoured him in all
his valorous fantasies.
Their detachments were accordingly drawn up
in front of each other; they carried arms and they
presented arms; they gave the standing salute and
the passing saluteThey rolled their drums, they
flourished their fifes and they waved their colours
they faced to the left, and they faced to the right,
and they faced to the right aboutThey wheeled
forward, and they wheeled backward, and they
wheeled into
echellon
They marched and they
countermarched, by grand divisions, by single
divisions
and by sub-divisionsby platoons, by sections
and by filesIn quick time, in slow time and in no
time at all; for, having gone through all the
evolutions
of two great armies, including the eighteen
manuvres of Dundas (which, not being yet
invented
they must have anticipated by intuition or
inspiration) having exhausted all that they could
recollect or imagine of military tactics, including
sundry strange and irregular evolutions, the like of
which were never seen before or since, excepting
among certain of our newly raised drafts, the
two great commanders and their respective troops,
came at length to a dead halt, completely exhausted
by the toils of warNever did two valiant train
band captains, or two buskin'd theatric heroes, in
the renowned tragedies of Pizarro, Tom Thumb, or
any other heroical and fighting tragedy, marshal
their gallows-looking, duck-legged, heavy-heeled,
sheep-stealing myrmidons with more glory and
self-admiration
.
These military compliments being finished,
general
Von Poffenburgh escorted his illustrious
visitor
,
with great ceremony into the fort; attended him
throughout the fortifications; shewed him the horn
works, crown works, half moons, and various other
outworks; or rather the places where they ought to
be erected, and where they might be erected if he
pleased; plainly demonstrating that it was a place
of great capability, and though at present but a
little redoubt, yet that it evidently was a formidable
fortress, in embryo. This survey over, he next had
the whole garrison put under arms, exercised and
reviewed, and concluded by ordering the three
bridewell
birds to be hauled out of the black hole, brought
up to the halberts and soundly flogged, for the
amusement of his visitor, and to convince him, that
he was a great disciplinarian.
There is no error more dangerous than for a
commander to make known the strength, or, as in
the present case, the weakness of his garrison; this
will be exemplified before I have arrived to an end
of my present story, which thus carries its moral
like a roasted goose his pudding in its very middle.
The cunning Risingh, while he pretended to be
struck dumb outright, with the puissance of the
great Von Poffenburgh, took silent note of the
incompetency of his garrison, of which he gave a
hint to his trusty followers; who tipped each other
the wink, and laughed most obstreperouslyin
their sleeves.
The inspection, review, and flogging being
concluded
,
the party adjourned to the table; for
among his other great qualities, the general was
remarkably
addicted to huge entertainments, or rather
carousals, and in one afternoon's campaign would
leave more
dead men
on the field, than he ever did
in the whole course of his military career. Many
bulletins of these bloodless victories do still remain
on record; and the whole province was once thrown
in amaze, by the return of one of his campaigns;
wherein it was stated, that though like captain
Bobadel, he had only twenty men to back him,
yet in the short space of six months he had
conquered
and utterly aunihilated sixty oxen, ninety
hogs, one hundred sheep, ten thousand cabbages,
one thousand bushels of potatoes, one hundred and
fifty kilderkins of small beer, two thousand seven
hundred and thirty five pipes, seventy eight pounds
of sugar-plumbs, and forty bars of iron, besides
sundry small meats, game, poultry and garden stuff.
An atchievement unparalleled since the days of
Pantagruel and his all devouring army, and which
shewed that it was only necessary to let the great
general Von Poffenburgh, and his garrison, loose
in an enemies country, and in a little while they
would breed a famine, and starve all the
inhabitants
.
No sooner therefore had the general received
the first intimation of the visit of governor Risingh,
than he ordered a big dinner to be prepared; and
privately sent out a detachment of his most
experienced
veterans, to rob all the hen-roosts in
the neighbourhood, and lay the pig-styes under
contribution; a service to which they had been
long enured, and which they discharged with such
incredible zeal and promptitude, that the garrison
table groaned under the weight of their spoils.
I wish with all my heart, my readers could see
the valiant Von Poffenburgh, as he presided at the
head of the banquet: it was a sight worth
beholding
there
he sat, in his greatest glory,
surrounded
by his soldiers, like that famous wine bibber
Alexander, whose thirsty virtues he did most ably
imitatetelling astounding stories of his
hair-breadth
adventures and heroic exploits, at which,
though all his auditors knew them to be most
incontinent
and outrageous gasconadoes, yet did they
cast up their eyes in admiration and utter many
interjections
of astonishment. Nor could the
general
pronounce any thing that bore the remotest
semblance to a joke, but the stout Risingh would
strike his brawny fist upon the table till every glass
VOL. II. I
rattled again, throwing himself back in his chair,
and uttering gigantic peals of laughter, swearing
most horribly, it was the best joke he ever heard
in his life.Thus all was rout and revelry and
hideous
carousal within Fort Casimer, and so lustily
did the great Von Poffenburgh ply the bottle, that
in less than four short hours he made himself, and
his whole garrison, who all sedulously emulated
the deeds of their chieftain, dead drunk, in singing
songs, quaffing bumpers, and drinking fourth of
July toasts, not one of which, but was as long as a
Welsh pedigee or a plea in chancery.
No sooner did things come unto this pass, than
the crafty Risingh and his Swedes, who had
cunningly
kept themselves sober, rose on their
entertainers
,
tied them neck and heels, and took formal
possession of the fort, and all its dependencies, in
the name of queen Christina, of Sweden:
administering
,
at the same time, an oath of allegiance to all
the dutch soldiers, who could be made sober enough
to swallow it. Risingh then put the fortifications
in order, appointed his discreet and vigilant friend
Suen Scutz, a tall, wind-dried, water drinking
Swede, to the command, and departed bearing with
him this truly amiable garrison, and their puissant
commander; who when brought to himself by a
sound drubbing, bore no little resemblance to a
deboshed fish; or bloated sea monster, caught
upon dry land.
The transportation of the garrison was done
to prevent the transmission of intelligence to New
Amsterdam; for much as the cunning Risingh
exulted
in his stratagem, he dreaded the vengeance of
the sturdy Peter Stuyvesant; whose name spread
as much terror in the neighbourhood, as did
whilome
that of the unconquerable Scanderbeg among
his scurvy enemies the Turks.
CHAP. II.
Shewing how profound secrets are strangely brought
to light; with the proceedings of Peter the
Headstrong when he heard of the misfortune of
General Von Poffenburgh
.
Whoever
first described common fame, or
rumour
,
as belonging to the sager sex, was a very owl
for shrewdness. She has in truth certain feminine
qualities to an astonishing degree; particularly that
benevolent anxiety to take care of the affairs of
others, which keeps her continually hunting after
secrets, and gadding about, proclaiming them.
Whatever is done openly and in the face of the
world, she takes but transient notice of, but
whenever
a transaction is done in a corner, and
attempted
to be shrouded in mystery, then her goddesship
is at her wit's end to find it out, and takes a most
mischievous and lady-like pleasure in publishing it
to the world. It is this truly feminine propensity
that induces her continually to be prying into
cabinets
of princes; listening at the key holes of
senate
chambers, and peering through chinks and
crannies, when our worthy Congress are sitting
with closed doors, deliberating between a dozen
excellent modes of ruining the nation. It is this
which makes her so obnoxious to all wary
statesmen
and intriguing commanderssuch a stumbling
block to private negociations and secret expeditions;
which she often betrays, by means and instruments
which never would have been thought of by any
but a female head.
Thus it was in the case of the affair of Fort
Casimer
.
No doubt the cunning Risingh imagined,
that by securing the garrison, he should for a long
time prevent the history of its fate from reaching the
ears of the gallant Stuyvesant; but his exploit was
blown to the world when he least expected it, and
by one of the last beings he would ever have
suspected
of enlisting as trumpeter to the wide
mouthed
deity.
This was one Dirk Schuiler (or Skulker),
a kind of hanger on to the garrison; who seemed
to belong to no body, and in a manner to be self
outlawed
.
One of those vagabond Cosmopolites, who
shirk about the world, as if they had no right or
business in it, and who infest the skirts of
society
,
like poachers and interlopers. Every garrison
and country village has one or more scape goats of
this kind, whose life is a kind of enigma, whose
existence
is without motive, who comes from the
Lord knows where, who lives the Lord knows
how, and seems to be made for no other earthly
purpose but to keep up the antient and honourable
order of idlenessThis vagrant philosopher was
supposed to have some Indian blood in his veins,
I 2
which was manifested by a certain Indian
complexion
and cast of countenance; but more especially
by his propensities and habits. He was a tall, lank
fellow, swift of foot and long-winded. He was
generally equipped in a half Indian dress, with
belt, leggings, and moccasons. His hair hung in
straight gallows locks, about his ears, and added
not a little to his shirking demeanour. It is an old
remark, that persons of Indian mixture are half
civilized
,
half savage, and half devil, a third half
being
expressly provided for their particular
convenience
.
It is for similar reasons, and probably with
equal truth, that the back-wood-men of Kentucky
are styled half man, half horse and half alligator, by
the settlers on the Mississippi, and held
accordingly
in great respect and abhorrence.
The above character may have presented itself
to the garrison as applicable to Dirk Schuiler, whom
they familiarly dubbed Galgenbrok, or Gallows
Dirk. Certain it is, he appeared to acknowledge
allegiance to no onewas an utter enemy to work,
holding it in no manner of estimationbut lounged
about the fort, depending upon chance for a
subsistence
;
getting drunk whenever he could get
liquor
,
and stealing whatever he could lay his hands
on. Every day or two he was sure to get a sound
rib-roasting for some of his misdemeanours, which
however, as it broke no bones, he made very
light of, and scrupled not to repeat the offence,
whenever another opportunity presented.
Sometimes
in consequence of some flagrant villainy, he
would abscond from the garrison, and be absent for
a month at a time; skulking about the woods and
swamps, with a long fowling piece on his shoulder,
laying in ambush for gameor squatting himself
down on the edge of a pond catching fish for hours
together, and bearing no little resemblance to that
notable bird ycleped the Mud-poke. When he
thought his crimes had been forgotten or forgiven, he
would sneak back to the fort with a bundle of skins,
or a bunch of poultry which perchance he had stolen,
and exchange them for liquor, with which, having
well soaked his carcass, he would lay in the sun and
enjoy all the luxurious indolence of that swinish
philosopher
Diogenes. He was the terror of all the farm
yards in the country; into which he made fearful
inroads; and sometimes he would make his sudden
appearance at the garrison at day break, with the
whole neighbourhood at his heels; like a scoundrel
thief of a fox, detected in his maraudings and
hunted
to his hole. Such was this Dirk Schuiler; and
from the total indifference he shewed to the world
or its concerns, and from his true Indian stoicism
and taciturnity, no one would ever have dreamt,
that he would have been the publisher of the
treachery
of Risingh.
When the carousal was going on, which proved
so fatal to the brave Von Poffenburgh and his
watchful garrison, Dirk skulked about from room
to room, being a kind of privileged vagrant, or
useless
hound, whom nobody noticed. But though a
fellow of few words, yet like your taciturn people,
his eyes and ears were always open, and in the
course of his prowlings he overheard the whole plot
of the Swedes. Dirk immediately settled in his
own mind, how he should turn the matter to his
own advantage. He played the perfect
jack-of-both-sides
that
is to say, he made a prize of every
thing that came in his reach, robbed both parties,
stuck the copper bound cocked hat of the puissant
Von Poffenburgh, on his head, whipped a huge
pair of Risingh's jack boots under his arm, and
took to his heels, just before the denouement and
confusion at the garrison.
Finding himself completely dislodged from his
haunt in this quarter, he directed his flight towards
his native place, New Amsterdam, from whence
he had formerly been obliged to abscond
precipitately
,
in consequence of misfortune in business
in other words, having been detected in the act of
sheep stealing. After wandering many days in the
woods, toiling through swamps, fording brooks,
swimming various rivers, and encountering a world
of hardships that would have killed any other
being
,
but an Indian, a back-wood-man, or the devil,
he at length arrived, half famished, and lank as a
starved weazle at Communipaw, where he stole a
canoe and paddled over to New Amsterdam.
Immediately
on landing, he repaired to governor
Stuyvesant
,
and in more words than he had ever spoken
before, in the whole course of his life, gave an
account
of the disastrous affair.
On receiving these direful tidings the valiant
Peter started from his seat, as did the stout king
Arthur when at merry Carleile, the news was
brought him of the uncourteous misdeeds of the
grim baronewithout uttering a word, he dashed
the pipe he was smoking against the back of the
chimneythrust a prodigious quid of negro head
tobacco into his left cheekpulled up his
galligaskins
,
and strode up and down the room, humming,
as was customary with him, when in a passion a
most hideous north-west ditty. But, as I have
before
shewn, he was not a man to vent his spleen in
idle vapouring. His first measure after the paroxysm
of wrath had subsided, was to stump up stairs, to
a huge wooden chest, which served as his armoury,
from whence he drew forth that identical suit of
regimentals described in the preceding chapter. In
these portentous habiliments he arrayed himself,
like Achilles in the armour of Vulcan, maintaining
all the while a most appalling silence; knitting his
brows and drawing his breath through his clinched
teeth. Being hastily equipped, he thundered down
into the parlour like a second Magogjerked down
his trusty sword, from over the fire place, where it
was usually suspended; but before he girded it on
his thigh he drew it from its scabbard, and as his
eye coursed along the rusty blade, a grim smile
stole over his iron visageIt was the first smile
that had visited his countenance for five long weeks;
but every one who beheld it, prophesied that there
would soon be warm work in the province!
Thus armed at all points, with grizly war
depicted
in each feature; his very cocked hat
assuming
an air of uncommon defiance; he instantly put
himself on the alert, and dispatched Antony Van
Corlear hither and thither, this way and that way,
through all the muddy streets and crooked lanes of
the city: summoning by sound of trumpet his trusty
peers to assemble in instant council.This done,
by way of expediting matters, according to the
custom
of people in a hurry, he kept in continual bustle,
thrusting his bottom into every chair, popping his
head out of every window, and stumping up and
down stairs with his wooden leg in such brisk and
incessant motion, that, as I am informed by an
authentic
historian of the times, the continual clatter
bore no small resemblance to the music of a cooper,
hooping a flour barrel.
A summons so peremptory, and from a man of
the governor's mettle, was not to be trifled with:
the sages forthwith repaired to the council chamber,
where the gallant Stuyvesant entered in martial
style, and took his chair, like another Charlemagne,
among his Paladins. The councillors seated
themselves
with the utmost tranquillity, and lighting their
long pipes, gazed with unruffled composure on his
excellency and his regimentals; being, as all
councillors
should be, not easily flustered, or taken by
surprise. The governor, not giving them time to
recover from the astonishment they did not feel,
addressed them in a short, but soul stirring
harangue
.
I am extremely sorry, that I have not the
advantages
of Livy, Thucydides, Plutarch and others of my
predecessors, who were furnished as I am told, with
the speeches of all their great emperors, generals,
and orators, taken down in short hand, by the most
accurate stenographers of the time; whereby they
were enabled wonderfully to enrich their histories,
and delight their readers with sublime strains of
eloqence
.
Not having such important auxiliaries, I
cannot
possibly pronounce, what was the tenor of
governor
Stuyvesant's speech. Whether he with maiden
coyness hinted to his hearers that there was a speck
of war in the horison;that it would be necessary
to resort to the unprofitable trial of which could
do each other the most harm,or any other
delicate
construction of language, whereby the odious
subject of war, is handled so fastidiously and
modestly by modern statesmen; as a gentleman
volunteer handles his filthy salt-petre weapons with
gloves, lest he should soil his dainty fingers.
I am bold however to say, from the tenor of
Peter
Stuyvesant's character, that he did not wrap his
rugged subject in silks and ermines, and other
sickly
trickeries of phrase; but spoke forth, like a man
of nerve and vigour, who scorned to shrink in
words, from those dangers which he stood ready to
encounter in very deed. This much is certain, that
he concluded by announcing his determination of
leading on his troops in person, and routing these
costard-monger Swedes, from their usurped
quarters
at Fort Casimer. To this hardy resolution,
such of his council as were awake, gave their usual
signal of concurrence, and as to the rest, who had
fallen asleep about the middle of the harangue (their
usual custom in the afternoon)they made not
the least objection.
And now was seen in the fair city of New
Amsterdam
,
a prodigious bustle and preparation for
iron war. Recruiting parties marched hither and
thither, trailing long standards in the mud, with
which as at the present day the streets were
benevolently
covered, for the benefit of those unfortunate
wights who are aggrieved with corns. Thus did
they lustily call upon and invite all the scrubs, the
runagates and the tatterdemalions of the Manhattoes
and its vicinity, who had any ambition of six pence
a day, and immortal fame into the bargain, to
enlist
in the cause of glory. For I would have you
note that your warlike heroes who trudge in the
rear of conquerors, are generally of that illustrious
class of gentlemen, who are equal candidates for the
army or the bridewellthe halberts or the
whipping
postfor whom dame fortune has cast an even
die whether they shall make their exit by the sword
or the halterand whose deaths shall, at all events,
be a lofty example to their countrymen.
But notwithstanding all this martial rout and
invitation, the ranks of honour were but scantily
supplied; so averse were the peaceful burghers of
New Amsterdam to enlist in foreign broils, or stir
beyond that home, which rounded all their earthly
ideas. Upon beholding this, the great Peter whose
noble heart was all on fire with war and sweet
revenge
,
determined to wait no longer for the tardy
assistance of these oily citizens, but to muster up
his merry men of the Hudson; who, brought up
among woods and wilds and savage beasts, like our
yeomen of Kentucky, delighted in nothing so much
as desperate adventures and perilous expeditions
through the wilderness. Thus resolving, he
ordered
his trusty squire Antony Van Corlear to have his
state galley prepared and duly victualled; which
being
faithfully performed he attended public service
at the great church of St. Nicholas, like a true
and pious governor, and then leaving
peremptory
orders with his council to have the chivalry
of the Manhattoes marshalled out and
appointed
against his return, departed upon his recruiting
voyage, up the waters of the Hudson.
VOL. II. K
CHAP III.
Containing Peter Stuyvesant's voyage up the
Hudson
,
and the wonders and delights of that
renowned
river
.
Now did the soft breezes of the south, steal
sweetly over the beauteous face of nature, tempering
the panting heats of summer into genial and prolific
warmth: when that miracle of hardihood and
chivalric
virtue, the dauntless Peter Stuyvesant, spread
his canvass to the wind, and departed from the fair
island of Manna-hata. The galley in which he
embarked
was sumptuously adorned with pendants and
streamers of gorgeous dyes, which fluttered gaily
in the wind, or drooped their ends into the bosom of
the stream. The bow and poop of this majestic
vessel were gallantly bedight, after the rarest dutch
fashion, with naked figures of little pursy cupids
with periwigs on their heads, and bearing in their
hands garlands of flowers, the like of which are
not to be found in any book of botany; being the
matchless flowers which flourished in the golden
age, and exist no longer, unless it be in the
imaginations
of ingenious carvers of wood and discolourers
of canvass.
Thus rarely decorated, in style befitting the state
of the puissant potentate of the Manhattoes, did
the galley of Peter Stuyvesant launch forth upon the
bosom of the lordly Hudson; which as it rolled its
broad waves to the occan, seemed to pause for a
while, and swell with pride, as if conscious of the
illustrious burthen it sustained.
But trust me gentlefolk, far other was the scene
presented to the contemplation of the crew, from
that which may be witnessed at this degenerate day.
Wildness and savage majesty reigned on the
borders
of this mighty riverthe hand of cultivation
had not as yet laid low the dark forests, and tamed
the features of the landscapenor had the frequent
sail of commerce yet broken in upon the
profound
and awful solitude of ages. Here and there
might be seen a rude wigwam perched among the
cliffs of the mountains, with its curling column of
smoke mounting in the transparent atmosphere
but so loftily situated that the whoopings of the
savage
children, gambolling on the margin of the
dizzy heights, fell almost as faintly on the ear, as do
the notes of the lark, when lost in the azure vault
of heaven. Now and then from the beetling brow
of some rocky precipice, the wild deer would look
timidly down upon the splendid pageant as it passed
below; and then tossing his branching antlers in the
air, would bound away into the thickets of the
forest.
Through such scenes did the stately vessel of
Peter Stuyvesant pass. Now did they skirt the
bases of the rocky heights of Jersey, which spring
up like everlasting walls, reaching from the waves
unto the heavens; and were fashioned, if tradition
may be believed, in times long past, by the mighty
spirit Manetho, to protect his favourite abodes
from the unhallowed eyes of mortals. Now did
they career it gaily across the vast expanse of
Tappan bay, whose wide extended shores present
a vast variety of delectable sceneryhere the bold
promontory, crowned with embowering trees
advancing
into the baythere the long woodland
slope, sweeping up from the shore in rich luxuriance,
and terminating in the rude upland precipice
while at a distance a long waving line of rocky
heights, threw their gigantic shades across the
water. Now would they pass where some modest
little interval, opening among these stupendous
scenes, yet retreating as it were for protection into
the embraces of the neighbouring mountains,
displayed
a rural paradise, fraught with sweet and
pastoral
beauties; the velvet tufted lawnthe bushy
copsethe tinkling rivulet, stealing through the
fresh and vivid verdureon whose banks was
situated
some little Indian village, or peradventure,
the rude cabin of some solitary hunter.
The different periods of the revolving day
seemed each with cunning magic, to diffuse a
different
charm over the scene. Now would the
jovial sun break gloriously from the east, blazing
from the summits of the eastern hills and sparkling
the landscape with a thousand dewy gems; while
along the borders of the river were seen heavy
masses of mist, which like midnight caitiffs,
disturbed
at his approach, made a sluggish retreat,
rolling in sullen reluctance up the mountains. At
such times all was brightness and life and gaiety
the atmosphere seemed of an indescribable pureness
and transparencythe birds broke forth in wanton
madrigals, and the freshening breezes wafted the
vessel merrily on her course. But when the sun
sunk amid a flood of glory in the west, mantling
the heavens and the earth with a thousand
gorgeous
dyesthen all was calm and silent and
magnificent. The late swelling sail hung lifelessly
against the mastthe simple seaman with folded
arms leaned against the shrouds, lost in that
involuntary
musing which the sober grandeur of nature
commands in the rudest of her children. The vast
bosom of the Hudson was like an unruffled mirror,
reflecting the golden splendour of the heavens,
excepting that now and then a bark canoe would
steal across its surface, filled with painted savages,
whose gay feathers glared brightly, as perchance a
lingering ray of the setting sun, gleamed upon
them from the western mountains.
But when the fairy hour of twilight spread
its magic mists around, then did the face of nature
assume a thousand fugitive charms, which to the
K 2
worthy heart that seeks enjoyment in the glorious
works of its maker, are inexpressibly captivating.
The mellow dubious light that prevailed, just
served to tinge with illusive colours, the softened
features of the scenery. The deceived but
delighted
eye sought vainly to discern in the broad masses
of shade, the separating line between the land and
water; or to distinguish the fading objects that
seemed sinking into chaos. Now did the busy
fancy supply the feebleness of vision, producing
with industrious craft a fairy creation of her own.
Under her plastic wand the barren rocks frowned
upon the watery waste, in the semblance of lofty
towers and high embattled castlestrees assumed
the direful forms of mighty giants, and the
inaccessible
summits of the mountains seemed peopled
with a thousand shadowy beings.
Now broke forth from the shores the notes of
an innumerable variety of insects, who filled the
air with a strange but not inharmonious concert
while ever and anon was heard the melancholy
plaint of the Whip-poor-will, who, perched on
some lone tree, wearied the ear of night with his
incessant moanings. The mind, soothed into a
hallowed melancholy by the solemn mystery of the
scene, listened with pensive stillness to catch and
distinguish each sound, that vaguely echoed from
the shorenow and then startled perchance by the
whoop of some straggling savage, or the dreary
howl of some caitiff wolf, stealing forth upon his
nightly prowlings.
Thus happily did they pursue their course,
until they entered upon those awful defiles
denominated
THE HIGHLANDS, where it would seem
that the gigantic Titans had erst waged their
impious
war with heaven, piling up cliffs on cliffs, and
hurling vast masses of rock in wild confusion.
But in sooth very different is the history of these
cloud-capt mountains.These in ancient days,
before
the Hudson poured his waters from the lakes,
formed one vast prison, within whose rocky bosom
the omnipotent Manetho confined the rebellious
spirits who repined at his controul. Here, bound in
adamantine chains, or jammed in rifted pines, or
crushed by ponderous rocks, they groaned for many
an age.At length the lordly Hudson, in his
irresistible
career towards the ocean, burst open their
prison house, rolling his tide triumphantly through
its stupendous ruins.
Still however do many of them lurk about their
old abodes; and these it is, according to venerable
legends, that cause the echoes which resound
throughout these awful solitudes; which are
nothing but their angry clamours when any noise
disturbs the profoundness of their repose.But
when the elements are agitated by tempest, when
the winds are up and the thunder rolls, then
horrible
is the yelling and howling of these troubled
spiritsmaking the mountains to rebellow with
their hideous uproar; for at such times it is said,
they think the great Manetho is returning once
more to plunge them in gloomy caverns and renew
their intolerable captivity.
But all these fair and glorious scenes were lost
upon the gallant Stuyvesant; naught occupied his
active mind but thoughts of iron war, and proud
anticipations of hardy deeds of arms. Neither did
his honest crew trouble their vacant minds with
any romantic speculations of the kind. The pilot
at the helm quietly smoked his pipe, thinking of
nothing either past present or to comethose of
his comrades who were not industriously snoring
under the hatches, were listening with open mouths
to Antony Van Corlear; who, seated on the
windlass
,
was relating to them the marvellous history of
those myriads of fire flies, that sparkled like gems
and spangles upon the dusky robe of night. These,
according to tradition, were originally a race of
pestilent sempiternous beldames, who peopled these
parts long before the memory of man; being of
that abominated race emphatically called
brimstones
;
and who for their innumerable sins against
the children of men, and to furnish an awful
warning
to the beauteous sex, were doomed to infest the
earth in the shape of these threatening and terrible
little bugs; enduring the internal torments of that
fire, which they formerly carried in their hearts
and breathed forth in their words; but now are
sentenced to bear about foreverin their tails!
And now am I going to tell a fact, which I
doubt me much my readers will hesitate to believe;
but if they do, they are welcome not to believe a word
in this whole history, for nothing which it contains
is more true. It must be known then that the nose
of Antony the trumpeter was of a very lusty size,
strutting boldly from his countenance like a
mountain
of Golconda; being sumptuously bedecked
with rubies and other precious stonesthe true
regalia
of a king of good fellows, which jolly Bacchus
grants to all who bouse it heartily at the flaggon.
Now thus it happened, that bright and early in the
morning, the good Antony having washed his
burley
visage, was leaning over the quarter railing of
the galley, contemplating it in the glassy wave
below
Just
at this moment the illustrious sun,
breaking
in all his splendour from behind one of the high
bluffs of the Highlands, did dart one of his most
potent beams full upon the refulgent nose of the
sounder of brassthe reflection of which shot
straightway down, hissing hot, into the water, and
killed a mighty sturgeon that was sporting beside
the vessel! This huge monster being with infinite
labour hoisted on board, furnished a luxurious
repast
to all the crew, being accounted of excellent
flavour, excepting about the wound, where it
smacked
a little of brimstoneand this, on my veracity,
was the first time that ever sturgeon was eaten in
these parts, by christian people.
[9]
[9]
Domine Hans Megapolensis, treating of the country about
Albany in a letter which was written some time after the
settlement
thereof, says. There is in the river, great plenty of
Sturgeon
,
which we christians do not make use of; but the Indians
eate them greedilie.
When this astonishing miracle came to be made
known to Peter Stuyvesant, and that he tasted of
the unknown fish, he, as may well be supposed,
marvelled exceedingly; and as a monument
thereof
,
he gave the name of
Anthony's Nose
to a stout
promontory in the neighbourhoodand it has
continued
to be called Anthony's nose ever since that
time.
But holdWhether am I wandering?By the
mass, if I attempt to accompany the good Peter
Stuyvesant
on this voyage, I shall never make an end,
for never was there a voyage so fraught with
marvellous
incidents, nor a river so abounding with
transcendent beauties, worthy of being severally
recorded
.
Even now I have it on the point of my
pen to relate, how his crew were most horribly
frightened, on going on shore above the highlands,
by a gang of merry roystering devils, frisking and
curvetting on a huge flat rock, which projected into
the riverand which is called the
Duyvel's
Dans-Kamer
to this very dayBut no! Diedrich
Knickerbocker
it
becomes thee not to idle thus in thy
historic way-faring.
Recollect that while dwelling with the fond
garrullity
of age, over these fairy scenes, endeared to
thee, by the recollections of thy youth, and the charms
of a thousand legendary tales which beguiled the
simple ear of thy childhood; recollect that thou art
trifling with those fleeting moments which should
be devoted to loftier themes.Is not time
relentless
time!shaking with palsied hand, his almost
exhausted hour glass before thee?hasten then to
pursue thy weary task, lest the last sands be run,
ere thou hast finished thy renowned history of the
Manhattoes.
Let us then commit the dauntless Peter, his
brave galley and his loyal crew, to the protection of
the blessed St. Nicholas; who I have no doubt will
prosper him in his voyage, while we await his
return
at the great city of New Amsterdam.
CHAP. IV.
Describing the powerful army that assembled at the
city of New Amsterdamtogether with the
interview
between Peter the Headstrong, and
general
Von Poffenburgh, and Peter's sentiments
touching unfortunate great men
.
While
thus the enterprizing Peter was
coasting
,
with flowing sail up the shores of the lordly
Hudson, and arousing all the phlegmatic little dutch
settlements upon its borders, a great and puissant
concourse of warriors was assembling at the city of
New Amsterdam. And here that most invaluable
fragment of antiquity, the Stuyvesant manuscript,
is more than commonly particular; by which means
I am enabled to record the illustrious host that
encamped
themselves in the public square, in front
of the fort, at present denominated the Bowling
Green.
In the centre then, was pitched the tent of the
men of battle of the Manhattoes, who being the
inmates of the metropolis, composed the life guards
of the governor. These were commanded by the
valiant Stoffel Brinkerhoff, who whilome had
acquired
such immortal fame at Oyster Baythey
displayed as a standard, a mighty beaver
rampant
on a field of orange; being the arms of the pro
vince, and denoting the persevering industry, and
the amphibious origin of the valiant Nederlanders.
[10]
[10]
This was likewise the great seal of the New Netherlands, as
may still be seen in ancient records.
Then might be seen on their right hand, the
vassals of that renowned Mynheer, Michael Paw,
Besides what is mentioned by the Stuyvesant MS. I have found
mention made of this illustrious Patroon in another manuscript,
which says: De Heer (or the Squire) Michael Paw, a dutch
subject, about 10th Aug. 1630, by deed purchased Staten Island.
N. B. The same Michael Paw had what the dutch call a colonie
at Pavonia, on the Jersey shore opposite New York, and his
overseer
in 1636, was named Corns. Van Vorsta person of same
name in 1769, owned Pawles Hook, and a large farm at Pavonia,
and is a lineal descendant from Van Vorst.
who lorded it over the fair regions of ancient
Pavonia
,
and the lands away south, even unto the
Navesink
mountains,
So called from the Navesink tribe of Indians that inhabited
these partsat present they are erroneously denominated the
Neversink
,
or Neversunk mountains.
and was moreover patroon of
Gibbet Island. His standard was borne by his
trusty squire, Cornelius Van Vorst; consisting of
a huge oyster
recumbent
upon a sea-green field;
being the armorial bearings of his favourite
metropolis
,
Communipaw. He brought to the camp a
stout force of warriors, heavily armed, being each
clad in ten pair of linsey woolsey breeches, and
overshadowed by broad brimmed beavers, with
short pipes twisted in their hatbands. These were
the men who vegetated in the mud along the shores
VOL. II. L
of Pavonia; being of the race of genuine
copper-heads
,
and were fabled to have sprung from oysters.
At a little distance was encamped the tribe of
warriors who came from the neighbourhood of
Hell-gate. These were commanded by the Suy
Dams, and the Van Dams, most incontinent hard
swearers, as their names betokenthey were
terrible
looking fellows, clad in broad skirted gaberdines,
of that curious coloured cloth, called thunder and
lightningand bore as a standard three
Devil's-darning-needles
,
volant
, in a flame coloured field.
Hard by was the tent of the men of battle from
the marshy borders of the Wael-bogtig,
[11]
[11]
I. E. The
Winding Bay
, named from the winding of its
shores. This has since been corrupted by the vulgar into the
Wall
about
, and is the basin which shelters our infant navy.
and the
country thereaboutsthese were of a sour aspect,
by reason that they lived on crabs which abound in
these parts. They were the first institutors of that
honourable order of knighthood, called
Fly market
shirks
, and if tradition speak true, did likewise
introduce the far-famed step in dancing, called
double trouble. They were commanded by the
fearless Jacobus Varra Vanger, and had moreover
a jolly band of Brooklyn ferry-men, who performed
a brave concerto on conch shells.
But I refrain from pursuing this minute
description
,
which goes on to describe the warriors of
Bloemen dael, and Wee-hawk, and Hoboken, and
sundry other places, well known in history and song
for now does the sound of martial music alarm the
people of New Amsterdam, sounding afar from
beyond the walls of the city. But this alarm was
in a little while relieved, for lo, from the midst of
a vast cloud of dust, they recognized the brimstone
coloured breeches, and splendid silver leg of Peter
Stuyvesant, glaring in the sun beams; and beheld
him approaching at the head of a formidable army,
which he had mustered along the banks of the
Hudson
.
And here the excellent, but anonymous writer
of the Stuyvesant manuscript breaks out into a brave
and glorious description of the forces, as they
defiled
through the principal gate of the city, that
stood by the head of wall street.
First of all came the Van Bummels who inhabit
the pleasant borders of the BronxThese were
short fat men, wearing exceeding large trunk
breeches, and are renowned for feats of the
trencherthey were the first inventors of
Suppawn
or Mush and milkClose in their rear
marched the Van Vlotens of Kaats kill, most
horrible
quaffers of new cyder, and arrant braggarts in
their liquorAfter them came the famous Van
Pelts of Esopus, dextrous horsemen, mounted upon
goodly switch tailed steeds of the Esopus breed
these were mighty hunters of minks and musk rats,
whence came the word
Peltry
Then the Van
Nests of Kinderhook, valiant robbers of birds nests,
as their name denotes; to these if report may be
believed, are we indebted for the invention of slap
jacks, or buck-wheat cakes.Then the Van Grolls
of Anthony's Nose, who carried their liquor in
fair round little pottles, by reason they could not
bouse it out of their canteens, having such rare long
noses.Then the Gardeniers of Hudson and
thereabouts
,
distinguished by many triumphant feats, such
as robbing water melon patches, smoking rabbits
out of their holes and the like; and by being great
lovers of roasted pigs tails; these were the ancestors
of the renowned congress man of that name.Then
the Van Hoesens of Sing-Sing, great choristers and
players upon the jews harp; these marched two
and two, singing the great song of St. Nicholas.
Then the Counhovens, of Sleepy Hollow, these
gave birth to a jolly race of publicans, who first
discovered the magic artifice of conjuring a quart
of wine into a pint bottle.Then the Van
Courtlandts
who lived on the wild banks of the Croton,
and were great killers of wild ducks, being much
spoken of for their skill in shooting with the long
bow.Then the Bunschotens of Nyack and Kakiat
who were the first that did ever kick with the left
foot; they were gallant bush-whackers and hunters
of racoons by moon-light.Then the Van Winkles
of Haerlem, potent suckers of eggs, and noted for
running of horses and running up of scores at taverns;
they were the first that ever winked with both eyes
at once.Lastly came the
Knickerbockers
of the
great town of Scaghtikoke, where the folk lay stones
upon the houses in windy weather, lest they should
be blown away. These derive their name, as some
say, from
Knicker
to shake, and
Beker
a goblet,
indicating
thereby that they were sturdy toss pots of
yore; but in truth it was derived from
Knicker
to
nod, and
Boeken
books; plainly meaning that they
were great nodders or dozers over booksfrom
them did descend the writer of this History.
Such was the legion of sturdy bush beaters that
poured into the grand gate of New Amsterdam;
the Stuyvesant manuscript indeed speaks of many
more, whose names I omit to mention, seeing that
it behoves me to hasten to matters of greater
moment. Nothing could surpass the joy and
martial
pride of the lion hearted Peter as he reviewed
this mighty host of warriors, and he determined no
longer to defer the gratification of his much wished
for revenge, upon the scoundrel Swedes at Fort
Casimer.
But before I hasten on to record those
unmatchable
events, which will be found in the sequel
of this renowned history, let me pause to notice
the fate of Jacobus Von Poffenburgh, the
discomfited
commander in chief of the armies of the New
Netherlands. Such is the inherent uncharitableness
of human nature, that scarcely did the news become
public of his deplorable discomfiture at Fort
Casimer
;
L 2
than a thousand scurvey rumours were set afloat
in New Amsterdam, wherein it was insinuated,
that he had in reality a treacherous understanding
with the Swedish commander; that he had long
been in the practice of privately communicating with
the Swedes, together with divers hints about secret
service moneyTo all which deadly charges
I do not give a jot more creditthan I think they
deserve.
Certain it is, that the general vindicated his
character by the most vehement oaths and
protestations
,
and put every man out of the ranks of honour
who dared to doubt his integrity. Moreover on
returning to New Amsterdam, he paraded up and
down the streets with a crew of hard swearers at
his heelssturdy bottle companions, whom he
gorged and fattened, and who were ready to bolster
him through all the courts of justiceHeroes of
his own kidney, fierce whiskered, broad shouldered,
colbrand looking swaggerersnot one of whom but
looked as if he could eat up an ox, and pick his
teeth with the horns. These life guard men
quarreled
all his quarrels, were ready to fight all his
battles, and scowled at every man that turned up
his nose at the general, as though they would
devour
him alive. Their conversation was
interspersed
with oaths like minute guns, and every
bombastic rodomontade was rounded off by a
thundering
execration, like a patriotic toast honoured
with a discharge of artillery.
All these valorous vapourings had a considerable
effect in convincing certain profound sages, many of
whom began to think the general a hero of most
unutterable loftiness and magnanimity of soul,
particularly as he was continually protesting
on the
honour of a soldier
a marvelously high sounding
asserveration. Nay one of the members of the
council went so far as to propose they should
immortalize
him by an imperishable statue of plaster
of Paris!
But the vigilant Peter the Headstrong was not
thus to be deceivedSending privately for the
commander
in chief of all the armies, and having heard
all his story, garnished with the customary pious
oaths, protestations and ejaculationsHarkee,
Metgelsel
, cried he, though by your own account
you are the most brave, upright and honourable
man in the whole province, yet do you lie under
the misfortune of being most damnably traduced,
and immeasureably despised. Now though it is
certainly hard to punish a man for his misfortunes,
and though it is very possible you are totally
innocent
of the crimes laid to your charge, yet as heaven,
at present, doubtless for some wise purpose, sees
fit to withhold all proofs of your innocence, far be
it from me to counteract its sovereign will. Beside,
I cannot consent to venture my armies with a
commander
whom they despise, or to trust the welfare
of my people to a champion whom they distrust.
Retire therefore, my friend, from the irksome toils
and cares of public life, with this comforting
reflection
that
if you are guilty, you are but enjoying
your just rewardand if you are innocent, that you
are not the first great and good man, who has most
wrongfully been slandered and maltreated in this
wicked worlddoubtless to be better treated in a
better world, where there shall be neither error,
calumny nor persecution.In the mean time let
me never see your face again, for I have a horrible
antipathy to the countenances of unfortunate great
men like yourself.
CHAP. V.
In which the Author discourses very ingenuously
of himself.After which is to be found much
interesting history about Peter the Headstrong
and his followers
.
As my readers and myself, are about entering
on as many perils and difficulties, as ever a
confederacy
of meddlesome knights-errant wilfully
ran their heads into; it is meet that like those
hardy adventurers, we should join hands, bury all
differences, and swear to stand by one another, in
weal or woe, to the end of the enterprize. My
readers must doubtless perceive, how completely I
have altered my tone and deportment, since we
first set out together. I warrant they then thought
me a crabbed, cynical, impertinent little son of a
Dutchman; for I never gave them a civil word,
nor so much as touched my beaver, when I had
occasion
to address them. But as we jogged along
together, in the high-road of my history, I
gradually
began to relax, to grow more courteous, and
occasionally to enter into familiar discourse, until
at length I came to conceive a most social,
companionable
kind of regard for them. This is just
my wayI am always a little cold and reserved at
first, particularly to people about whom I neither
know nor care the value of a brass farthing or a
Vermont
bank note, and am only to be completely won
by long intimacy.
Besides; why should I have been sociable
to the host of how-d'ye-do acquaintances, who
flocked around me at my first appearance? They
were merely attracted by a new face; many of
them only stared me full in the title page, and
then walked off without saying a word; while
others lingered yawningly through the preface, and
having gratified their short-lived curiosity, soon
dropped off one by one.But more especially to
try their mettle, I had recourse to an expedient,
similar to one which we are told was used, by that
peerless flower of chivalry, king Arthur; who
before he admitted any knight to his intimacy, first
required that he should shew himself superior to
danger or hardships, by encountering unheard of
mishaps, slaying some dozen giants, vanquishing
wicked enchanters, not to say a word of dwarfs,
hyppogriffs and fiery dragons. On a similar
principle
I cunningly led my readers, at the first sally,
into two or three knotty chapters, where they were
most woefully belaboured and buffetted, by a host
of pagan philosophers and infidel writers. It did
my midriff good, by reason of the excessive
laughter
into which I was thrown at seeing the utter
confusion and dismay of my valiant cavalierssome
dropped down dead
(asleep)
on the field; others
threw down my book in the middle of the first
chapter, took to their heels, and never ceased
scampering until they had fairly run it out of sight;
when they stopped to take breath, to tell their
friends what troubles they had undergone, and to
warn all others from venturing on so thankless an
expedition. Every page thinned my ranks more
and more; and of the mighty host that first set
out, but a comparatively few made shift to survive,
in exceedingly battered condition, through the five
introductory chapters.
What then! would you have had me take such
sun shine, faint hearted recreants to my bosom, at
our first acquaintance? Nono. I reserved my
friendship for those who deserved it; for those who
undauntedly bore me company, in despite of
difficulties
,
dangers and fatigues. And now as to
those who adhere to me at present, I take them
affectionately
by the hand.Worthy and thrice
beloved
readers! brave and well tried comrades!
who have faithfully followed my footsteps through
all my wanderingsI salute you from my heart
I pledge myself to stand by you to the last; and to
conduct you, (so heaven speed this trusty weapon
which I now hold between my fingers,)
triumphantly
to the end of this our stupenduous
undertaking
.
But hark! while we are thus talking, the city
of New Amsterdam is in a constant bustle. The
gallant host of warriors encamped in the bowling
green are striking their tents; the brazen trumpet
of Antony Van Corlear makes the welkin to resound
with portentous clangourthe drums beatthe
standards of the Manhattoes, of Hell-gate and of
Michael Paw wave proudly in the air. And now
behold where the mariners are busily prepared,
hoisting the sails of yon top sail schooner, and those
two clump built Albany sloops, which are to waft
the army of the Nederlanders to gather immortal
laurels on the Delaware!
The entire population of the city, man woman and
child, turned out to behold the chivalry of New
Amsterdam
,
as it paraded the streets previous to
embarkation
.
Many a dirty pocket handkerchief was
waved out of the windows; many a fair nose was
blown in melodious sorrow, on the mournful
occasion
.
The grief of the fair dames and beauteous
damsels of Grenada, could not have been more
vociferous
on the banishment of the gallant tribe of
Abencerrages, than was that of the kind hearted
Yfrouws
of New Amsterdam, on the departure of
their intrepid warriors. Every love sick maiden
fondly crammed the pockets of her hero with
gingerbread
and dough-nutsmany a copper ring was
exchanged
and crooked sixpence broken, in pledge of
eternal constancyand there remain extant to this
day, some love verses written on that occasion,
sufficiently
crabbed and incomprehensible to confound
the whole universe.
But it was a moving sight to see the buxom
lasses, how they hung about the doughty Antony
Van Corlearfor he was a jolly, rosy faced, lusty
bachelor, and withal a great royster, fond of his
joke and a desperate rogue among the women. Fain
would they have kept him to comfort them while
the army was away; for besides what I have said
of him, it is no more than justice to add, that he was
a kind hearted soul, noted for his benevolent
attentions
in comforting disconsolate wives during the
absence of their husbandsand this made him to
be very much regarded by the honest burghers of
the city. But nothing could keep the valiant
Antony
from following the heels of the old governor,
whom he loved as he did his very soulso embracing
all the young vrouws and giving every one of them
that had good teeth and a clean mouth, a dozen
hearty smackshe departed loaded with their kind
wishes.
Nor was the departure of the gallant Peter
among the least causes of public distress. Though
the old governor was by no means indulgent to the
follies and waywardness of his subjects; and had
turned over a complete new leaf, from that which
was presented in the days of William the Testy,
yet some how or another he had become strangely
popular among the people. There is something so
VOL. II. M
captivating in personal bravery, that, with the
common
mass of mankind, it takes the lead of most
other merits. The simple folk of New
Amsterdam
looked upon Peter Stuyvesant, as a prodigy
of valour. His wooden leg, that trophy of his
martial
encounters, was regarded with reverence and
admiration. Every old burgher had a budget of
miraculous stories to tell about the exploits of
Hard-koppig
Piet, wherewith he regaled his children,
of a long winter night, and on which he dwelt with
as much delight and exaggeration, as do our honest
country yeomen on the hardy adventures of old
general
Putnam (or as he is familiarly termed
Old
Put
,) during our glorious revolutionNot an
individual
but verily believed the old governor was a
match for Belzebub himself; and there was even
a story told with great mystery, and under the rose,
of his having shot the devil with a silver bullet one
dark stormy night, as he was sailing in a canoe
through Hell-gateBut this I do not record as being
an absolute factperish the man, who would let
fall a drop that should discolour the pure stream of
history!
Certain it is, not an old woman in New
Amsterdam
,
but considered Peter Stuyvesant as a tower of
strength, and rested satisfied, that the public
welfare
was secure as long as he was in the city. It
is not surprising then that they looked upon his
departure
as a sore affliction. With heavy hearts
they draggled at the heels of his troop, as they
marched down to the river side to embark. The
governor from the stern of his schooner, gave a
short, but truly patriarchal address to his
citizens
;
wherein he recommended them to comport
like loyal and peaceful subjectsto go to church
regularly on sundays, and to mind their business
all the week besidesThat the women should be
dutiful and affectionate to their husbandslooking
after no bodies concerns but their own: eschewing
all gossippings, and morning gaddingsand
carrying
short tongues and long petticoats. That the
men should abstain from ward meetings and porter
houses, entrusting the cares of government to
the officers appointed to support themstaying
home, like good citizens, making money for
themselves
,
and getting children for the benefit of their
country. That the burgomasters should look well
to the public interestnot oppressing the poor, nor
indulging the richnot tasking their sagacity to
devise new laws, but faithfully enforcing those
which were already maderather bending their
attention
to prevent evil than to punish it; ever
recollecting
that civil magistrates should consider
themselves more as guardians of public morals,
than rat catchers employed to entrap public
delinquents
.
Finally, he exhorted them, one and all,
high and low, rich and poor, to conduct themselves
as well as they could;
assuring them that if they
faithfully and conscientiously complied with this
golden rule there was no danger but that they
would all conduct themselves well enough.This
done he gave them a paternal benediction; the
sturdy Antony sounded a most loving farewell
with his trumpet, the jolly crews put up a lusty
shout of triumph, and the invincible armada swept
off proudly down the bay.
The good people of New Amsterdam
crowded
down to the Batterythat blest resort, from
whence so many a tender prayer has been wafted,
so many a fair hand waved, so many a tearful look
been cast by lovesick damsel, after the lessening
bark, which bore her adventurous swain to
distant
climes!Here the populace watched with
straining eyes the gallant squadron, as it slowly
floated down the bay, and when the intervening
land at the Narrows shut it from their sight,
gradually dispersed with silent tongues and
downcast
countenances.
A heavy gloom hung over the late bustling
cityThe honest burghers smoked their pipes in
profound thoughtfulness, casting many a wistful
look to the weather cock, on the church of St.
Nicholas
,
and all the old women, having no longer
the presence of Hard-koppig Piet to hearten them,
gathered their children home, and barricadoed
the doors and windows every evening at sun down.
In the mean while the armada of the sturdy
Peter proceeded prosperously on its voyage, and
after encountering about as many storms and water
spouts and whales and other horrors and
phenomena
,
as generally befall adventurous landsmen,
in perilous voyages of the kind; after undergoing
a severe scouring from that deplorable and unpitied
malady called sea sickness; and suffering from a
little touch of constipation or dispepsy, which was
cured by a box of Anderson's pills, the whole
squadron arrived safely in the Delaware.
Without so much as dropping anchor and
giving his wearied ships time to breathe after
labouring
so long in the ocean, the intrepid Peter
pursued his course up the Delaware, and made a
sudden appearance before Fort Casimer. Having
summoned the astonished garrison by a terrific
blast from the trumpet of the long winded Van
Corlear, he demanded, in a tone of thunder, an
instant
surrender of the fort. To this demand Suen
Scutz, the wind dried commandant, replied in a
shrill, whiffling voice, which by reason of his
extreme
spareness, sounded like the wind whistling
through a broken bellowsthat he had no very
strong reasons for refusing, except that the demand
was particularly disagreeable, as he had been
ordered
to maintain his post to the last extremity. He
requested time therefore, to consult with governor
Risingh, and proposed a truce for that purpose
M 2
The choleric Peter, indignant at having his
rightful fort so treacherously taken from him, and
thus pertinaceously withheld; refused the
proposed
armistice, and swore by the pipe of St. Nicholas,
which like the sacred fire was never extinguished,
that unless the fort was surrendered in ten minutes,
he would incontinently storm the works, make all
the garrison run the gauntlet, and split their
scoundrel
of a commander, like a pickled shad. To give
this menace the greater effect, he drew forth his
trusty sword, and shook it at them with such a
fierce and vigorous motion, that doubtless, if it had
not been exceedingly rusty, it would have
lightened
terror into the eyes and hearts of the enemy.
He then ordered his men to bring a broadside to
bear upon the fort, consisting of two swivels, three
muskets, a long duck fowling piece and two brace
of horse pistols.
In the mean time the sturdy Van Corlear
marshalled all his forces, and commenced his
warlike
operations.Distending his cheeks like a very
Boreas, he kept up a most horrific twanging of his
trumpetthe lusty choristers of Sing-Sing broke
forth into a hideous song of battlethe warriors of
Brooklyn and the Wael bogtig blew a potent and
astounding blast on their conch shells, all together
forming as outrageous a concerto, as though five
thousand French orchestras were displaying their
skill in a modern overtureat the hearing of
which I warrant me not a Swede in the fortress
but felt himself literally distilling away, with pure
affright and bad music.
Whether the formidable front of war thus
suddenly
presented, smote the garrison with sore
dismay
or
whether tbe concluding terms of the
summons
,
which mentioned that he should surrender
at discretion
, were mistaken by Suen Scutz, who
though a Swede, was a very considerate easy
tempered
manas a compliment to his discretion, I will
not take upon me to say; certain it is, he found it
impossible to resist so courteous a demand.
Accordingly
,
in the very nick of time, just as the cabin
boy had gone after a coal of fire, to discharge the
swivels, a chamade was beat on the rampart, by the
only drum in the garrison, to the no small
satisfaction
of both parties; who, notwithstanding their
great stomach for fighting, had full as good an
inclination
,
to cat a quiet dinner, as to exchange black
eyes and bloody noses.
Thus did this impregnable fortress, once more
return to the domination of their high mightinesses;
Scutz, and his garrison of twenty men, were allowed
to march out with the honours of war, and the
victorious
Peter, who was as generous as brave,
permitted
them to keep possession of all their arms and
ammunitionthe same on inspection being found
totally unfit for service, having long rusted in the
magazine
of the fortress, even before it was wrested by
the Swedes from the magnanimous, but windy Von
Poffenburgh. But I must not omit to mention, that
the governor was so well pleased with the services
of his faithful squire Van Corlear, in the reduction
of this great fortress, that he made him on the spot,
lord of a goodly domain in the vicinity of New
Amsterdam
which
goes by the name of Corlear's
Hook, unto this very day.
[12]
[12]
De Vriez, makes mention in one of his voyages of
Corlears
Hoek
, and
Corlears Plantagie
, or
Bouwery;
and that too, at an earlier
date than the one given by Mr. KnickerbockerDe Vriez, is no
doubt a little incorrect in this particular.
Editor
.
The unexampled liberality of the valiant
Stuyvesant
,
towards the Swedes, who certainly had used
his government very scurvilyoccasioned great,
surprize in the city of New Amsterdamnay,
certain
of those factious individuals, who had been
enlightened by the political meetings, that prevailed
during the days of William the Testybut who
had not dared to indulge their meddlesome
habits
,
under the eye of their present ruler; now
emboldened by his absence, dared even to give
vent to their censures in the streetsMurmurs,
equally loud with those uttered by that nation of
genuine grumblers, the British, in consequence of
the convention of Portugal; were heard in the very
council chamber of New Amsterdam; and there
is no knowing whether they would not have broken
out into downright speeches and invectives, had
not the sturdy Peter, privately sent home his
walking
staff, to be laid as a mace, on the table of the
council chamber, in the midst of his councillors;
who, like wise men took the hint, and forever after
held their peace.
CHAP. VI.
In which is shewn the great advantage the Author
has over his reader in time of battletogether
with divers portentous movementswhich
betoken
that something terrible is about to happen
.
Strike
while the Iron is hot, was a favourite
saying of Peter the Great, while an apprentice in a
blacksmith's shop, at Amsterdam. It is one of
those proverbial sayings, which speak a word to
the ear, but a volume to the understandingand
contain a world of wisdom, condensed within a
narrow compassThus every art and profession
has thrown a gem of the kind, into the public stock,
enriching society by some sage maxim and pithy
apothegm drawn from its own experience; in which
is conveyed, not only the arcana of that individual
art or profession, but also the important secret of a
prosperous and happy life. Cut your coat
according
to your cloth, says the taylorStick to
your last, cries the coblerMake hay while the
sun shines, says the farmerPrevention is
better
than cure, hints the physicianSurely a man
has but to travel through the world, with open ears,
and by the time he is grey, he will have all the
wisdom of Solomonand then he has nothing to
do but to grow young again, and turn it to the best
advantage.
Strike while the Iron is hot, was not more
invariably the saying of Peter the great, than it was
the practice of Peter the Headstrong. Like as a
mighty alderman, when at a corporation feast the
first spoonful of turtle soup salutes his palate, feels
his impatient appetite but ten fold quickened, and
redoubles his vigorous attacks upon the tureen,
while his voracious eyes, projecting from his head,
roll greedily round devouring every thing at table
so did the mettlesome Peter Stuyvesant, feel that
intolerable hunger for martial glory, which raged
within his very bowels, inflamed by the capture of
Fort Casimer, and nothing could allay it, but the
conquest of all New Sweden. No sooner therefore
had he secured his conquest, than he stumped
resolutely
on, flushed with success, to gather fresh
laurels at Fort Christina.
[13]
[13]
The formidable fortress and metropolis to which Mr.
Knickerbocker
alludes, is at present a flourishing little town called
Christiana
,
about thirty seven miles from Philadelphia, on your route to
Baltimore.
Editor
.
This was the grand Swedish post, established
on a small river (or as it is termed, creek,) of the
same name, which empties into the Delaware; and
here that crafty governor Jan Risingh, like another
Charles the twelfth, commanded his subjects in
person.
Thus have I fairly pitted two of the most
potent chieftans that ever this country beheld,
against each other, and what will be the result of
their contest, I am equally anxious with my readers
to ascertain. This will doubtless appear a paradox
to such of them, as do not know the way in
which I write. The fact is, that as I am not
engaged
in a work of imagination, but a faithful and
veritable history, it is not necessary, that I should
trouble my head, by anticipating its incidents and
catastrophe. On the contrary, I generally make it
a rule, not to examine the annals of the times
whereof I treat, further than exactly a page in
advance
of my own work; hence I am equally
interested
in the progress of my history, with him who
reads it, and equally unconscious, what occurrence
is next to happen. Darkness and doubt hang over
each coming chapterwith trembling pen and
anxious
mind I conduct my beloved native city through
the dangers and difficulties, with which it is
continually
surrounded; and in treating of my favourite
hero, the gallant Peter Stuyvesant, I often shrink
back with dismay, as I turn another page, lest I
should find his undaunted spirit hurrying him into
some dolorous misadventure.
Thus am I situated at present. I have just
conducted him into the very teeth of perilnor can
I tell, any more than my reader, what will be the
issue of this horrid din of arms, with which our
ears are mutually assailed. It is true, I possess
one advantage over my reader, which tends
marvelously
to soothe my apprehensionswhich is, that
though I cannot save the life of my favourite hero,
nor absolutely contradict the event of a battle, (both
of which misrepresentations, though much
practised
by the French writers, of the present reign, I
hold to be utterly unworthy of a scrupulous
historian
)
yet I can now and then make him bestow
on his enemy a sturdy back stroke, sufficient to fell
a giant; though in honest truth he may never have
done any thing of the kindor I can drive his
antagonist clear round and round the field, as did
Dan Homer most falsely make that fine fellow
Hector scamper like a poltroon around the walls of
Troy; for which in my humble opinion the prince
of Poets, deserved to have his head brokenas no
doubt he would, had those terrible fellows the
Edinburgh reviewers, existed in those daysor if
my hero should be pushed too hard by his opponent,
I can just step in, and with one dash of my pen,
give him a hearty thwack over the sconce, that would
have cracked the scull of Hercules himselflike a
faithful second in boxing, who when he sees his
principal down, and likely to be worsted, puts in a
sly blow, that knocks the wind out of his adversary,
and changes the whole state of the contest.
I am aware that many conscientious readers
will be ready to cry out foul play! whenever I
VOL. II. N
render such assistancebut I insist that it is one
of those little privileges, strenuously asserted and
exercised by historiographers of all agesand one
which has never been disputed. An historian, in
fact, is in some measure bound in honour to stand
by his herothe fame of the latter is entrusted to
his hands, and it is his duty to do the best by it he
can. Never was there a general, an admiral or
any other commander, who in giving an account of
any battle he had fought, did not sorely belabour
the enemy; and I have no doubt that, had my
heroes written the history of their own
atchievements
,
they would have hit much harder blows,
than any I shall recount. Standing forth therefore,
as the guardian of their fame, it behoves me to do
them the same justice, they would have done
themselves
;
and if I happen to be a little hard upon the
Swedes, I give free leave to any of their descendants,
who may write a history of the state of Delaware,
to take fair retaliation, and thump Peter
Stuyvesant
as hard as they please.
Therefore stand by for broken heads and bloody
noses! my pen has long itched for a battlesiege
after siege have I carried on, without blows or
bloodshed
;
but now I have at length got a chance, and
I vow to heaven and St. Nicholas, that, let the
chronicles of the times say what they please, neither
Sallust, Livy, Tacitus, Polybius, or any other
battle
monger of them all, did ever record a fiercer
fight, than that in which my valiant chieftans are
now about to engage.
And thou, most excellent reader, who, for thy
faithful adherence to my heels, I could lodge in the
best parlour of my heartbe not uneasytrust the
fate of our favourite Stuyvesant to mefor by the
rood, come what will, I'll stick by Hard-koppig
Piet to the last; I'll make him drive about these
lossels vile as did the renowned Launcelot of the
lake, a herd of recreant cornish Knightsand if he
does fall, let me never draw my pen to fight another
battle, in behalf of a brave man, if I don't make
these lubberly Swedes pay for it!
No sooner had Peter Stuyvesant arrived before
fort Christina than he proceeded without delay to
entrench himself, and immediately on running his
first parallel, dispatched Antony Van Corlear, that
incomparable trumpeter, to summon the fortress to
surrender. Van Corlear was received with all due
formality, hoodwinked at the portal, and conducted
through a pestiferous smell of salt fish and onions,
to the citadel, a substantial hut built of pine logs.
His eyes were here uncovered, and he found
himself
in the august presence of governor Risingh,
who, having been accidentally likened to Charles
XII, the intelligent reader will instantly perceive,
must have been a tall, robustious, able bodied, mean
looking man, clad in a coarse blue coat with brass
buttons, a shirt which for a week, had longed in vain
for the wash-tub, a pair of foxey coloured jack
bootsand engaged in the act of shaving his grizly
beard, at a bit of broken looking glass, with a
villainous
patent Brummagem razor. Antony Van
Corlear delivered in a few words, being a kind of
short hand speaker, a long message from his
excellency
,
recounting the whole history of the province,
with a recapitulation of grievances, enumeration of
claims, &c.&c. and concluding with a peremptory
demand
of instant surrender: which done, he turned
aside, took his nose between his thumb and finger,
and blew a tremendous blast, not unlike the flourish
of a trumpet of defiancewhich it had doubtless
learned from a long and intimate neighbourhood
with that melodious instrument.
Governor Risingh heard him through, trumpet
and all, but with infinite impatience; leaning at
times, as was his usual custom, on the pommel of
his sword, and at times twirling a huge steel watch
chain or snapping his fingers. Van Corlear having
finished he bluntly replied, that Peter Stuyvesant
and his summons might go to the Dl, whither
he hoped to send him and his crew of raggamuffins
before supper time. Then unsheathing his brass
hilted sword, and throwing away the scabbard
Fore gad, quod he, but I will not sheathe thee
again, until I make a scabbard of the smoke dried
leathern hide, of this runegate Dutchman. Then
having flung a fierce defiance in the teeth of his
adversary, by the lips of his messenger, the latter
was reconducted to the portal, with all the
ceremonious
civility due to the trumpeter, squire and
ambassador of so great a commander, and being
again unblinded, was courteously dismissed with a
tweak of the nose, to assist him in recollecting his
message.
No sooner did the gallant Peter receive this
insolent reply, than he let fly a tremendous volley
of red hot, four and forty pounder execrations,
that would infallibly have battered down the
fortifications
and blown up the powder magazines, about
the ears of the fiery Swede, had not the ramparts
been remarkably strong, and the magazine bomb
proof. Perceiving that the works withstood this
terrific blast, and that it was utterly impossible (as
it really was in those unphilosophic days) to carry
on a war with words, he ordered his merry men all,
to prepare for immediate assault. But here a
strange murmur broke out among his troops,
beginning
with the tribe of the Van Bummels, those
valiant trencher men of the Bronx, and spreading
from man to man, accompanied with certain
mutinous
looks and discontented murmurs. For once
in his life, and only for once, did the great Peter
turn pale, for he verily thought his warriors were
going to faulter in this hour of perilous trial, and
thus tarnish forever the fame of the province of
New Nederlands.
N 2
But soon did he discover to his great joy, that
in this suspicion he deeply wronged this most
undaunted
army; for the cause of this agitation and
uneasiness simply was, that the hour of dinner was
at hand, and it would have almost broken the hearts
of these regular dutch warriors, to have broken in
upon the invariable routine of their habits. Beside
it was an established rule among our valiant
ancestors
,
always to fight upon a full stomach, and to this
may be doubtless attributed the circumstance that
they came to be so renowned in arms.
And now are the hearty men of the Manhattoes,
and their no less hearty comrades, all lustily engaged
under the trees, buffeting stoutly with the contents of
their wallets, and taking such affectionate embraces
of their canteens and pottles, as though they verily
believed they were to be the last. And as I foresee
we shall have hot work in a page or two, I advise
my readers to do the same, for which purpose I
will bring this chapter to a close; giving them my
word of honour that no advantage shall be taken
of this armistice, to surprise, or in any wise
molest, the honest Nederlanders, while at their
vigorous
repast.
Before we part however, I have one small
favour to ask of them; which is, that when I have
set both armies by the cars in the next chapter, and
am hurrying about, like a very devil, in the midst
they will just stand a little on one side, out of harms
wayand on no account attempt to interrupt me
by a single question or remonstrance. As the
whole spirit, hurry and sublimity of the battle will
depend on my exertions, the moment I should stop
to speak, the whole business would stand still
wherefore I shall not be able to say a word to my
readers, throughout the whole of the next chapter,
but I promise them in the one after, I'll listen to
all they have to say, and answer any questions they
may ask.
CHAP. VII.
Containing the most horrible battle ever recorded in
poetry or prose; with the admirable exploits of
Peter the Headstrong
.
Now had the Dutchmen snatch'd a huge
repast
,
and finding themselves wonderfully
encouraged
and animated thereby, prepared to take the
field. Expectation, says a faithful matter of fact
dutch poet, whose works were unfortunately
destroyed
in the conflagration of the Alexandrian
libraryExpectation now stood on stilts. The
world forgot to turn round, or rather stood still, that
it might witness the affray; like a fat round bellied
alderman, watching the combat of two chivalric
flies upon his jerkin. The eyes of all mankind, as
usual in such cases, were turned upon Fort
Christina
.
The sun, like a little man in a crowd, at a
puppet shew, scampered about the heavens, popping
his head here and there, and endeavouring to get a
peep between the unmannerly clouds, that obtruded
themselves in his way. The historians filled their
inkhorns
the
poets went without their dinners, either
that they might buy paper and goose-quills, or
because
they could not get any thing to eatantiquity
scowled sulkily out of its grave, to see itself
outdone
while
even posterity stood mute, gazing in
gaping extacy of retrospection, on the eventful field!
The immortal deities, who whilome had seen
service at the affair of Troynow mounted
their feather-bed clouds, and sailed over the plain,
or mingled among the combatants in different
disguises
,
all itching to have a finger in the pie.
Jupiter
sent off his thunderbolt to a noted
coppersmiths
,
to have it furbished up for the direful
occasion. Venus, swore by her chastity she'd
patronize
the Swedes, and in semblance of a blear
eyed trull, paraded the battlements of Fort
Christina
,
accompanied by Diana, as a serjeant's widow,
of cracked reputationThe noted bully Mars, stuck
two horse pistols into his belt, shouldered a rusty
firelock, and gallantly swaggered at their elbow, as
a drunken corporalwhile Apollo trudged in their
rear, as a bandy-legged fifer, playing most
villainously
out of tune.
On the other side, the ox-eyed Juno, who had
won a pair of black eyes over night, in one of her
curtain lectures with old Jupiter, displayed her
haughty beauties on a baggage waggonMinerva,
as a brawny gin suttler, tucked up her skirts,
brandished
her fists, and swore most heroically, in
exceeding
bad dutch, (having but lately studied the
language) by way of keeping up the spirits of the
soldiers; while Vulcan halted as a club-footed
blacksmith
,
lately promoted to be a captain of militia.
All was silent horror, or bustling preparation; war
reared his horrid front, gnashed loud his iron fangs,
and shook his direful crest of bristling bayonets.
And now the mighty chieftans marshalled out
their hosts. Here stood stout Risingh, firm as a
thousand rocksencrusted with stockades, and
entrenched
to the chin in mud batteriesHis artillery
consisting of two swivels and a carronade, loaded
to the muzzle, the touch holes primed, and a
whiskerd bombardier stationed at each, with lighted
match in hand, waiting the word. His valiant
infantry
,
that had never turned back upon an enemy
(having never seen any before)lined the breast
work in grim array, each having his mustachios
fiercely greased, and his hair pomatomed back, and
queued so stiffly, that he grinned above the
ramparts
like a grizly death's head.
There came on the intrepid Hard-koppig Piet,
a second Bayard, without fear or reproachhis
brows knit, his teeth clenched, his breath held hard,
rushing on like ten thousand bellowing bulls of
Bashan. His faithful squire Van Corlear,
trudging
valiantly at his heels, with his trumpet
gorgeously
bedecked with red and yellow ribbands, the
remembrances of his fair mistresses at the
Manhattoes
.
Then came waddling on his sturdy
comrades
,
swarming like the myrmidons of Achilles.
There were the Van Wycks and the Van Dycks
and the Ten Eycksthe Van Nesses the Van
Tassels, the Van Grolls; the Van Hsens, the
Van Giesons, and the Van BlarcomsThe Van
Warts, the Van Winkles, the Van Dams; the Van
Pelts, the Van Rippers, and the Van Brunts.
There were the Van Horns, the Van Borsums,
the Van Bunschotens; the Van Gelders, the Van
Arsdales
,
and the Van BummelsThe Vander Belts,
the Vander Hoofs, the Vander Voorts, the Vander
Lyns, the Vander Pools and the Vander Spiegels.
There came the Hoffmans, the Hooglands, the
Hoppers, the Cloppers, the Oothouts, the
Quackenbosses
,
the Roerbacks, the Garrebrantzs the
Onderdonks
the Varra Vangers, the Schermerhorns,
the Brinkerhoffs, the Bontecous, the
Knickerbockers
,
the Hockstrassers, the Ten Breecheses and
the Tough Breecheses, with a host more of valiant
worthies, whose names are too crabbed to be
written
,
or if they could be written, it would be
impossible
for man to utterall fortified with a mighty
dinner, and to use the words of a great Dutch poet
Brimful of wrath and cabbage!
For an instant the mighty Peter paused in the
midst of his career, and mounting on a rotten
stump addressed his troops in eloquent low dutch,
exhorting them to fight like
duyvels
, and assuring
them that if they conquered, they should get plenty
of bootyif they fell they should be allowed the
unparalleled satisfaction, while dying, of reflecting
that it was in the service of their countryand
after they were dead, of seeing their names
inscribed
in the temple of renown and handed down, in
company with all the other great men of the year,
for the admiration of posterity.Finally he swore
to them, on the word of a governor (and they
knew him too well to doubt it for a moment) that
if he caught any mother's son of them looking
pale, or playing craven, he'd curry his hide till he
made him run out of it like a snake in spring time.
Then lugging out his direful snickersnee, he
brandished
it three times over his head, ordered Van
Corlear to sound a tremendous charge, and
shouting
the word St. Nicholas and the Manhattoes!
courageously dashed forwards. His warlike
followers
,
who had employed the interval in lighting
their pipes, instantly stuck them in their mouths,
gave a furious puff, and charged gallantly, under
cover of the smoke.
The Swedish garrison, ordered by the cunning
Risingh not to fire until they could distinguish the
whites of their assailants' eyes, stood in horrid
silence on the covert-way; until the eager
dutchmen
had half ascended the glacis. Then did they
pour into them such a tremendous volley, that the
very hills quaked around, and were terrified even
unto an incontinence of water, insomuch that
certain
springs burst forth from their sides, which
continue to run unto the present day. Not a
dutchman but would have bit the dust, beneath that
dreadful fire, had not the protecting Minerva
kindly
taken care, that the Swedes should one and all,
observe their usual custom of shutting their eyes
and turning away their heads, at the moment of
discharge.
But were not the muskets levelled in vain, for
the balls, winged with unerring fate, went point
blank into a flock of wild geese, which, like geese
as they were, happened at that moment to be flying
past and brought down seventy dozen of them
which furnished a luxurious supper to the
conquerors
,
being well seasoned and stuffed with onions.
Neither was the volley useless to the
musqueteers
,
for the hostile wind, commissioned by the
implacable
Juno, carried the smoke and dust full in
the faces of the dutchmen, and would inevitably
have blinded them, had their eyes been open. The
Swedes followed up their fire, by leaping the
counterscarp
,
and falling tooth and nail upon the foe,
with furious outcries. And now might be seen
prodigies of valour, of which neither history nor
song have ever recorded a parallel. Here was
beheld
the sturdy Stoffel Brinkerhoff brandishing his
lusty quarter staff, like the terrible giant Blanderon
his oak tree (for he scorned to carry any other
weapon
,)
and drumming a horrific tune upon the heads of
whole squadrons of Swedes. There were the crafty
VOL. II. O
Van Courtlandts, posted at a distance, like the
little
Locrian archers of yore, and plying it most
potently
with the long bow, for which they were so
justly renowned. At another place were collected
on a rising knoll the valiant men of Sing-Sing, who
assisted marvellously in the fight, by chaunting forth
the great song of St. Nicholas. In a different part
of the field might be seen the Van Grolls of
Anthony's
nose; but they were horribly perplexed in
a defile between two little hills, by reason of the
length of their noses. There were the Van
Bunschotens
of Nyack and Kakiat, so renowned for kicking
with the left foot, but their skill availed them little
at present, being short of wind in consequence of
the hearty dinner they had eatenand they would
irretrievably have been put to rout, had they not
been reinforced by a gallant corps of
Voltigeurs
composed
of the Hoppers, who advanced to their
assistance
nimbly on one foot. At another place might
you see the Van Arsdales, and the Van Bummels,
who ever went together, gallantly pressing forward
to bombard the fortressbut as to the Gardeniers
of Hudson, they were absent from the battle,
having
been sent on a marauding party, to lay waste
the neighbouring water-melon patches. Nor must
I omit to mention the incomparable atchievement
of Antony Van Corlear, who, for a good quarter of
an hour waged horrid fight with a little pursy
Swedish drummer, whose hide he drummed most
magnificently; and had he not come into the battle
with no other weapon but his trumpet, would
infallibly
have put him to an untimely end.
But now the combat thickenedon came the
mighty Jacobus Varra Vanger and the fighting men
of the Wael Bogtig; after them thundered the Van
Pelts of Esopus, together with the Van Rippers and
the Van Brunts, bearing down all before them
then the Suy Dams and the Van Dams, pressing
forward with many a blustering oath, at the head
of the warriors of Hell-gate, clad in their thunder
and lighting gaberdines; and lastly the standard
bearers and body guards of Peter Stuyvesant,
bearing
the great beaver of the Manhattoes.
And now commenced the horrid din, the desperate
struggle, the maddening ferocity, the frantic
desperation
,
the confusion and self abandonment of war.
Dutchman and Swede commingled, tugged, panted
and blowed. The heavens were darkened with a
tempest
of missives. Carcasses, fire balls, smoke balls,
stink balls and hand grenades, jostling each other,
in the air. Bang! went the gunswhack! struck
the broad swordsthump! went the cudgels
crash! went the musket stocksblowskicks
cuffsscratchesblack eyes and bloody noses
swelling
the horrors of the scene! Thick-thwack, cut
and hack, helter-skelter, higgledy-piggledy,
hurley-burley
,
head over heels, klip-klap, slag op slag,
hob over bol, rough and tumble!Dunder
and blixum! swore the dutchmen, splitter and
splutter
!
cried the SwedesStorm the works! shouted
Hard-koppig Pietfire the mine! roared stout
RisinghTantara-ra-ra! twang'd the trumpet of
Antony Van Corlearuntil all voice and sound
became
unintelligiblegrunts of pain, yells of fury,
and shouts of triumph commingling in one hideous
clamour. The earth shook as if struck with a
paralytic
strokeThe trees shrunk aghast, and wilted
at the sightThe rocks burrowed in the ground
like rabbits, and even Christina creek turned from its
course, and ran up a mountain in breathless terror!
Nothing, save the dullness of their weapons, the
damaged condition of their powder, and the
singular
accident of one and all striking with the flat
instead
of the edge of their swords, could have
prevented
a most horrible carnageAs it was, the
sweat prodigiously streaming, ran in rivers on the
field, fortunately without drowning a soul, the
combatants being to a man, expert swimmers, and
furnished with cork jackets for the occasionbut
many a valiant head was broken, many a stubborn
rib belaboured, and many a broken winded hero
drew short breath that day!
Long hung the contest doubtful, for though a
heavy shower of rain, sent by the cloud
compelling
Jove, in some measure cooled their ardour, as
doth a bucket of water thrown on a group of
fighting
mastiffs, yet did they but pause for a moment,
to return with tenfold fury to the charge,
belabouring
each other with black and bloody bruises. Just
at this juncture was seen a vast and dense column
of smoke, slowly rolling towards the scene of battle,
which for a while made even the furious
combatants
to stay their arms in mute astonishmentbut
the wind for a moment dispersing the murky cloud,
from the midst thereof emerged the flaunting
banner
of the immortal Michael Paw. This noble
chieftain came fearlessly on, leading a solid
phalanx
of oyster-fed Pavonians, who had remained
behind, partly as a
corps de reserve
, and partly to
digest the enormous dinner they had eaten. These
sturdy yeomen, nothing daunted, did trudge
manfully
forward, smoaking their pipes with
outrageous
vigour, so as to raise the awful cloud that has
been mentioned; but marching exceedingly slow,
being short of leg and of great rotundity in the
belt.
And now the protecting deities of the army of
New Amsterdam, having unthinkingly left the field
and stept into a neighbouring tavern to refresh
themselves with a pot of beer, a direful catastrophe
had well nigh chanced to befall the Nederlanders.
Scarcely had the myrmidons of the puissant
Paw attained the front of battle, before the
Swedes, instructed by the cunning Risingh,
levelled
a shower of blows, full at their tobacco pipes.
Astounded at this unexpected assault, and totally
O 2
discomfited at seeing their pipes broken by this
dd nonsense, the valiant dutchmen fall in vast
confusionalready they begin to flylike a
frightened
drove of unwieldy Elephants they throw their
own army in an uproarbearing down a whole
legion of little Hoppersthe sacred banner on
which is blazoned the gigantic oyster of
Communipaw
is trampled in the dirtThe Swedes pluck
up new spirits and pressing on their rear,
apply
their feet
a parte poste
with a vigour that
prodigiously
accelerates their motionsnor doth the
renowned
Paw himself, fail to receive divers grievous
and intolerable visitations of shoe leather!
But what, Oh muse! was the rage of the gallant
Peter, when from afar he saw his army yield?
With a voice of thunder did he roar after his
recreant warriors, putting up such a war whoop,
as did the stern Achilles, when the Trojan troops
were on the point of burning all his gunboats.
The dreadful shout rung in long echoes through
the woodstrees toppled at the noise; bears, wolves
and panthers jumped out of their skins, in pure
affright; several wild looking hills bounced clear
over the Delaware; and all the small beer in Fort
Christina, turned sour at the sound!
The men of the Manhattoes plucked up new
courage when they heard their leaderor rather
they dreaded his fierce displeasure, of which they
stood in more awe than of all the Swedes in
Christendom
but
the daring Peter, not waiting for their
aid, plunged sword in hand, into the thickest of the
foe. Then did he display some such incredible
atchievements, as have never been known since
the miraculous days of the giants. Wherever he
went the enemy shrunk before himwith fierce
impetuosity he pushed forward, driving the Swedes,
like dogs, into their own ditchbut as he fearlessly
advanced, the foe, like rushing waves which close
upon the scudding bark, thronged in his rear, and
hung upon his flank with fearful peril. One
desperate
Swede, who had a mighty heart, almost as
large as a pepper corn, drove his dastard sword
full at the hero's heart. But the protecting power
that watches over the safety of all great and good
men turned aside the hostile blade, and directed it
to a large side pocket, where reposed an enormous
Iron Tobacco Box, endowed like the shield of
Achilles with supernatural powersno doubt in
consequence of its being piously decorated with a
portrait of the blessed St. Nicholas. Thus was
the dreadful blow repelled, but not without
occasioning
to the great Peter a fearful loss of wind.
Like as a furious bear, when gored by worrying
curs, turns fiercely round, shews his dread teeth,
and springs upon the foe, so did our hero turn upon
the treacherous Swede. The miserable varlet
sought in flight, for safetybut the active Peter,
seizing him by an immeasurable queue, that dangled
from his headAh Whoreson Caterpillar!
roared he, here is what shall make dog's meat of
thee! So saying he whirled his trusty sword, and
made a blow, that would have decapitated him, had
he, like Briareus, half a hundred heads, but that the
pitying steel struck short and shaved the queue
forever
from his crown. At this very moment a cunning
arquebusier, perched on the summit of a
neighbouring
mound, levelled his deadly instrument, and
would have sent the gallant Stuyvesant, a wailing
ghost to haunt the Stygian shorehad not the
watchful Minerva, who had just stopped to tie up
her garter, saw the great peril of her favourite chief,
and dispatched old Boreas with his bellows; who
in the very nick of time, just as the direful match
descended to the pan, gave such a lucky blast, as
blew all the priming from the touch hole!
Thus waged the horrid fightwhen the stout
Risingh, surveying the battle from the top of a little
ravelin, perceived his faithful troops, banged, beaten
and kicked by the invincible Peter. Language
cannot describe the choler with which he was seized
at the sighthe only stopped for a moment to
disburthen himself of five thousand anathemas;
and then drawing his immeasurable cheese toaster,
straddled down to the field of combat, with some
such thundering strides, as Jupiter is said by old
Hesiod to have taken, when he strode down the
spheres, to play off his sky rockets at the Titans.
No sooner did these two rival heroes come face
to face, than they each made a prodigious start of
fifty feet, (flemish measure) such as is made by
your most experienced stage champions. Then
did they regard each other for a moment, with
bitter aspect, like two furious ram cats, on the very
point of a clapper clawing. Then did they throw
themselves in one attitude, then in another, striking
their swords on the ground, first on the right side,
then on the left, at last at it they went, like five
hundred houses on fire! Words cannot tell the
prodigies of strength and valour, displayed in this
direful encounteran encounter, compared to
which the far famed battles of Ajax with Hector,
of Eneas with Turnus, Orlando with Rodomont,
Guy of Warwick with Colbrand the Dane, or of
that renowned Welsh Knight Sir Owen of the
mountains with the giant Guylon, were all gentle
sports and holliday recreations. At length the
valiant Peter watching his opportunity, aimed a
fearful blow with the full intention of cleaving his
adversary to the very chine; but Risingh nimbly
raising his sword, warded it off so narrowly, that
glancing on one side, it shaved away a huge canteen
full of fourth proof brandy, that he always carried
swung on one side; thence pursuing its tranchant
course, it severed off a deep coat pocket, stored
with bread and cheeseall which dainties rolling
among the armies, occasioned a fearful scrambling
between the Swedes and Dutchmen, and made the
general battle to wax ten times more furious than
ever.
Enraged to see his military stores thus woefully
laid waste, the stout Risingh collecting all his forces,
aimed a mighty blow, full at the hero's crest. In
vain did his fierce little cocked hat oppose its course;
the biting steel clove through the stubborn ram
beaver, and would infallibly have cracked his
gallant
crown, but that the scull was of such adamantine
hardness that the brittle weapon shivered into five
and twenty pieces, shedding a thousand sparks,
like beams of glory, round his grizly visage.
Stunned with the blow the valiant Peter reeled,
turned up his eyes and beheld fifty thousand suns,
besides moons and stars, dancing Scotch reels about
the firmamentat length, missing his footing, by
reason of his wooden leg, down he came, on his
seat of honour, with a crash that shook the
surrounding
hills, and would infallibly have wracked
his anatomical system, had he not been received
into a cushion softer than velvet, which providence,
or Minerva, or St. Nicholas, or some kindly cow,
had benevolently prepared for his reception.
The furious Risingh, in despight of that noble
maxim, cherished by all true knights, that fair
play is a jewel, hastened to take advantage of the
hero's fall; but just as he was stooping to give the
fatal blow, the ever vigilant Peter bestowed him a
sturdy thwack over the sconce, with his wooden leg,
that set some dozen chimes of bells ringing triple
bob-majors in his cerebellum. The bewildered
Swede staggered with the blow, and in the mean
time the wary Peter, espying a pocket pistol lying
hard by (which had dropped from the wallet of his
faithful squire and trumpeter Van Corlear during
his furious encounter with the drummer) discharged
it full at the head of the reeling RisinghLet not
my reader mistakeit was not a murderous weapon
loaded with powder and ball, but a little sturdy
stone pottle, charged to the muzzle with a double
dram of true dutch courage, which the knowing Van
Corlear always carried about him by way of
replenishing
his valour. The hideous missive sung through
the air, and true to its course, as was the mighty
fragment of a rock, discharged at Hector by bully
Ajax, encountered the huge head of the gigantic
Swede with matchless violence.
This heaven directed blow decided the eventful
battle. The ponderous pericranium of general Jan
Risingh sunk upon his breast; his knees tottered
under under him; a deathlike torpor seized upon
his Titan frame, and he tumbled to the earth with
such tremendous violence, that old Pluto started
with affright, lest he should have broken through
the roof of his infernal palace.
His fall, like that of Goliah, was the signal for
defeat and victoryThe Swedes gave waythe
Dutch pressed forward; the former took to their
heels, the latter hotly pursuedSome entered with
them, pell mell, through the sally portothers
stormed the bastion, and others scrambled over the
curtain. Thus in a little while the impregnable
fortress of Fort Christina, which like another Troy
had stood a siege of full ten
hours
, was finally
carried
by assault, without the loss of a single man on
either side. Victory in the likeness of a gigantic
ox fly, sat perched upon the little cocked hat of the
gallant Stuyvesant, and it was universally declared,
by all the writers, whom he hired to write the
history
of his expedition, that on this memorable day
he gained a sufficient quantity of glory to
immortalize
a dozen of the greatest heroes in
Christendom
!
CHAP. VIII.
In which the author and reader, while reposing after
the battle, fall into a very grave and instructive
discourseafter which is recorded the conduct of
Peter Stuyvesant in respect to his victory
.
Thanks
to St. Nicholas! I have fairly got
through this tremendous battle: let us sit down,
my worthy reader, and cool ourselves, for truly I
am in a prodigious sweat and agitationBody o'me,
but this fighting of battles is hot work! And if your
great commanders, did but know what trouble they
give their historians, they would not have the
conscience
to atchieve so many horrible victories. I
already hear my reader complaining, that
throughout
all this boasted battle, there is not the least
slaughter, nor a single individual maimed, if we
except the unhappy Swede, who was shorn of his
queue by the tranchant blade of Peter Stuyvesant
all which is a manifest outrage on probability, and
highly injurious to the interest of the narrative.
For once I candidly confess my captious reader
has some grounds for his murmuringBut though
I could give a variety of substantial reasons for not
having deluded my whole page with blood, and
swelled the cadence of every sentence with dying
groans, yet I will content myself with barely
mentioning
VOL. II. P
one; which if it be not sufficient to satisfy
every reasonable man on the face of the earth, I
will consent that my book shall be cast into the
flamesThe simple truth then is this, that on
consulting
every history, manuscript and tradition,
which relates to this memorable, though long
forgotten
battle, I cannot find that a single man was killed,
or even wounded, throughout the whole affair!
My readers, if they have any bowels, must easily
feel the distressing situation in which I was placed.
I had already promised to furnish them with a
hideous and unparalleled battleI had made
incredible
preparations for the sameand had
moreover
worked myself up into a most warlike and
blood-thirsty state of mindmy honour, as a
historian
,
and my feelings, as a man of spirit, were
both too deeply engaged in the business, to back
out. Beside, I had transported a great and
powerful
force of warriors from the Nederlandts, at vast
trouble and expense, and I could not reconcile it to
my own conscience, or to that reverence which I
entertain for them, and their illustrious descendants,
to have suffered them to return home, like a
renowned
British expeditionwith a flea in their
ears.
How to extract myself from this dilemma was
truly perplexing. Had the inexorable fates only
allowed
me half a dozen dead men, I should have
been contented, for I would have made them such
heroes as abounded in the olden time, but whose
race is now unfortunately extinct. Men, who, if
we may believe those authentic writers, the poets,
could drive great armies like sheep before them,
and conquer and desolate whole cities by their
single
arm. I'd have given every mother's son of
them as many lives as a cat, and made them die
hard, I warrant you.
But seeing that I had not a single carcass at my
disposal, all that was left for me, was to make the
most I could of my battle, by means of kicks and
cuffs, and bruisesblack eyes, and bloody noses,
and such like ignoble wounds. My greatest
difficulty
however, was, when I had once put my
warriors
in a passion, and let them loose into the midst
of the enemy; to keep them from doing mischief.
Many a time had I to restrain the sturdy Peter, from
cleaving a gigantic Swede, to the very waist-band,
or spitting half a dozen little fellows on his sword,
like so many sparrowsAnd when I had set some
hundreds of missives flying in the air, I did not
dare to suffer one of them to reach the ground, lest
it should have put an end to some unlucky
Dutchman
.
The reader cannot conceive how much I
suffered
from thus in a manner having my hands tied,
and how many tempting opportunities I had to
wink at, where I might have made as fine a
death blow, as any recorded in history or song.
From my own experience, I begin to doubt
most potently of the authenticity of many of Dan
Homer's stories. I verily believe, that when he
had once launched one of his hearty blades among
a crowd of the enemy, he cut down many an
honest
fellow, without any authority for so doing,
excepting that he presented a fair markand that
often a poor devil was sent to grim Pluto's
domains
,
merely because he had a name that would
give a sounding turn to a period. But I disclaim
all such unprincipled libertieslet me but have
truth and the law on my side, and no man would
fight harder than myselfbut since the various
records
I consulted did not warrant it, I had too
much conscience to kill a single soldier.By St.
Nicholas, but it would have been a pretty piece of
business! My enemies the critics, who I foresee
will be ready enough to lay any crime they can
discover, at my door, might have charged me with
murder outrightand I should have esteemed
myself
lucky to escape, with no harsher verdict than
manslaughter!
And now gentle reader that we are tranquilly
sitting down here, smoking our pipes, permit me
to indulge in a melancholy reflection which at this
moment passes across my mind.How vain, how
fleeting, how uncertain are all those gaudy bubbles
after which we are panting and toiling in this
world of fair delusions. The wealthy store which
the hoary miser has painfully amassed with so
many weary days, so many sleepless nights, a
spendthrift heir shall squander away in joyless
prodigalityThe noblest monuments which pride
has ever reared to perpetuate a name, the hand of
time shall shortly tumble into promiscuous ruins
and even the brightest laurels, gained by hardiest
feats of arms, may wither and be forever blighted
by the chilling neglect of mankind.How many
illustrious heroes, says the good Botius, who
were once the pride and glory of the age, hath the
silence of historians buried in eternal oblivion!
And this it was, that made the Spartans when they
went to battle, solemnly to sacrifice to the muses,
supplicating that their atchievements should be
worthily recorded. Had not Homer tuned his
lofty lyre, observes the elegant Cicero, the valour
of Achilles had remained unsung.And such too,
after all the toils and perils he had braved, after
all the gallant actions he had atchieved, such too
had nearly been the fate of the chivalric Peter
Stuyvesant
,
but that I fortunately stepped in and
engraved
his name on the indelible tablet of history,
just as the caitiff Time was silently brushing it away
forever!
The more I reflect, the more am I astonished
to think, what important beings are we historians!
We are the sovereign censors who decide upon
the renown or infamy of our fellow mortalsWe
P 2
are the public almoners of fame, dealing out her
favours according to our judgment or caprice
we are the benefactors of kingswe are the
guardians
of truthwe are the scourgers of guiltwe
are the instructors of the worldwe arein short,
what are we not!And yet how often does the
lofty patrician or lordly Burgomaster stalk
contemptuously
by the little, plodding, dusty historian
like myself, little thinking that this humble mortal
is the arbiter of his fate, on whom it shall depend
whether he shall live in future ages, or be forgotten
in the dirt, as were his ancestors before him.
Insult
not the dervise said a wise caliph to his son,
lest thou offend thine historian; and many a
mighty man of the olden time, had he observed so
obvious a maxim, would have escaped divers cruel
wipes of the pen, which have been drawn across
his character.
But let not my readers think I am indulging in
vain glorious boasting, from the consciousness of
my own power and importance. On the contrary
I shudder to think what direful commotions, what
heart rending calamities we historians occasion in
the worldI swear to thee, honest reader, as I am
a man, I weep at the very idea!Why, let me ask,
are so many illustrious men daily tearing
themselves
away from the embraces of their distracted
familiesslighting the smiles of beautydespising
the allurements of fortune, and exposing
themselves
to all the miseries of war?Why are renowned
generals cutting the throats of thousands who never
injured them in their lives?Why are kings
desolating
empires and depopulating whole countries?
in short, what induces all great men, of all ages
and countries to commit so many horrible victories
and misdeeds, and inflict so many miseries upon
mankind and on themselves; but the mere hope
that we historians will kindly take them into notice,
and admit them into a corner of our volumes. So
that the mighty object of all their toils, their
hardships
and privations is nothing but
immortal fame
and what is immortal fame?why, half a page of
dirty paper!alas! alas! how humiliating
the ideathat the renown of so great a man as
Peter Stuyvesant, should depend upon the pen of
so little a man, as Diedrich Knickerbocker!
And now, having refreshed ourselves after the
fatigues and perils of the field, it behoves us to
return once more to the scene of conflict, and
inquire
what were the results of this renowned
conquest. The Fortress of Christina being the
fair metropolis and in a manner the Key to New
Sweden, its capture was speedily followed by the
entire subjugation of the province. This was not
a little promoted by the gallant and courteous
deportment
of the chivalric Peter. Though a man
terrible in battle, yet in the hour of victory was he
endued with a spirit generous, merciful and
humane
He
vaunted not over his enemies, nor did
he make defeat more galling by unmanly insults;
for like that mirror of Knightly virtue, the
renowned
Paladin Orlando, he was more anxious to do
great actions, than to talk of them after they were
done. He put no man to death; ordered no houses
to be burnt down; permitted no ravages to be
perpetrated
on the property of the vanquished, and
even gave one of his braves staff officers a severe
rib-roasting, who was detected in the act of sacking
a hen roost.
He moreover issued a proclamation inviting
the inhabitants to submit to the authority of their
high mightinesses; but declaring, with unexampled
clemency, that whoever refused, should be lodged
at the public expense, in a goodly castle provided
for the purpose, and have an armed retinue to wait
on them in the bargain. In consequence of these
beneficent terms, about thirty Swedes stepped
manfully
forward and took the oath of allegiance; in
reward for which they were graciously permitted
to remain on the banks of the Delaware, where
their descendants reside at this very day. But I am
told by sundry observant travellers, that they have
never been able to get over the chap-fallen looks of
their ancestors, and do still unaccountably transmit
from father to son, manifest marks of the sound
drubbing given them by the sturdy
Amsterdammers
.
The whole country of New Sweden, having thus
yielded to the arms of the triumphant Peter, was
reduced to a colony called South River, and placed
under the superintendance of a lieutenant governor;
subject to the controul of the supreme government
at New Amsterdam. This great dignitary, was
called Mynheer William Beekman, or rather
Beck
man, who derived his surname, as did Ovidius Naso
of yore, from the lordly dimensions of his nose,
which projected from the centre of his countenance,
like the beak of a parrot. Indeed, it is
furthermore
insinuated by various ancient records, that
this was not only the origin of his name, but
likewise
the foundation of his fortune, for, as the city
was as yet unprovided with a clock, the public
made use of Mynheer Beckman's face, as a sun
dial. Thus did this romantic, and truly picturesque
feature, first thrust itself into public notice,
dragging
its possessor along with it, who in his turn
dragged after him the whole Beckman family
These, as the story further adds, were for a long
time among the most ancient and honourable
families of the province, and gratefully
commemorated
the origin of their dignity, not as your noble
families in England would do, by having a glowing
proboscis emblazoned in their escutcheon, but by
one and all, wearing a right goodly nose, stuck in
the very middle of their faces.
Thus was this perilous enterprize gloriously
terminated, with the loss of only two men; Wolfert
Van Horne, a tall spare man, who was knocked
overboard by the boom of a sloop, in a flaw of
wind: and fat Brom Van Bummel, who was
suddenly
carried off by a villainous indigestion; both,
however, were immortalized, as having bravely
fallen, in the service of their country. True it is,
Peter Stuyvesant had one of his limbs terribly
fractured, being shattered to pieces in the act of
storming the fortress; but as it was fortunately his
wooden leg, the wound was promptly and effectually
healed.
And now nothing remains to this branch of my
history, but to mention, that this immaculate hero,
and his victorious army, returned joyously to the
Manhattoes, marching under the shade of their
laurels, as did the followers of young Malcolm,
under the moving forest of Dunsinane. Thus did
they make a solemn and triumphant entry into
New Amsterdam, bearing with them the conquered
Risingh, and the remnant of his battered crew, who
had refused allegiance. For it appears that the
gigantic Swede, had only fallen into a swound, at
the end of the battle, from whence he was speedily
restored by a wholesome tweak of the nose.
These captive heroes were lodged, according to
the promise of the governor, at the public expense, in
a fair and spacious castle; being the prison of state,
of which Stoffel Brinkerhoff, the immortal conqueror
of Oyster Bay, was appointed Lord Lieutenant; and
which has ever since remained in the possession of
his descendants.
[14]
[14]
This castle though very much altered and modernized is still
in being. And stands at the corner of Pearl Street, facing Coentie's
slip.
It was a pleasant and goodly sight to witness
the joy of the people of New Amsterdam, at
beholding
their warriors once more returned, from
this war in the wilderness. The old women thronged
round Antony Van Corlear, who gave the whole
history of the campaign with matchless accuracy;
saving that he took the credit of fighting the whole
battle himself, and especially of vanquishing the
stout Risingh, which he considered himself as
clearly entitled to, seeing that it was effected by
his own stone pottle. The schoolmasters
throughout
the town gave holliday to their little urchins,
who followed in droves after the drums, with
paper
caps on their heads and sticks in their breeches,
thus taking the first lesson in vagabondizing. As to
the sturdy rabble they thronged at the heels of
Peter Stuyvesant wherever he went, waving their
greasy hats in the air, and shouting
Hard-koppig
Piet forever!
It was indeed a day of roaring rout and jubilee.
A huge dinner was prepared at the Stadt-house
in honour of the conquerors, where were assembled
in one glorious constellation, the great and the
little luminaries of New Amsterdam. There were
the lordly Schout and his obsequious deputythe
Burgomasters with their officious Schepens at their
elbowsthe subaltern officers at the elbows of the
Schepens, and so on to the lowest grade of
illustrious
hangers-on of police; every Tag having his
Rag at his side, to finish his pipe, drink off his
heel-taps, and laugh at his flights of immortal
dullness
.
In shortfor a city feast is a city feast all
the world over, and has been a city feast ever
since the creationthe dinner went off much the
same as do our great corporation junkettings and
fourth of July banquets. Loads of fish, flesh and
fowl were devoured, oceans of liquor drank,
thousands
of pipes smoked, and many a dull joke
honoured
with much obstreperous fat sided laughter.
I must not omit to mention that to this
far-famed
victory Peter Stuyvesant was indebted for
another of his many titlesfor so hugely delighted
were the honest burghers with his atchievements,
that they unanimously honoured him with the name
of
Pieter de Groodt
, that is to say Peter the Great,
or as it was translated by the people of New
Amsterdam
,
Piet de Pig
an appellation which he
maintained even unto the day of his death.
END OF BOOK VI.
BOOK VII.
Containing the third part of the reign of Peter
the Headstronghis troubles with the British
nation
,
and the decline and fall of the Dutch dynasty.
CHAP. I.
How Peter Stuyvesant relieved the sovereign people
from the burthen of taking care of the nation
with sundry particulars of his conduct in time of
peace
.
The
history of the reign of Peter Stuyvesant,
furnishes a melancholy picture of the incessant cares
and vexations inseparable from government; and
may serve as a solemn warning, to all who are
ambitious
of attaining the seat of power. Though
crowned
with victory, enriched by conquest, and
returning
in triumph to his splendid metropolis, his
exultation
was checked by beholding the sad abuses that
had taken place during the short interval of his
absence
.
The populace, unfortunately for their own
comfort
,
had taken a deep draught of the intoxicating
cup of power, during the reign of William the
Testy
;
VOL. II. Q
and though, upon the accession of Peter
Stuyvesant
they felt, with a certain instinctive
perception
,
which mobs as well as cattle possess, that the
reins of government had passed into stronger hands,
yet could they not help fretting and chafing and
champing upon the bit, in restive silence. No
sooner, therefore, was the great Peter's back turned,
than the quid nuncs and pot-house politicians of the
city immediately broke loose, and indulged in the
most ungovernable freaks and gambols.
It seems by some strange and inscrutable
fatality
,
to be the destiny of most countries, and (more
especially of your enlightened republics,) always to
be governed by the most incompetent man in the
nation, so that you will scarcely find an individual
throughout the whole community, but who shall
detect
to you innumerable errors in administration,
and shall convince you in the end, that had he
been at the head of affairs, matters would have gone
on a thousand times more prosperously. Strange!
that government, which seems to be so generally
understood
should invariably be so erroneously
administered
strange,
that the talent of legislation so
prodigally bestowed, should be denied to the only
man in the nation, to whose station it is requisite!
Thus it was in the present instance, not a man
of all the herd of pseudo politicians in New
Amsterdam
,
but was an oracle on topics of state, and
could have directed public affairs incomparably
better
than Peter Stuyvesant. But so perverse was
the old governor in his disposition, that he would
never suffer one of the multitude of able counsellors
by whom he was surrounded, to intrude his advice
and save the country from distruction.
Scarcely therefore had he departed on his
expedition
against the Swedes, than the old factions of
William Kieft's reign began to thrust their heads
above water, and to gather together in political
meetings, to discuss the state of the nation. At
these assemblages the busy burgomasters and their
officious schepens made a very considerable figure.
These worthy dignitaries were no longer the fat,
well fed, tranquil magistrates that presided in the
peaceful days of Wouter Van TwillerOn the
contrary
,
being elected by the people, they formed in
a manner, a sturdy bulwark, between the mob and
the administration. They were great candidates for
popularity, and strenuous advocates for the rights
of the rabble; resembling in disinterested zeal the
wide mouthed tribunes of ancient Rome, or those
virtuous patriots of modern days, emphatically
denominated
the friends of the people.
Under the tuition of these profound politicians,
it is astonishing how suddenly enlightened the
swinish
multitude became, in matters above their
comprehensions
.
Coblers, Tinkers and Taylors all at
once felt themselves inspired, like those religious
ideots, in the glorious times of monkish
illumination
;
and without any previous study or experience,
became instantly capable of directing all the
movements
of government. Nor must I neglect to
mention
a number of superannuated, wrong headed old
burghers, who had come over when boys, in the
crew of the
Goede Vrouw
, and were held up as
infalliable
oracles by the enlightened mob. To suppose
a man who had helped to discover a country, did
not know how it ought to be governed was
preposterous
in the extreme. It would have been deemed
as much a heresy, as at the present day to
question
the political talents, and universal infallibility
of our old heroes of '76and to doubt that he who
had fought for a government, however stupid he
might naturally be, was not competent to fill any
station under it.
But as Peter Stuyvesant had a singular
inclination
to govern his province without the assistance
of his subjects, he felt highly incensed on his return
to find the factious appearance they had assumed
during his absence. His first measure therefore
was to restore perfect order, by prostrating the
dignity
of the sovereign people in the dirt.
He accordingly watched his opportunity, and one
evening when the enlightened mob was gathered
together in full caucus, listening to a patriotic
speech from an inspired cobbler, the intrepid Peter,
like his great namesake of all the Russias, all at
once appeared among them with a countenance,
sufficient to petrify a mill stone. The whole
meeting
was thrown in consternationthe orator
seemed
to have received a paralytic stroke in the very
middle of a sublime sentence, he stood aghast with
open mouth and trembling knees, while the words
horror! tyranny! liberty! rights! taxes! death!
destruction
!
and a deluge of other patriotic phrases,
came roaring from his throat, before he had power
to close his lips. The shrewd Peter took no notice
of the skulking throng around him, but advancing
to the brawling bully-ruffian, and drawing out a
huge silver watch, which might have served in
times of yore as a town clock, and which is still
retained
by his decendants as a family curiosity,
requested
the orator to mend it, and set it going.
The orator humbly confessed it was utterly out of
his power, as he was unacquainted with the nature
of its construction. Nay, but, said Peter try
your ingenuity man, you see all the springs and
wheels, and how easily the clumsiest hand may
stop it and pull it to pieces; and why should it not
be equally easy to regulate as to stop it. The
orator
declared that his trade was wholly different, he
was a poor cobbler, and had never meddled with a
watch in his life. There were men skilled in the
art, whose business it was to attend to those
matters
,
but for his part, he should only mar the
workmanship
,
and put the whole in confusionWhy
harkee master of mine, cried Peter, turning
suddenly
Q 2
upon him, with a countenance that almost
petrified the patcher of shoes into a perfect
lapstone
dost
thou pretend to meddle with the
movements of governmentto regulate and correct
and patch and cobble a complicated machine, the
principles of which are above thy comprehension,
and its simplest operations too subtle for thy
understanding
;
when thou canst not correct a trifling
error in a common piece of mechanism, the whole
mystery of which is open to thy inspection?Hence
with thee to the leather and stone, which are
emblems
of thy head; cobble thy shoes and confine
thyself to the vocation for which heaven has fitted
theeBut, elevating his voice until it made the
welkin ring, if ever I catch thee, or any of thy
tribe, whether square-head, or platter breech,
meddling
with affairs of government; by St. Nicholas
but I'll have every mother's bastard of ye flea'd
alive, and your hides stretched for drum heads,
that ye may henceforth make a noise to some
purpose
!
This threat and the tremendous voice in which
it was uttered, caused the whole multitude to quake
with fear. The hair of the orator rose on his head
like his own swine's bristles, and not a knight of
the thimble present, but his mighty heart died
within him, and he felt as though he could have
verily escaped through the eye of a needle.
But though this measure produced the desired
effect, in reducing the community to order, yet it
tended to injure the popularity of the great Peter,
among the enlightened vulgar. Many accused
him of entertaining highly aristocratic sentiments,
and of leaning too much in favour of the patricians.
Indeed there was some appearance of ground for
such a suspicion, for in his time did first arise that
pride of family and ostentation of wealth, that has
since grown to such a height in this city.
[15]
[15]
In a work published many years after the time of which Mr.
Knickerbocker treats (in 1701. By C. W. A. M.) it is mentioned
Frederick Philips was counted the richest Mynheer in New York,
and was said to have
whole hogsheads of Indian money or wampum;
and had a son and daughter, who according to the Dutch custom
should divide it equally.
Editor
.
Those
who drove their own waggons, kept their own cows,
and possessed the fee simple of a cabbage garden,
looked down, with the most gracious, though
mortifying
condescension, on their less wealthy
neighbours
;
while those whose parents had been cabin
passengers in the Goede Vrouw, were continually
railing out, about the dignity of ancestryLuxury
began to make its appearance under divers forms,
and even Peter Stuyvesant himself (though in
truth his station required a little state and dignity.)
appeared with great pomp of equipage on public
occasions, and always rode to church in a yellow
waggon with flaming red wheels!
From this picture my readers will perceive,
how very faithfully many of the peculiarities of our
ancestors have been retained by their descendants.
The pride of purse still prevails among our wealthy
citizens. And many a laborious tradesman, after
plodding in dust and obscurity in the morning of
his life, sits down out of breath in his latter days
to enact the gentleman, and enjoy the dignity
honestly earned by the sweat of his brow. In this
he resembles a notable, but ambitious housewife,
who after drudging and stewing all day in the
kitchen to prepare an entertainment; flounces into
the parlour of an evening, and swelters in all the
magnificence of a maudlin fine lady.
It is astonishing, moreover, to behold how many
great families have sprung up of late years, who
pride themselves excessively on the score of
ancestry
.
Thus he who can look up to his father without
humiliation assumes not a little importancehe
who can safely talk of his grandfather, is still more
vain-glorious, but he who can look back to his
great grandfather, without stumbling over a cobler's
stall, or running his head against a whipping post,
is absolutely intolerable in his pretensions to family
bless us! what a piece of work is here, between
these mushrooms of an hour, and these mushrooms
of a day!
For my part I look upon our old dutch families
as the only local nobility, and the real lords of the
soilnor can I ever see an honest old burgher
quietly smoking his pipe, but I look upon him with
reverence as a dignified descendant from the Van
Rensellaers, the Van Zandts, the Knickerbockers,
and the Van Tuyls.
But from what I have recounted in the former
part of this chapter, I would not have my reader
imagine, that the great Peter was a tyrannical
governor
,
ruling his subjects with a rod of ironon
the contrary, where the dignity of authority was
not implicated, he abounded with generosity and
courteous condescension. In fact he really believed,
though I fear my more enlightened republican
readers will consider it a proof of his ignorance and
illiberality, that in preventing the cup of social life
from being dashed with the intoxicating ingredient
of politics, he promoted the tranquility and
happiness
of the peopleand by detaching their minds
from subjects which they could not understand,
and which only tended to inflame their passions,
he enabled them to attend more faithfully and
industriously
to their proper callings; becoming more
useful citizens and more attentive to their families
and fortunes.
So far from having any unreasonable austerity,
he delighted to see the poor and the labouring
man rejoice, and for this purpose was a great
promoter
of holidays and public amusements. Under
his reign was first introduced the custom of
cracking
eggs at Paas or Easter. New year's day
was also observed with extravagant festivityand
ushered in by the ringing of bells and firing of
guns. Every house was a temple to the jolly god
Oceans of cherry brandy, true Hollands and
mulled
cyder were set afloat on the occasion; and not
a poor man in town, but made it a point to get
drunk, out of a principle of pure economytaking
in liquor enough to serve him for half a year
afterwards
.
It would have done one's heart good also to
have seen the valiant Peter, seated among the old
burghers and their wives of a saturday afternoon,
under the great trees that spread their shade over
the Battery, watching the young men and women,
as they danced on the green. Here he would
smoke his pipe, crack his joke, and forget the
rugged
toils of war, in the sweet oblivious festivities
of peace. He would occasionally give a nod of
approbation to those of the young men who shuffled
and kicked most vigorously, and now and then
give a hearty smack, in all honesty of soul, to the
buxom lass that held out longest, and tired down
all her competitorsinfallible proofs of her being
the best dancer. Once it is true the harmony of
the meeting was rather interrupted. A young
vrouw, of great figure in the gay world, and who,
having lately come from Holland, of course led the
fashions in the city, made her appearance in not
more than half a dozen petticoats, and these too of
most alarming shortness.An universal whisper
ran through the assembly, the old ladies all felt
shocked in the extreme, the young ladies blushed,
and felt excessively for the poor thing, and even
the governor himself was observed to be a little
troubled in mind. To complete the astonishment
of the good folks, she undertook in the course of
a jig, to describe some astonishing figures in
algebra
,
which she had learned from a dancing master
at Rotterdam.Whether she was too animated in
flourishing her feet, or whether some vagabond
Zephyr took the liberty of obtruding his services,
certain it is that in the course of a grand evolution,
that would not have disgraced a modern ball room,
she made a most unexpected displayWhereat
the whole assembly were thrown into great
admiration
,
several grave country members were not
a little moved, and the good Peter himself, who
was a man of unparalleled modesty, felt himself
grievously scandalized.
The shortness of the female dresses, which had
continued in fashion, ever since the days of William
Kieft, had long offended his eye, and though
extremely
averse to meddling with the petticoats of the
ladies, yet he immediately recommended, that every
one should be furnished with a flounce to the
bottom
.
He likewise ordered that the ladies, and
indeed the gentlemen, should use no other step in
dancing, than shuffle and turn, and double trouble;
and forbade, under pain of his high displeasure, any
young lady thenceforth to attempt what was termed
exhibiting the graces.
These were the only restrictions he ever
imposed
upon the sex, and these were considered by
them, as tyrannical oppressions, and resisted with
that becoming spirit, always manifested by the
gentle
sex, whenever their privileges are invaded
In fact, Peter Stuyvesant plainly perceived, that if
he attempted to push the matter any further, there
was danger of their leaving off petticoats altogether;
so like a wise man, experienced in the ways of
women, he held his peace, and suffered them ever
after to wear their petticoats and cut their capers, as
high as they pleased.
CHAP. II.
How Peter Stuyvesant was much molested by the moss
troopers of the East, and the Giants of
Merryland
and
how a dark and horrid conspiracy was
carried on in the British Cabinet, against the
prosperity of the Manhattoes
.
We
are now approaching towards what may be
termed the very pith and marrow of our work,
and if I am not mistaken in my forebodings, we
shall have a world of business to dispatch, in the
ensuing chapters. Thus far have I come on
prosperously
,
and even beyond my expectations; for to
let the reader into a secret (and truly we have
become
so extremely intimate, that I believe I shall
tell him all my secrets before we part) when I first
set out upon this marvellous, but faithful little
history
,
I felt horribly perplexed to think how I should
ever get through with itand though I put a bold
face on the matter, and vapoured exceedingly, yet
was it naught but the blustering of a braggadocio
at the commencement of a quarrel, which he feels
sure he shall have to sneak out of in the end.
When I reflected, that this illustrious province,
though of prodigious importance in the eyes of its
inhabitants and its historian, had in sober sadness,
but little wealth or other spoils to reward the
trouble
VOL. II. R
of assailing it, and that it had little to expect
from running wantonly into war, save a sound
drubbingWhen I pondered all these things in my
mind, I began utterly to despair, that I should find
either battles, or bloodshed, or any other of those
calamities, which give importance to a nation, to
enliven my history withal.I regarded this most
amiable of provinces, in the light of an unhappy
maiden, to whom Heaven had not granted sufficient
charms, to excite the diabolical attempts of wicked
man; who had no cruel father to persecute and
oppress
her, no abominable ravisher to run away with
her, and who had not strength nor courage enough, of
her own accord, to act the heroine, and go in quest
of adventuresin short, who was doomed to
vegetate
,
in a tranquil, unmolested, hopeless, howling
state of virginity, and finally to die in peace,
without
bequeathing a single misery, or outrage, to
those warehouses of sentimental woe, the
circulating
libraries.
But thanks to my better stars, they have decreed
otherwise. It is with some communities, as it is
with certain meddlesome individuals, they have a
wonderful facility at getting into scrapes, and I
have always remarked, that those are most liable to
get in, who have the least talent at getting out again.
This is doubtless occasioned by the excessive
valour
of those little states; for I have likewise noticed,
that this rampant and ungovernable virtue, is always
most unruly where most confined; which accounts
for its raging and vapouring so amazingly in little
states, little men, and ugly little women more
especially
.
Thus this little province of Nieuw
Nederlandts
has already drawn upon itself a host of
enemies; has had as many hard knocks, as would
gratify the ambition of the most warlike nation;
and is in sober sadness, a very forlorn, distressed,
and woe begone little province!all which was
no doubt kindly ordered by providence, to give
interest and sublimity, to this most pathetic of
histories.
But I forbear to enter into a detail of the pitiful
maraudings and harrassments, that for a long while
after the victory on the Delaware, continued to
insult the dignity and disturb the repose of the
Nederlanders. Never shall the pen which has
been gloriously wielded in the tremendous battle
of Fort Christina, be drawn in scurvy border broils
and frontier skirmishingsnor the historian who
put to flight stout Risingh and his host, and
conquered
all New Sweden, be doomed to battle it in
defence of a pig stye or a hen roost, and wage
ignoble strife with squatters and moss troopers!
Forbid it all ye muses, that a Knickerbocker should
ever so far forget what is due to his family and
himself!
Suffice it then in brevity to say, that the
implacable
hostility of the people of the east, which had
so miraculously been prevented from breaking out,
as my readers must remember, by the sudden
prevalence
of witchcraft, and the dissensions in the
council of Amphyctions, now again displayed itself
in a thousand grievous and bitter scourings upon
the borders.
Scarcely a month passed but what the little
dutch settlements on the frontiers were alarmed by
the sudden appearance of an invading army from
Connecticut. This would advance resolutely through
the country, like a puissant caravan of the deserts,
the women and children mounted in carts loaded
with pots and kettles, as though they meant to boil
the honest dutchmen alive, and devour them like
so many lobsters. At the tail of these carts would
stalk a crew of long limbed, lank sided varlets, with
axes on their shoulders and packs on their backs,
resolutely bent upon
improving
the country in
despite
of its proprietors. These settling themselves
down, would in a little while completely dislodge
the unfortunate Nederlanders; elbowing them out
of those rich little bottoms and fertile valleys, in
which your dutch yeomanry are so famous for
nestling themselvesFor it is notorious that
wherever
these shrewd men of the east get a footing, the
honest dutchmen do gradually disappear, retiring
slowly like the Indians before the whites; being
totally discomfited by the talking, chaffering,
swapping
,
bargaining disposition of their new neighbours.
All these audacious infringements on the
territories
of their high mightinesses were accompanied,
as has before been hinted, by a world of rascally
brawls, ribroastings and bundlings, which would
doubtlessly have incensed the valiant Peter to wreak
immediate chastisement, had he not at the very
same time been perplexed by distressing accounts,
from Mynheer Beckman, who commanded the
territories at South river.
The rebellious Swedes who had so graciously
been suffered to remain about the Delaware,
already
began to shew signs of mutiny and disaffection.
But what was worse, a peremptory claim was laid
to the whole territory, as the rightful property of
lord Baltimore, by Fendal, a chieftain who ruled
over the colony of Maryland, or Merry-land as it
was anciently called, because that the inhabitants
not having the fear of the Lord before their eyes,
were notoriously prone to get fuddled and make
merry
with mint julep and apple toddy. Nay, so
hostile was this bully Fendal, that he threatened,
unless his claim was instantly complied with, to
march incontinently at the head of a potent force
of the roaring boys of Merryland, together with a
great and mighty train of giants who infested the
banks of the Susquehanna
[16]
[16]
We find very curious and wonderful accounts of these strange
people (who were doubtless the ancestors of the present
Marylanders
made by master Hariot, in his interesting history. The
Susquesahanocksobserves he, are a giantly people, strange in
proportion, behavour and attiretheir voice sounding from them
as if out a cave. Their tobacco pipes were three quarters of a yard
long, carved at the great end with a bird, beare, or other device,
sufficient to beat out the braines of a horse, (and how many asses
braines are beaten out, or rather men's braines smoaked out and
asses brains haled in, by our lesser pipes at home.) The calfe of
one of their legges was measured three quarters of a yard about,
the rest of his limbs proportionable.
Master Hariot's Journ. Purch. Pil.
and to lay waste and
depopulate the whole country of South river.
R 2
By this it is manifest that this boasted colony,
like all great acquisitions of territory, soon became
a greater evil to the conqueror, than the loss of it
was to the conquered, and caused greater
uneasiness
and trouble, than all the territory of the New
Netherlands besides. Thus providence wisely
orders
,
that one evil shall balance another. The
conqueror
who wrests the property of his neighbour,
who wrongs a nation and desolates a country,
though he may acquire increase of empire, and
immortal
fame, yet ensures his own inevitable
punishment
.
He takes to himself a cause of endless
anxiety
he
incorporates with his late sound domain,
a loose parta rotten disaffected member; which
is an exhaustless source of internal treason and
disunion
,
and external altercation and hostility
Happy
is that nation, which compact, united, loyal in
all its parts, and concentrated in its strength, seeks
no idle acquisition of unprofitable and ungovernable
territorywhich, content to be prosperous and
happy, has no ambition to be great. It is like a
man well organized in all his system, sound in
health, and full of vigour; unincumbered by
useless
trappings, and fixed in an unshaken attitude.
But the nation, insatiable of territory, whose
domains
are scattered, feebly united, and weakly
organized
,
is like a senseless miser sprawling among
golden stores, open to every attack, and unable to
defend the riches he vainly endeavours to
overshadow
.
At the time of receiving the alarming dispatches
from South river, the great Peter was busily
employed
in quelling certain Indian troubles that had
broken out about Esopus, and was moreover
meditating
how to relieve his eastern borders, on the
Connecticut. He however sent word so Mynheer
Beckman to be of good heart, to maintain incessant
vigilance, and to let him know if matters wore a
more threatening appearance; in which case he
would incontinently repair with his warriors of the
Hudson, to spoil the merriment of these Merry
landers; for he coveted exceedingly to have a bout,
hand to hand, with some half a score of these giants
having never encountered a giant in his whole
life, unless we may so call the stout Risingh, and
he was but a little one.
Nothing however appeared further to molest
the tranquillity of Mynheer Beckman and his
colony. Fendal and his Myrmidons remained at
home, carousing it soundly upon hoe cakes, bacon,
and mint julep, and running horses, and fighting
cocks, for which they were greatly renowned. At
hearing of this Peter Stuyvesant was highly
rejoiced
,
for notwithstanding his inclination to
measure
weapons with these monstrous men of the
Susquehanna, yet he had already as much
employment
nearer home, as he could turn his hands to.
Little did he think, worthy soul, that this southern
calm, was but the deceitful prelude to a most
terrible
and fatal storm, then brewing, which was soon
to burst forth and overwhelm the unsuspecting
city of New Amsterdam!
Now so it was, that while this excellent
governor
was, like a second Cato, giving his little senate
laws, and not only giving them, but enforcing them
toowhile he was incessantly travelling the rounds
of his beloved provinceposting from place to
place to redress grievances, and while busy at one
corner of his dominions all the rest getting into an
uproarAt this very time, I say, a dark and
direful
plot was hatching against him, in that nursery
of monstrous projects, the British Cabinet. The
news of his atchievements on the Delaware,
according
to a sage old historian of New Amsterdam,
had occasioned not a little talk and marvel in the
courts of Europe. And the same profound writer
assures us that the cabinet of England began to
entertain great jealousy and uneasiness at the
encreasing power of the Manhattoes, and the
valour
of its sturdy yeomanry.
Agents we are told, were at work from the
Amphyctionic council of the East, earnestly
urging
the cabinet to assist them in subjugating this
fierce and terrible little province, and that sagacious
cabinet, which ever likes to be dabbling in dirty
water, had already began to lend an ear to their
importunities. Just at this time Lord Baltimore,
whose bullying agent, as has before been
mentioned
,
had so alarmed Mynheer Beckman, laid his
claim before the cabinet to the lands of South river,
which he complained were unjustly and forcibly
detained from him, by these daring usurpers of the
New Nederlandts.
At this it is said his majesty Charles II, who
though Defender of the Faith, was an arrant,
lounging, rake-helly roystering wag of a Prince,
settled the whole matter by a dash of the pen, by
which he made a present of a large tract of North
America, including the province of New
Netherlands
,
to his brother the duke of Yorka donation
truly loyal, since none but great monarchs have a
right to give away, what does not belong to them.
That this munificent gift might not be merely
nominal, his majesty on the 12th of March 1664,
ordered that a gallant armament should be
forthwith
prepared, to invade the city of New
Amsterdam
by land and water, and put his brother in
complete possession of the premises.
Thus critically are situated the affairs of the
New Netherlanders. The honest burghers, so far
from thinking of the jeopardy in which their
interests
are placed, are soberly smoking their pipes
and thinking of nothing at allthe privy councillors
of the province, are at this moment snoring in full
quorum, like the drones of five hundred bagpipes,
while the active Peter, who takes all the labour of
thinking and acting upon himself, is busily devising
some method of bringing the grand council of
Amphyctions to terms. In the mean while an
angry cloud is darkly scowling on the horizon
soon shall it rattle about the ears of these dozing
Nederlanders and put the mettle of their stout
hearted governor completely to the trial.
But come what may, I here pledge my veracity,
that in all warlike conflicts and subtle perplexities,
he shall still acquit himself with the gallant bearing
and spotless honour of a noble minded obstinate
old cavalierForward then to the charge!shine
out propitious stars on the renowned city of the
Manhattoes; and may the blessing of St. Nicholas
go with theehonest Peter Stuyvesant!
CHAP. III.
Of Peter Stuyvesant's expedition into the east
Country
,
shewing that though an old bird, he did
not understand trap
.
Great nations resemble great men in this
particular
,
that their greatness is seldom known, until
they get in trouble; adversity has therefore, been
wisely denominated the ordeal of true greatness,
which like gold, can never receive its real
estimation
until it has passed through the furnace. In
proportion therefore as a nation, a community or
an individual (possessing the inherent quality of
greatness) is involved in perils and misfortunes,
in proportion does it rise in grandeurand even
when sinking under calamity, like a house on fire,
makes a more glorious display, than ever it did, in
the fairest period of its prosperity.
The vast empire of China, though teeming
with population and imbibing and concentrating the
wealth of nations, has vegetated through a
succession
of drowsy ages; and were it not for its
internal
revolution, and the subversion of its ancient
government by the Tartars, might have presented
nothing but an uninteresting detail of dull,
monotonous
prosperity. Pompeia and Herculaneum
might have passed into oblivion, with a herd of
their contemporaries, had they not been
fortunately
overwhelmed by a volcano. The renowned city
of Troy has acquired celebrity only from its ten
years distress, and final conflagrationParis rises
in importance, by the plots and massacres, which
have ended in the exaltation of the illustrious
Napoleon
and
even the mighty London itself, has
skulked through the records of time, celebrated for
nothing of moment, excepting the Plague, the great
fire and Guy Faux's gunpowder plot! Thus cities
and empires seem to creep along, enlarging in silent
obscurity under the pen of the historian, until at
length they burst forth in some tremendous
calamity
and
snatch as it were, immortality from the
explosion!
The above principle being plainly advanced,
strikingly illustrated, and readily admitted, my
reader
will need but little discernment to perceive,
that the city of New Amsterdam and its
dependent
province, are on the high road to greatness.
Dangers and hostilities threaten them from every
side, and it is really a matter of astonishment to
me, how so small a state, has been able in so short
a time, to entangle itself in so many difficulties.
Ever since the province was first taken by the
nose, at the fort of Good Hope, in the tranquil
days of Wouter Van Twiller, has it been
gradually
encreasing in historic importance; and never
could it have had a more appropriate chieftain to
conduct it to the pinnacle of grandeur, than Peter
Stuyvesant.
He was an iron headed old veteran, in whose
fiery heart sat enthroned all those five kinds of
courage described by Aristotle, and had the
philosopher
mentioned five hundred more to the back
of them, I verily believe, he would have been
found master of them allThe only misfortune
was, that he was deficient in the better part of
valour called discretion, a cold blooded virtue which
could not exist in the tropical climate of his mighty
soul. Hence it was he was continually hurrying
into those unheard of enterprises that gave an air
of chivalric romance to al his history, and hence it
was that he now conceived a project, the very
thought of which makes me to tremble while I
write.
This was no other than to repair in person to
the mighty council of the Amphyctions, bearing
the sword in one hand and the olive branch in the
otherto require immediate reparation for the
innumerable violations of that treaty which in an
evil hour he had formedto put a stop to those
repeated maraudings on the eastern bordersor
else to throw his gauntlet and appeal to arms for
satisfaction.
On declaring this resolution in his privy council,
the venerable members were seized with vast
astonishment
,
for once in their lives they ventured to
VOL. II. S
remonstrate, setting forth the rashness of exposing
his sacred person, in the midst of a strange and
barbarous people, with sundry other weighty
remonstrances
all
which had about as much influence
upon the determination of the headstrong Peter,
as though you were to endeavour to turn a rusty
weather cock, with a broken winded bellows.
Summoning therefore to his presence, his trusty
follower Antony Van Corlear, he commanded him
to hold himself in readiness to accompany him the
following morning, on this his hazardous enterprise.
Now Antony the trumpeter was a little stricken
in years, yet by dint of keeping up a good heart,
and having never known care or sorrow (having
never been married) he was still a hearty, jocund
rubicond, gamesome wag, and of great capacity in
the doublet. This last was ascribed to his living a
jolly life on those domains at the Hook, which Peter
Stuyvesant had granted to him, for his gallantry at
Fort Casimer.
Be this as it may, there was nothing that more
delighted Antony, than this command of the great
Peter, for he could have followed the stout hearted
old governor to the world's end, with love and
loyalty
and
he moreover still remembered the
frolicking
and dancing and bundling, and other disports
of the east country, and entertained dainty
recollection
of numerous kind and buxom lasses, whom
he longed exceedingly again to encounter.
Thus then did this mirror of hardihood set
forth, with no other attendant but his trumpeter,
upon one of the most perilous enterprises ever
recorded in the annals of Knight errantry.For a
single warrior to venture openly among a whole
nation of foes; but above all, for a plain downright
dutchman to think of negociating with the whole
council of New Englandnever was there known
a more desperate undertaking!Ever since I have
entered upon the chronicles of this peerless but
hitherto uncelebrated chieftain, has he kept me in
a state of incessant action and anxiety with the
toils and dangers he is constantly encountering
Oh! for a chapter of the tranquil reign of Wouter
Van Twiller, that I might repose on it as on a
feather bed!
Is it not enough Peter Stuyvesant, that I have
once already rescued thee from the machinations
of these terrible Amphyctions, by bringing the
whole powers of witchcraft to thine aid?Is it not
enough, that I have followed thee undaunted, like
a guardian spirit, into the midst of the horrid battle
of Fort Christina?That I have been put
incessantly
to my trumps to keep thee safe and sound
now warding off with my single pen the shower
of dastard blows that fell upon thy rearnow
narrowly
shielding thee from a deadly thrust, by a mere
tobacco boxnow casing thy dauntless scull with
adamant, when even thy stubborn ram beaver failed
to resist the sword of the stout Risinghand now,
not merely bringing thee off alive, but triumphant,
from the clutches of the gigantic Swede, by the
desperate means of a paltry stone pottle?Is not
all this enough, but must thou still be plunging into
new difficulties and jeopardizing in headlong
enterprises
,
thyself, thy trumpeter, and thy historian!
But all this is empty talk. What influence can
I expect to have, when even his councillors, who
never before attempted to advise him in their lives,
have spoken to no effect. All that remains is quietly
to take up my pen, as did Antony his trumpet, and
faithfully follow at his heelsand I swear that, like
the latter, so truly do I love the hairbrained valour
of this fierce old Cavalier, that I feel as if I could
follow him through the world, even though (which
Heaven forefend) he should lead me through another
volume of adventures.
And now the ruddy faced Aurora, like a buxom
chamber-maid, draws aside the sable curtains of the
night, and out bounces from his bed the jolly red
haired Phbus, startled at being caught so late in
the embraces of Dame Thetis. With many a stable
oath, he harnesses his brazen footed steeds, and
whips and lashes, and splashes up the firmament,
like a loitering post boy, half an hour behind his
time. And now behold that imp of fame and
prowess the headstrong Peter, bestriding a raw
boned, switch tailed charger, gallantly arrayed in
full regimentals, and bracing on his thigh that trusty
brass hilted sword, which had wrought such fearful
deeds on the banks of the Delaware.
Behold hard after him his doughty trumpeter
Van Corlear, mounted on a broken winded, wall
eyed, calico mare; his sturdy stone pottle which
had laid low the mighty Risingh, slung under his
arm, and his trumpet displayed vauntingly in his right
hand, decorated with a gorgeous banner, on which
is emblazoned the great beaver of the
Manhattoes
.
See them proudly issuing out of the city
gate, like an iron clad hero of yore, with his
faithful
squire at his heels, the populace following them
with their eyes, and shouting many a parting wish,
and hearty cheering.Farewel, Hard-koppig Piet!
Farewel honest Antony!Pleasant be your
wayfaring
prosperous
your return! The stoutest hero
that ever drew a sword, and the worthiest
trumpeter
that ever trod shoe leather!
Legends are lamentably silent about the events
that befel our adventurers, in this their adventurous
travel, excepting the Stuyvesant Manuscript, which
gives the substance of a pleasant little heroic poem,
written on the occasion by Domine gidius Luyck,
[17]
[17]
This Luyck, was moreover, rector of the Latin school in
Nieuw Nederlandt, 1663. There are two pieces of verses to
gidius Luyck in D. Selyn's MSS. of poesies, upon his marriage
with Judith Van Isendoorn. Old MS.
who appears to have been the poet-laureat of New
S 2
Amsterdam. This inestimable manuscript assures
us, that it was a rare spectacle to behold the great
Peter and his loyal follower, hailing the morning
sun, and rejoicing in the clear countenance of
nature, as they pranced it through the pastoral
scenes of Bloemen Dael;
Now called Blooming Dale, about four miles
from New York.
which in those days was
a sweet and rural valley, beautified with many a
bright wild flower, refreshed by many a pure
streamlet, and enlivened here and there by a
delectable
little dutch cottage, sheltered under some gently
swelling hill, and almost buried in embowering
trees.
Now did they enter upon the confines of
Connecticut
,
where they encountered many grievous
difficulties and perils. At one place they were
assailed
by some half a score of country squires and
militia colonels, who, mounted on goodly steeds, hung
upon their rear for several miles, harassing them
exceedingly with guesses and questions, more
especially
the worthy Peter, whose silver chas'd leg
excited
not a little marvel. At another place hard
by the renowned town of Stamford, they were set
upon by a great and mighty legion of church
deacons
,
who imperiously demanded of them five
shillings
,
for travelling on Sunday, and threatened to
carry them captive to a neighbouring church whose
steeple peer'd above the trees; but these the valiant
Peter put to rout with little difficulty, insomuch
that they bestrode their canes and gallopped off in
horrible confusion, leaving their cocked hats behind
in the hurry of their flight. But not so easily did
he escape from the hands of a crafty man of
Pyquag
;
who with undaunted perseverance, and
repeated
onsets, fairly bargained him out of his
goodly
switch-tailed charger, leaving in place thereof a
villainous, spavined, foundered Narraganset pacer.
But maugre all these hardships, they pursued
their journey cheerily, along the course of the soft
flowing Connecticut, whose gentle waves, says the
song, roll through many a fertile vale, and sunny
plain; now reflecting the lofty spires of the bustling
city, and now the rural beauties of the humble
hamlet; now echoing with the busy hum of
commerce
,
and now with the cheerful song of the
peasant
.
At every town would Peter Stuyvesant, who
was noted for warlike punctilio, order the sturdy
Antony to sound a courteous salutation; though
the manuscript observes, that the inhabitants were
thrown into great dismay, when they heard of his
approach. For the fame of his incomparable
atchievements
on the Delaware, had spread
throughout
the East country, and they dreaded lest he had
come to take vengeance on their manifold
transgressions
.
But the good Peter rode through these towns
with a smiling aspect; waving his hand with
inexpressible
majesty and condescension; for he verily
believed
that the old clothes which these ingenious
people
had thrust into their broken windows, and the
festoons of dried apples and peaches which
ornamented
the fronts of their houses, were so many
decorations in honour of his approach; as it was
the custom in days of chivalry, to compliment
renowned
heroes, by sumptuous displays of tapestry
and gorgeous furniture. The women crowded to
the doors to gaze upon him as he passed, so much
does prowess in arms, delight the gentle sex. The
little children too ran after him in troops, staring
with wonder at his regimentals, his brimstone
breeches, and the silver garniture of his wooden leg.
Nor must I omit to mention the joy which many
strapping wenches betrayed, at beholding the jovial
Van Corlear, who had whilome delighted them so
much with his trumpet, when he bore the great
Peter's challenge to the Amphyctions. The
kindhearted
Antony alighted from his calico mare, and
kissed them all with infinite loving kindnessand
was right pleased to see a crew of little trumpeters
crowding around him for his blessing; each of
whom he patted on the head, bade him be a good
boy, and gave him a penny to buy molasses candy.
The Stuyvesant manuscript makes but little
further mention of the governor's adventures upon
this expedition, excepting that he was received
with extravagant courtesy and respect by the great
council of the Amphyctions, who almost talked him
to death with complimentary and congratulatory
harangues. Of his negociations with the grand
council I shall say nothing, as there are more
important
matters which call for the attention of
myself
,
my readers, and Peter Stuyvesant. Suffice it
to mention, it was like all other negociationsa
great deal was said, and very little done: one
conversation
led to anotherone conference begat
misunderstandings which it took a dozen
conferences
to explain; at the end of which the parties
found themselves just where they were at first;
excepting that they had entangled themselves in a
host of questions of etiquette, and conceived a
cordial
distrust of each other that rendered their future
negociations ten times more difficult than ever.
[18]
[18]
For certain of the particulars of this ancient negociation see
Haz. Col. State Pap. It is singular that Smith is entirely silent
with respect to the memorable expedition of Peter Stuyvesant
above treated of by Mr. Knickerbocker,
Editor
.
In the midst of all these perplexities, which
bewildered the brain and incensed the ire of the
sturdy Peter, who was of all men in the world,
perhaps
,
the least fitted for diplomatic wiles, he
privately
received the first intimation of the dark
conspiracy
which had been matured in the Cabinet of
England. To this was added the astounding
intelligence
that a hostile squadron had already sailed
from England, destined to reduce the province of
New Netherlands, and that the grand council of
Amphyctions had engaged to co-operate, by
sending
a great army to invade New Amsterdam by
land.
Unfortunate Peter! did I not enter with sad
forebodings upon this ill starred expedition! did I
not tremble when I saw thee, with no other
councillor
but thine own head, with no other armour but
an honest tongue, a spotless conscience and a rusty
sword! with no other protector but St. Nicholas
and no other attendant but a brokenwinded
trumpeter
Did
I not tremble when I beheld thee thus
sally forth, to contend with all the knowing powers
of New England.
Oh how did the sturdy old warrior rage and
roar, when he found himself thus entrapped, like a
lion in the hunter's toil. Now did he determine to
draw his trusty sword, and manfully to fight his
way through all the countries of the east. Now
did he resolve to break in upon the council of the
Amphyctions and put every mother's son of them
to death.At length, as his direful wrath
subsided
,
he resorted to safer though less glorious
expedients
.
Concealing from the council his knowledge of
their machinations, he privately dispatched a trusty
messenger, with missives to his councillors at New
Amsterdam, apprizing them of the impending
danger
,
commanding them immediately to put the city
in a posture of defence, while in the mean time he
endeavoured to elude his enemies and come to
their assistance. This done he felt himself
marvellously
relieved, rose slowly, shook himself like a
rhinoceros, and issued forth from his den, in much
the same manner as giant Despair is described to
have issued from Doubting castle, in the chivalric
history of the Pilgrim's Progress.
And now much does it grieve me that I must
leave the gallant Peter in this perilous jeopardy:
but it behoves us to hurry back and see what is
going on at New Amsterdam, for greatly do I fear
that city is already in a turmoil. Such was ever
the fate of Peter Stuyvesant, while doing one thing
with heart and soul, he was too apt to leave every
thing else at sixes and sevens. While, like a
potentate
of yore, he was absent attending to those
things in person, which in modern days are trusted
to generals and ambassadors, his little territory at
home was sure to get in an uproarAll which was
owing to that uncommon strength of intellect, which
induced him to trust to nobody but himself, and
which had acquired him the renowned appellation
of Peter the Headstrong.
CHAP. IV.
How the people of New Amsterdam, were thrown
into a great panic, by the news of a threatened
invasion, and how they fortified themselves very
stronglywith resolutions
.
There
is no sight more truly interesting to a
philosopher, than to contemplate a community,
where every individual has a voice in public affairs,
where every individual thinks himself the atlas of
the nation, and where every individual thinks it his
duty to bestir himself for the good of his country
I say, there is nothing more interesting to a
philosopher
,
than to see such a community in a sudden
bustle of war. Such a clamour of tonguessuch
a bawling of patriotismsuch running hither and
thitherevery body in a hurryevery body up to
the ears in troubleevery body in the way, and every
body interrupting his industrious neighbourwho is
busily employed in doing nothing! It is like
witnessing
a great fire, where every man is at work
like a herosome dragging about empty engines
others scampering with full buckets, and spilling the
contents into the boots of their neighboursand
others ringing the church bells all night, by way of
putting out the fire. Little firemenlike sturdy
little knights storming a breach, clambering up and
down scaling ladders, and bawling through tin
trumpets, by way of directing the attack.Here
one busy fellow, in his great zeal to save the
property
of the unfortunate, catches up an anonymous
chamber utensil, and gallants it off with an air of
as much self importance, as if he had rescued a pot
of moneyanother throws looking glasses and
china, out of the window, by way of saving them
from the flames, while those who can do nothing
else, to assist in the great calamity run up and
down the streets with open throats, keeping up an
incessant cry of
Fire! Fire! Fire!
When the news arrived at Corinth, says the
grave and profound Lucianthough I own the
story is rather trite, that Philip was about to
attack
them, the inhabitants were thrown into violent
alarm. Some ran to furbish up their arms; others
rolled stones to build up the wallsevery body in
short, was employed, and every body was in the
way of his neighbour. Diogenes alone, was the
only man who could find nothing to dowhereupon
determining not to be idle when the welfare of his
country was at stake, he tucked up his robe, and
fell to rolling his tub with might and main, up and
down the Gymnasium. In like manner did every
mother's son, in the patriotic community of New
Amsterdam, on receiving the missives of Peter
Stuyvesant, busy himself most mightily in putting
things in confusion, and assisting the general uproar.
VOL. II. T
Every mansaith the Stuyvesant Manuscript
flew to arms!by which is meant, that not one
of our honest dutch citizens would venture to
church or to market, without an old fashioned spit
of a sword, dangling at his side, and a long dutch
fowling piece on his shouldernor would he go
out of a night without a lanthorn; nor turn a
corner, without first peeping cautiously round, lest
he should come unawares upon a British army
And we are informed, that Stoffel Brinkerhoff, who
was considered by the old women, almost as brave
a man as the governor himselfactually had two
one pound swivels mounted in his entry, one
pointing
out at the front door, and the other at the
back.
But the most strenuous measure resorted to on
this aweful occasion, and one which has since been
found of wonderful efficacy, was to assemble popular
meetings. These brawling convocations, I have
already shewn, were extremely obnoxious to Peter
Stuyvesant, but as this was a moment of unusual
agitation, and as the old governor was not present
to repress them, they broke out with intolerable
violence. Hither therefore, the orators and
politicians
repaired, and there seemed to be a competition
among them, who should bawl the loudest, and
exceed the other in hyperbolical bursts of patriotism,
and in resolutions to uphold and defend the
government
.
In these sage and all powerful meetings it
was determined
nem. con.
that they were the most
enlightened, the most dignified, the most formidable
and the most ancient community upon the face of
the earthand finding that this resolution was so
universally and readily carried, another was
immediately
proposedwhether it was not possible
and politic to exterminate Great Britain? upon
which sixty nine members spoke most eloquently
in the affirmative, and only one arose to suggest
some doubtswho as a punishment for his
treasonable
presumption, was immediately seized by the
mob and tarred and featheredwhich punishment
being equivalent to the Tarpeian Rock, he was
afterwards considered as an outcast from society
and his opinion went for nothingThe question
therefore, being unanimously carried in the
affirmative
,
it was recommended to the grand council to
pass it into a law; which was accordingly done
By this measure the hearts of the people at large
were wonderfully encouraged, and they waxed
exceeding
choleric and valourousIndeed the first
paroxysm of alarm having in some measure
subsided
;
the old women having buried all the money
they could lay their hands on; and their husbands
daily getting fuddled with what was leftthe
community
began even to stand on the offensive. Songs
were manufactured in low dutch and sung about
the streets, wherein the English were most woefully
beaten, and shewn no quarter, and popular addresses
were made, wherein it was proved to a certainty,
that the fate of old England depended upon the
will of the New Amsterdammers.
Finally, to strike a violent blow at the very
vitals of Great Britain, a grand caucus of the wiser
inhabitants assembled; and having purchased all
the British manufactures they could find, they
made thereof a huge bonfireand in the patriotic
glow of the moment, every man present, who had a
hat or breeches of English workmanship, pulled it
off and threw it most undauntedly into the flames
to the irreparable detriment, loss and ruin of the
English manufacturers. In commemoration of this
great exploit, they erected a pole on the spot, with
a device on the top intended to represent the
province of Nieuw Nederlandts destroying Great
Britain, under the similitude of an Eagle picking
the little Island of Old England out of the globe;
but either through the unskillfulness of the sculptor,
or his ill timed waggery, it bore a striking
resemblance
to a goose, vainly striving to get hold of a
dumpling.
CHAP. V.
Shewing how the grand Council of the New
Netherlands
came to be miraculously gifted with long
tongues.Together with a great triumph of
Economy
.
It will need but very little witchcraft on the
part of my enlightened readerparticularly if he is
in any wise acquainted with the ways and habits of
that most potent and blustering monarch, the
sovereign
peopleto discover, that notwithstanding all
the incredible bustle and talk of war that stunned
him in the last chapter, the renowned city of New
Amsterdam is in sad reality, not a whit better
prepared
for defence than before. Now, though the
people, having got over the first alarm, and finding
no enemy immediately at hand, had with that
valour
of tongue, for which your illustrious rabble is
so famous, run into the opposite extreme, and by
dint of gallant vapouring and rodomontado had
actually
talked themselves into the opinion that they
were the bravest and most powerful people under
the sun, yet were the privy councillors of Peter
Stuyvesant somewhat dubious on that point. They
dreaded moreover lest that stern hero should
return
and find, that instead of obeying his
peremptory
orders, they had wasted their time in listening
T 2
to the valiant hectorings of the mob, than which
they well knew there was nothing he held in more
exalted contempt.
To make up therefore as speedily as possible
for lost time, a grand divan of the councillors and
robustious Burgomasters was convened, to talk over
the critical state of the province and devise
measures
for its safety. Two things were
unanimously
agreed upon in this venerable assembly: first,
that the city required to be put in a state of
defence
and
secondly, That as the danger was
imminent
,
there should no time be lostwhich points
being settled, they immediately fell to making long
speeches and belabouring one another in endless
and intemperate disputes. For about this time
was this unhappy city first visited by that talking
endemic so universally prevalent in this country,
and which so invariably evinces itself, wherever a
number of wise men assemble together; breaking
out in long, windy speeches, caused, as physicians
suppose, by the foul air which is ever generated
in a crowd. Now it was, moreover, that they first
introduced the ingenious method of measuring the
merits of an harangue by the hour-glass; he being
considered the ablest orator who spoke longest on a
questionFor which excellent invention it is
recorded
,
we are indebted to the same profound
dutch critic who judged of books by their bulk,
and gave a prize medal to a stupendous volume of
flummerybecause it was as tick as a cheese.
The reporters of the day, therefore, in
publishing
the debates of the grand council, seem merely
to have noticed the length of time each member
was on the floorand the only record I can find of
the proceedings in the important business of which
we are treating, mentions, that Mynheermade
a very animated speech of six hours and a half, in
favour of fortificationHe was followed by
Mynheer
on
the other side, who spoke with great
clearness and precision for about eight hours
Mynheersuggested an amendment of the bill
by substituting in the eighth line, the words `
four
and twenty
,' instead of `twenty four,' in support of
which he offered a few remarks, which only took
up three hours and a quarterand was followed by
Mynheer Windroer in a most pithy, nervous,
concise
,
elegant, ironical, argumentative strain of
eloquence
,
superior to any thing which ever issued
from the lips of a Cicero, a Demosthenes, or any
orator, either of antient or modern timeshe
occupied
the floor the whole of yesterday; this
morning
he arose in continuation, and is in the middle
of the second branch of his discourse, at this present
writing; having already carried the council through
their second napWe regret, concludes this
worthy reporter, that the irresistable propensity
of our Stenographer to nod, will prevent us from
giving the substance of this truly luminous and
lengthy
speech.
This sudden passion for endless harangues, so
little consonant with the customary gravity and
taciturnity of our sage forefathers, is supposed by
certain learned philosophers of the time, to have
been imbibed, together with divers other barbarous
propensities, from their savage neighbours; who
were peculiarly noted for their
long talks
and
council
fires;
and who would never undertake any affair
of the least importance, without previous debates
and harangues among their chiefs and
old men
.
But let its origin be what it may, it is without
doubt a cruel and distressing disease, which has
never been eradicated from the body politic to this
day; but is continually breaking out, on all
occasions
of great agitation, in alarming and obnoxious
flatulencies, whereby the said body politic is
grievously
afflicted, as with a wind cholic.
Thus then did Madam Wisdom, (who for some
unaccountable, but doubtlessly whimsical reason,
the wits of antiquity have represented under the
form of a woman) seem to take a mischievous
pleasure in jilting the grave and venerable
councillors
of New Amsterdam. The old factions of
Square heads and Platter Breeches, which had been
almost strangled by the herculean grasp of Peter
Stuyvesant, now sprung up with tenfold violence
To complete the public confusion and
bewilderment
,
the fatal word
Economy
, which one would
have thought was dead and buried with William
the Testy, was once more set afloat, like the apple
of discord, in the grand council of the New
Nederlandts
according
to which sound principle of policy,
it was deemed more expedient to throw away twenty
thousand guilders upon an inefficient plan of defence,
than thirty thousand on a good and substantial one
the province thus making a clear saving of ten
thousand guilders.
But when they came to discuss the mode of
defence, then began a war of words that baffles all
description. The members being, as I observed,
drawn out into opposite parties, were enabled to
proceed with amazing system and regularity in the
discussion of the questions before them. Whatever
was proposed by a Square head, was opposed by the
whole tribe of Platter breeches, who like true
politicians
,
considered it their first duty to effect the
downfall of the Square headstheir second, to
elevate
themselves, and their third, to consult the
welfare
of the country. This at least was the creed
of the most upright among the party, for as to the
great mass, they left the third consideration out of
the question altogether.
In this great collision of hard heads, it is
astonishing
the number of projects for defence, that
were struck out, not one of which had ever been
heard of before, nor has been heard of since, unless
it be in very modern daysprojects that threw
the windmill system of the ingenious Kieft
completely
in the back groundStill, however, nothing
could be decided on, for as fast as a formidable
host of air castles were reared by one party, they
were demolished by the otherthe simple populace
stood gazing in anxious expectation of the mighty
egg, that was to be hatched, with all this cackling,
but they gazed in vain, for it appeared that the
grand council was determined to protect the
province
as did the noble and gigantic Pantagruel his
armyby covering it with his tongue.
Indeed there was a magnanimous portion of
the members, fat, self important old burghers, who
smoked their pipes and said nothing, excepting to
negative every plan of defence that was offered.
These were of that class of wealthy old citizens
who having amassed a fortune, button up their
pockets, shut their mouths, look rich and are good
for nothing all the rest of their lives. Like some
phlegmetic oyster, which having swallowed a pearl,
closes its shell, settles down in the mud and parts
with its life sooner than its treasure. Every plan
of defence seemed to these worthy old gentlemen
pregnant with ruin. An armed force was a legion
of locusts, preying upon the public propertyto
fit out a naval armament was to throw their money
into the seato build fortifications was to bury it in
the dirt. In short they settled it as a sovereign
maxim, so long as their pockets were full, no
matter
how much they were drubbedA kick left no
scara broken head cured itselfbut an empty
purse was of all maladies the slowest to heal, and
one in which nature did nothing for the patient.
Thus did this venerable assembly of
sages
,
lavish away that time which the urgency of affairs
rendered invaluable, in empty brawls and long
winded arguments, without even agreeing, except
on the point with which they started, namely, that
there was no time to be lost, and delay was
ruinous
.
At length St. Nicholas, taking compassion
on their distracted situation, and anxious to preserve
them from total anarchy, so ordered, that in the
midst of one of their most noisy and patriotic
debates
,
when they had nearly fallen to loggerheads
in consequence of not being able to convince each
other, the question was happily settled by a
messenger
,
who bounced into the chamber and
informed
them, that the hostile fleet had arrived, and
was actually advancing up the bay!
Thus was all further necessity of either
fortifying
or disputing completely obviated, and thus was
the grand council saved a world of words, and the
province a world of expensea most absolute and
glorious triumph of economy!
CHAP. VI.
In which the troubles of New Amsterdam appear to
thickenShewing the bravery in time of peril, of a
people who defend themselves by resolutions
.
Like
a ward committee of politic cats, who,
when engaged in clamorous gibberings, and
catterwaulings
,
eyeing one another with hideous
grimaces
,
spitting in each other's faces, and on the point
of breaking forth into a general clapper-clawing, are
suddenly put to scampering rout and confusion
by the startling appearance of a house-dogSo was
the no less vociferous council of New Amsterdam,
amazed, astounded, and totally dispersed, by the
sudden arrival of the enemy. Every member made
the best of his way home, waddling along as fast as
his short legs could fag under their heavy burthen,
and wheezing as he went with corpulency and
terror
.
When he arrived at his castle, he barricadoed
the street door, and buried himself in the cider
cellar
,
without daring to peep out, lest he should have
his head carried off by a cannon ball.
The sovereign people all crowded into the
market
place, herding together with the instinct of sheep
who seek for safety in each others company, when
the shepherd and his dog are absent and the wolf is
prowling round the fold. Far from finding relief
however, they only encreased each others terrors.
Each man looked ruefully in his neighbour's face, in
search of encouragement, but only found in its woe
begone lineaments, a confirmation of his own
dismay
.
Not a word now was to be heard of
conquering
Great Britain, not a whisper about the
sovereign
virtues of economywhile the old women
heightened the general gloom by clamorously
bewailing
their fate, and incessantly calling for
protection
on St. Nicholas and Peter Stuyvesant.
Oh how did they bewail the absence of the lion
hearted Peter!and how did they long for the
comforting
presence of Antony Van Corlear! Indeed
a gloomy uncertainty hung over the fate of these
adventurous heroes. Day after day had elapsed
since the alarming message from the governor,
without bringing any further tidings of his safety.
Many a fearful conjecture was hazarded as to what
had befallen him and his loyal squire. Had they
not been devoured alive by the Cannibals of
Piscataway
and Cape Cod?where they not put to the
question by the great council of Amphyctions?
where they not smothered in onions by the terrible
men of Pyquag?In the midst of this
consternation
and perplexity, when horror like a mighty
night-mare sat brooding upon the little, fat,
plethoric
city of New Amsterdam, the ears of the
multitude
were suddenly startled by a strange and
distant
soundit approachedit grew louder and
VOL. II. U
louderand now it resounded at the city gate. The
public could not be mistaken in the well known
soundA shout of joy burst from their lips as the
gallant Peter, covered with dust, and followed by
his faithful trumpeter, came gallopping into the
market
place.
The first transports of the populace having
subsided
,
they gathered round the honest Antony, as
he dismounted from his horse, overwhelming him
with greetings and congratulations. In breathless
accents he related to them the marvellous
adventures
through which the old governor and himself
had gone, in making their escape from the clutches
of the terrible Amphyctions. But though the
Stuyvesant Manuscript, with its customary
minuteness
where any thing touching the great Peter is
concerned, is very particular, as to the incidents of
this masterly retreat, yet the critical state of the
public affairs, will not allow me to indulge in a full
recital thereof. Let it suffice to say, that while
Peter Stuyvesant was anxiously revolving in his
mind, how he could make good his escape with
honour and dignity, certain of the ships sent out
for the conquest of the Manhattoes touched at the
Eastern ports, to obtain needful supplies, and to call
on the grand council of the league, for its promised
co-operation. Upon hearing of this, the vigilant
Peter, perceiving that a moment's delay was fatal,
made a secret and precipitate decampment, though
much did it grieve his lofty soul, to be obliged to
turn his back even upon a nation of foes. Many
hair-breadth scapes and divers perilous mishaps,
did they sustain, as they scoured, without sound of
trumpet, through the fair regions of the east.
Already was the country in an uproar with hostile
preparationand they were obliged to take a large
circuit in their flight, lurking along, through the
woody mountains of the Devil's back bone; from
whence the valiant Peter sallied forth one day, like a
lion, and put to route a whole legion of squatters,
consisting of three generations of a prolific family,
who were already on their way to take possession
of some corner of the New Netherlands. Nay,
the faithful Antony had great difficulty at sundry
times, to prevent him in the excess of his wrath,
from descending down from the mountains, and
falling sword in hand, upon certain of the border
towns, who were marshalling forth their
draggletailed
militia.
The first movements of the governor on
reaching
his dwelling, was to mount the roof, from
whence he contemplated with rueful aspect the
hostile
squadron. This had already come to anchor
in the bay, and consisted of two stout frigates,
having on board, as John Josselyn, gent. informs
us, three hundred valiant red coats. Having taken
this survey, he sat himself down, and wrote an
epistle to the commander, demanding the reason of
his anchoring in the harbour without obtaining
previous permission so to do. This letter was
couched in the most dignified and courteous terms,
though I have it from undoubted authority, that
his teeth were clinched, and he had a bitter
sardonic grin upon his visage, all the while
he wrote. Having dispatched his letter, the grim
Peter stumped to and fro about the town, with a
most war-betokening countenance, his hands thrust
into his breeches pockets, and whistling a low dutch
psalm tune, which bore no small resemblance to
the music of a north east wind, when a storm is
brewingthe very dogs as they eyed him skulked
away in dismaywhile all the old and ugly women
of New Amsterdam, ran howling at his heels,
imploring
him to save them from murder, robbery,
and piteous ravishment!
The reply of Col. Nichols, who commanded
the invaders, was couched in terms of equal courtesy
with the letter of the governordeclaring the right
and title of his British Majesty to the province;
where he affirmed the dutch to be mere interlopers;
and demanding that the town, forts, &c. should be
forthwith rendered into his majesty's obedience
and protectionpromising at the same time, life,
liberty, estate and free trade, to every dutch
denizen
,
who should readily submit to his majesty's
government.
Peter Stuyvesant read over this friendly epistle
with some such harmony of aspect as we may
suppose
a crusty farmer, who has long been fattening
upon his neighbour's soil, reads the loving letter of
John Stiles, that warns him of an action of
ejectment
.
The old governor however, was not to be
taken by surprize, but thrusting, according to
custom
,
a huge quid of tobacco into his cheek, and
cramming the summons into his breeches pocket,
promised to answer it the next morning. In the
mean time he called a general council of war of his
privy councillors and Burgomasters, not for the
purpose of asking their advice, for that, as has been
already shewn, he valued not a rush; but to make
known unto them his sovereign determination, and
require their prompt adherence.
Before, however, he convened his council he
resolved
upon three important points;
first
, never to
give up the city without a little hard fighting, for he
deemed it highly derogatory to the dignity of so
renowned
a city, to suffer itself to be captured and
stripped
,
without receiving a few kicks into the bargain.
Secondly
, that the majority of his grand council
were a crew of arrant platter breeches, utterly
destitute
of true bottomand
thirdly
that he would
not therefore suffer them to see the summons of
Col. Nichols, lest the easy terms it held out, might
induce them to clamour for a surrender.
His orders being duly promulgated, it was a
piteous sight to behold the late valiant
Burgomasters
,
who had demolished the whole British empire
U 2
in their harangues; peeping ruefully out of their
nests, and then crawling cautiously forth, dodging
through narrow lanes and alleys; starting at every
little dog that barked, as if it had been a discharge of
artillerymistaking lamp posts for British
grenadiers
,
and in the excess of their panic,
metamorphosing
pumps into formidable soldiers, levelling
blunderbusses at their bosoms! Having however,
in despite of numerous perils and difficulties of the
kind, arrived safe, without the loss of a single man,
at the hall of assembly, they took their seats and
awaited in fearful silence the arrival of the governor.
In a few moments the wooden leg of the intrepid
Peter, was heard in regular and stout-hearted
thumps upon the stair caseHe entered the
cahmber
,
arrayed in full suit of regimentals, a more
than ordinary quantity of flour shook into his ear
locks, and carrying his trusty toledo, not girded on
his thigh, but tucked under his arm. As the
governor
never equipped himself in this portentous
manner, unless something of martial nature was
working within his fearless pericranium, his council
regarded him ruefully as a very Janus bearing
fire and sword in his iron countenanceand forgot
to light their pipes in breathless suspence.
The great Peter was as eloquent as he was
valorousindeed these two rare qualities
seemed
to go hand in hand in his composition; and,
unlike
most great statesmen, whose victories are only
confined to the bloodless field of argument, he
was always ready to enforce his hardy words, by
no less hardy deeds. Like another Gustavus
addressing
his Dalecarlians, he touched upon the
perils and hardships he had sustained in escaping
from his inexorable foesHe next reproached the
council for wasting in idle debate and impertinent
personalities that time which should have been
devoted to their countryhe then recalled the
golden days of former prosperity, which were only
to be regained by manfully withstanding their
enemiesendeavoured to rouse their martial fire,
by reminding them of the time, when, before the
frowning walls of fort Christina, he led them on to
victorywhen they had subdued a whole army of
fifty Swedesand subjugated an immense extent
of uninhabited territory.He strove likewise to
awaken their confidence, by assuring them of the
protection of St. Nicholas; who had hitherto
maintained them in safety; amid all the savages of
the wilderness, the witches and squatters of the
east, and the giants of Merry land. Finally he
informed them of the insolent summons he had
received, to surrender, but concluded by swearing
to defend the province as long as heaven was on
his side, and he had a wooden leg to stand upon.
Which noble sentence he emphasized by a
tremendous
thwack with the broad side of his sword upon
the table, that totally electrified his auditors.
The privy councillors, who had long been
accustomed
to the governor's way, and in fact had
been brought into as perfect dicipline, as were ever
the soldiers of the great Frederick; saw that there
was no use in saying a wordso lighted their pipes
and smoked away in silence, like fat and discreet
councillors. But the Burgomasters being less
under
the governor's controulconsidering
themselves
as representatives of the sovereign people,
and being moreover inflated with considerable
importance
and self-sufficiency, which they had
acquired
at those notable schools of wisdom and
morality
,
the popular meetings; (whereof in fact I am
told certain of them had been chairmen) these I
say, were not so easily satisfied. Mustering up
fresh spirit, when they found there was some
chance of escaping from their present perilous
jeopardy
,
without the disagreeable alternative of
fighting
,
they arrogantly requested a copy of the
summons
to surrender, that they might shew it to a
general meeting of the people.
So insolent and mutinous a request would have
been enough to have roused the gorge of the
tranquil
Van Twiller himselfwhat then must have
been its effect upon the great Stuyvesant, who was
not only a Dutchman, a Governor, and a valiant
wooden legged soldier to boot, but withal a man of
the most stomachful and gunpowder disposition.
He burst forth into a blaze of heroical indignation,
to which the famous rage of Achilles was a mere
pouting fitswore not a mother's son of them
should see a syllable of itthat they deserved,
every one of them, to be hung, drawn and
quartered
,
for traitorously daring to question the
infallibility
of governmentthat as to their advice or
concurrence, he did not care a whiff of tobacco for
eitherthat he had long been harrassed and
thwarted
by their cowardly councils; but that they might
henceforth go home, and go to bed like old women;
for he was determined to defend the colony
himself
,
without the assistance of them or their
adherents
!
So saying he tucked his sword under his
arm, cocked his hat upon his head, and girding
up his loins, stumped indignantly out of the
council
chamberevery body making room for him as
he passed.
No sooner had he gone than the sturdy
Burgomasters
called a public meeting in front of the
Stadt-house, where they appointed as chairman one
Dofue Roerback, a mighty gingerbread baker in the
land, and formerly of the cabinet of William the
Testy. He was looked up to, with great reverence
by the populace, who considered him a man of
dark knowledge, seeing he was the first that
imprinted
new year cakes with the mysterious
hieroglyphics
of the Cock and Breeches, and such like
magical devices.
This great Burgomaster, who still chewed the
cud of ill will against the valiant Stuyvesant, in
consequence
of having been ignominiously kicked out
of his cabinetaddressed the greasy multitude in
an exceeding long-winded speech, in which he
informed
them of the courteous summons to
surrender
of
the governor's refusal to comply therewith
of his denying the public a sight of the summons,
which he had no doubt, from the well known
liberality
,
humanity, and forbearance, of the British
nation
,
contained conditions highly to the honour and
advantage of the province.
He then proceeded to speak of his excellency
in high sounding terms, suitable to the dignity and
grandeur of his station, comparing him to Nero,
Caligula, and other great men of yore, of whom he
had often heard William the Testy discourse in his
learned moodsAssuring the people, that the
history
of the world did not contain a despotic outrage
to equal the present, for atrocity, cruelty, tyranny,
blood-thirstiness, battle, murder, and sudden death
that it would be recorded in letters of fire, on the
blood-stained tablet of history! that ages would
roll back with sudden horror, when they came to
view it! That the womb of time(by the way
your orators and writers take strange liberties with
the womb of time, though some would fain have us
believe that time is an old gentleman) that the
womb of time, pregnant as it was with direful
horrors
,
would never produce a parallel enormity!
that posterity would be struck dumb with petrifying
astonishment, and howl in unavailing indignation,
over the records of irremediable barbarity!With
a variety of other heart-rending, soul stirring tropes
and figures, which I cannot enumerateNeither
indeed need I, for they were exactly the same that
are used in all popular harangues and fourth of July
orations at the present day, and may be classed in
rhetoric under the general title of
Rigmarole
.
The patriotic address of Burgomaster Roerback
had a wonderful effect upon the populace, who, though
a race of sober phlegmatic Dutchmen, were
amazing
quick at discerning insults; for your ragged
rabble, though it may bear injuries without a
murmur
,
yet is always marvellously jealous of its
sovereign
dignity. They immediately fell into the
pangs of tumultuous labour, and brought forth, not
only a string of right wise and valiant resolutions,
but likewise a most resolute memorial, addressed
to the governor, remonstrating at his conduct
which he no sooner received than he handed it into
the fire; and thus deprived posterity of an
invaluable
document, that might have served as a
precedent
to the enlightened coblers and taylors, of the
present day, in their sage intermeddlings with
politics
.
CHAP. VII.
Containing a doleful disaster of Antony the
Trumpeter
And
how Peter Stuyvesant, like a second
Cromwell suddenly dissolved a rump Parliament
.
Now did the high minded Pieter
de Groodt
,
shower down a pannier load of benedictions upon
his Burgomasters, for a set of self-willed, obstinate,
headstrong varlets, who would neither be
convinced
nor persuaded; and determined henceforth to
have nothing more to do with them, but to consult
merely the opinion of his privy councillors, which
he knew from experience to be the best in the
worldinasmuch as it never differed from his own.
Nor did he omit, now that his hand was in, to
bestow
some thousand left-handed compliments upon
the sovereign people; whom he railed at for a herd
of arrant poltroons, who had no relish for the
glorious
hardships and illustrious misadventures of
battle
but
would rather stay at home, and eat and
sleep in ignoble ease, than gain immortality and a
broken head, by valiantly fighting in a ditch!
Resolutely bent however upon defending his
beloved city, in despite even of itself, he called unto
him his trusty Van Corlear, who was his right hand
man in all times of emergency. Him did he
adjure
to take his war denouncing trumpet, and
mounting his horse, to beat up the country, night
and daySounding the alarm along the pastoral
borders of the Bronxstartling the wild solitudes
of Croton, arousing the rugged yeomanry of
Wee-hawk
and Hobokenthe mighty men of battle of
Tappan Bay
[19]
[19]
A corruption of Top-paun; so called from a tribe of Indians
which boasted 150 fighting men. See Ogilvie.
Editor
.
and the brave boys of Tarry town
and Sleepy hollowtogether with all the other
warriors of the country round about; charging
them one and all, to sling their powder horns,
shoulder their fowling pieces, and march merrily
down to the Manhattoes.
Now there was nothing in all the world, the
divine sex excepted, that Antony Van Corlear
loved
better than errands of this kind. So just
stopping
to take a lusty dinner, and bracing to his side
his junk bottle, well charged with heart inspiring
Hollands, he issued jollily from the city gate, that
looked out upon what is at present called
Broadway
;
sounding as usual a farewell strain, that rung
in sprightly echoes through the winding streets
of New AmsterdamAlas! never more were they
to be gladdened by the melody of their favourite
trumpeter!
It was a dark and stormy night when the good
Antony arrived at the famous creek (sagely
denominated
Hrlem
river
) which separates the
VOL. II. X
island of Manna-hata from the main land. The
wind was high, the elements were in an uproar,
and no Charon could be found to ferry the
adventurous
sounder of brass across the water. For a
short time he vapoured like an impatient ghost
upon the brink, and then, bethinking himself of the
urgency of his errand, took a hearty embrace of his
stone bottle, swore most valourously that he would
swim across,
en spijt den Duyvel
(in spite of the
devil!) and daringly plunged into the stream.
Luckless Antony! scarce had he buffetted half way
over, when he was observed to struggle most
violently
as if battling with the spirit of the waters
instinctively he put his trumpet to his mouth and
giving a vehement blastsunk forever to the
bottom
!
The potent clangour of his trumpet, like the
ivory horn of the renowned Paladin Orlando, when
expiring in the glorious field of Roncesvalles, rung
far and wide through the country, alarming the
neighbours round, who hurried in amazement to
the spotHere an old Dutch burgher, famed for
his veracity, and who had been a witness of the
fact, related to them the melancholy affair; with
the fearful addition (to which I am slow of giving
belief) that he saw the duyvel, in the shape of a
huge Moss-bonker with an invisible fiery tail, and
vomiting boiling water, seize the sturdy Antony
by the leg, and drag him beneath the waves.
Certain
it is, the place, with the adjoining promontory,
which projects into the Hudson, has been called
Spijt den duyvel
, or
Spiking devil
, ever sincethe
restless ghost of the unfortunate Antony still haunts
the surrounding solitudes, and his trumpet has often
been heard by the neighbours, of a stormy night,
mingling with the howling of the blast. No body
ever attempts to swim over the creek after dark;
on the contrary, a bridge has been built to guard
against such melancholy accidents in futureand
as to Moss-bonkers, they are held in such
abhorrence
,
that no true Dutchman will admit them to
his table, who loves good fish, and hates the devil.
Such was the end of Antony Van Corlear
a man deserving of a better fate. He lived roundly
and soundly, like a true and jolly batchelor, until
the day of his death; but though he was never
married, yet did he leave behind some two or three
dozen children, in different parts of the country
fine, chubby, brawling, flatulent little urchins, from
whom, if legends speak true, (and they are not apt
to lie) did descend the innumerable race of editors,
who people and defend this country, and who are
bountifully paid by the people for keeping up a
constant
alarmand making them miserable. Would
that they inherited the worth, as they do the wind,
of their renowned progenitor!
The tidings of this lamentable catastrophe
imparted
a severer pang to the bosom of Peter
Stuyvesant
,
than did even the invasion of his beloved
Amsterdam. It came ruthlessly home to those
sweet affections that grow close around the heart,
and are nourished by its warmest current. As
some lorn pilgrim wandering in trackless wastes,
while the rude tempest whistles through his hoary
locks, and dreary night is gathering around, sees
stretched cold and lifeless, his faithful dogthe
sole companion of his lonely journeying, who had
shared his solitary meal, who had so often licked
his hand in humble gratitude, who had lain in his
bosom, and been unto him as a childSo did the
generous hearted hero of the Manhattoes
contemplate
the untimely end of his faithful Antony. He
had been the humble attendant of his footstepshe
had cheered him in many a heavy hour, by his
honest gaiety, and had followed him in loyalty and
affection, through many a scene of direful peril and
mishaphe was gone foreverand that too, at a
moment when every mongrel cur seemed skulking
from his sideThisPeter Stuyvesantthis was
the moment to try thy magnanimity; and this was
the moment, when thou didst indeed shine forth
Peter
the Headstrong!
The glare of day had long dispelled the horrors of
the last stormy night; still all was dull and gloomy.
The late jovial Apollo hid his face behind
lugubrious
clouds, peeping out now and then, for an
instant
,
as if anxious, yet fearful, to see what was going
on, in his favourite city. This was the eventful
morning, when the great Peter was to give his reply,
to the audacious summons of the invaders. Already
was he closetted with his privy council, sitting in
grim state, brooding over the fate of his favourite
trumpeter, and anon boiling with indignation as the
insolence of his recreant Burgomasters flashed upon
his mind. While in this state of irritation, a courier
arrived in all haste from Winthrop, the subtle
governor
of Connecticut, councilling him in the most
affectionate and disinterested manner to surrender
the province, and magnifying the dangers and
calamities
to which a refusal would subject him.
What a moment was this to intrude officious advice
upon a man, who never took advice in his whole
life!The fiery old governor strode up and down
the chamber, with a vehemence, that made the
bosoms of his councillors to quake with awe
railing at his unlucky fate, that thus made him the
constant butt of factious subjects, and jesuitical
advisers.
Just at this ill chosen juncture, the officious
Burgomasters, who were now completely on the
watch, and had got wind of the arrival of mysterious
dispatches, came marching in a resolute body, into
the room, with a legion of Schepens and toad-eaters
at their heels, and abruptly demanded a perusal of
the letter. Thus to be broken in upon by what he
esteemed a rascal rabble, and that too at the very
X 2
moment he was grinding under an irritation from
abroad, was too much for the spleen of the choleric
Peter. He tore the letter in a thousand pieces
[20]
[20]
Smith's History of N. Y.
threw it in the face of the nearest Burgomaster
broke his pipe over the head of the nexthurled
his spitting box at an unlucky Schepen, who was
just making a masterly retreat out at the door, and
finally dissolved the whole meeting
sine die
, by
kicking them down stairs with his wooden leg!
As soon as the Burgomasters could recover
from the confusion into which their sudden exit
had thrown them, and had taken a little time to
breathe, they protested against the conduct of the
governor, which they did not hesitate to pronounce
tyrannical, unconstitutional, highly indecent, and
somewhat disrespectful. They then called a public
meeting, where they read the protest, and
addressing
the assembly in a set speech related at
full length, and with appropriate colouring and
exaggeration
,
the despotic and vindictive deportment
of the governor; declaring that, for their own parts,
they did not value a straw the being kicked, cuffed,
and mauled by the timber toe of his excellency, but
they felt for the dignity of the sovereign people,
thus rudely insulted by the outrage committed on
the seats of honour of their representatives. The
latter part of the harangue had a violent effect upon
the sensibility of the people, as it came home at
once, to that delicacy of feeling and jealous pride
of character, vested in all true mobs: and there is
no knowing to what act of resentment they might
have been provoked, against the redoubtable
Hard-koppig
Piethad not the greasy rogues been
somewhat
more afraid of their sturdy old governor, than
they were of St. Nicholas, the Englishor the
Dl himself.
CHAP. VIII.
Shewing how Peter Stuyvesant defended the city
of New Amsterdam for several days, by dint of
the strength of his head
.
Pause
, oh most considerate reader! and
contemplate
for a moment the sublime and
melancholy
scene, which the present crisis of our
history
presents! An illustrious and venerable little
townthe metropolis of an immense extent of
flourishing but unenlightened, because
uninhabited
countryGarrisoned by a doughty host of
orators, chairmen, committee-men, Burgomasters,
Schepens and old womengoverned by a
determined
and strong headed warrior, and fortified
by mud batteries, pallisadoes and resolutions.
blockaded by sea, beleaguered by land, and
threatened
with direful desolation from without; while
its very vitals are torn, and griped, and
becholiced
with internal faction and commotion!
Never did the historic pen record a page of more
complicated distress, unless it be the strife that
distracted the Israelites during the siege of
Jerusalem
where
discordant parties were cutting each
others throats, at the moment when the victorious
legions of Titus had toppled down their bulwarks,
and were carrying fire and sword, into the very
sanctum sanctorum of the temple.
Governor Stuyvesant having triumphantly, as
has been recorded, put his grand council to the
rout, and thus delivered himself from a multitude of
impertinent advisers, dispatched a categorical
reply
to the commanders of the invading squadron;
wherein he asserted the right and title of their
High Mightinesses the lords States general to the
province of New Netherlands, and trusting in the
righteousness of his cause, set the whole British
nation at defiance! My anxiety to extricate my
readers, and myself, from these disastrous scenes,
prevents me from giving the whole of this most
courteous and gallant letter which concluded in
these manly and affectionate terms.
As touching the threats in your conclusion,
we have nothing to answer, only that we fear
nothing but what God, (who is as just as merci
ful) shall lay upon us; all things being in his
gracious disposal, and we may as well be pre
served by him with small forces, as by a great
army; which makes us to wish you all happiness
and prosperity, and recommend you to his pro
tectionMy lords your thrice humble and affec
tionate servant and friend
P. Stuyvesant.
Thus having resolutely thrown his gauntlet,
the brave Hard-koppig Piet stuck a huge pair of
horse pistols in his belt, girded an immense powder
horn on his sidethrust his sound leg into a
Hessian
boot, and clapping his fierce little war hat on
top of his headparaded up and down in front of
his house, determined to defend his beloved city
to the last.
While all these woeful struggles and dissensions
were prevailing in the unhappy little city of New
Amsterdam, and while its worthy but ill starred
governor was framing the above quoted letter, the
English commanders did not remain idle. They
had agents secretly employed to foment the fears
and clamours of the populace, and moreover
circulated
far and wide through the adjacent country a
proclamation, repeating the terms they had already
held out in their summons to surrender, and
beguiling
the simple Nederlanders with the most
crafty and conciliating professions. They
promised
every man who voluntarily submitted to the
authority of his British majesty, that he should
retain
peaceable possession of his house, his vrouw
and his cabbage garden. That he should be
suffered
to smoke his pipe, speak dutch, wear as
many breeches as he pleased, and import bricks,
tiles and stone jugs from Holland, instead of
manufacturing them on the spotThat he should
on no account be compelled to learn the English
language, or keep accounts in any other way than
by casting them up upon his fingers, and chalking
them down upon the crown of his hat; as is still
observed among the dutch yeomanry at the present
day. That every man should be allowed quietly
to inherit his father's hat, coat, shoe-buckles, pipe,
and every other personal appendage, and that no
man should be obliged to conform to any
improvements
,
inventions, or any other modern
innovations
,
but on the contrary should be permitted to
build his house, follow his trade, manage his farm,
rear his hogs, and educate his children, precisely
as his ancestors did before him since time
immemorial
Finally,
that he should have all the
benefits
of free trade, and should not be required to
acknowledge
any other saint in the calendar than
saint Nicholas, who should thenceforward, as
before
,
be considered the tutelar saint of the city.
These terms, as may be supposed, appeared
very satisfactory to the people; who had a great
disposition to enjoy their property unmolested, and
a most singular aversion to engage in a contest,
where they could gain little more than honour and
broken headsthe first of which they held in
philosophic
indifference, the latter in utter detestation.
By these insidious means, therefore, did the
English
succeed in alienating the confidence and
affections
of the populace from their gallant old governor,
whom they considered as obstinately bent upon
running them into hideous misadventures, and did
not hesitate to speak their minds freely, and abuse
him most heartilybehind his back.
Like as a mighty grampus, who though assailed
and buffeted by roaring waves and brawling surges,
still keeps on an undeviating course; and though
overwhelmed
by boisterous billows, still emerges from
the troubled deep, spouting and blowing with tenfold
violenceso did the inflexible Peter pursue,
unwavering
,
his determined career, and rise
contemptuous
,
above the clamours of the rabble.
But when the British warriors found by the
tenor of his reply that he set their power at defiance,
they forthwith dispatched recruiting officers to
Jamaica
,
and Jericho, and Nineveh, and Quag, and
Patchog, and all those redoubtable towns which had
been subdued of yore by the immortal Stoffel
Brinkerhoff
,
stirring up the valiant progeny of Preserved
Fish, and Determined Cock, and those other
illustrious
squatters, to assail the city of New
Amsterdam
by land. In the mean while the hostile ships
made awful preparation to commence a vehement
assault by water.
The streets of New Amsterdam now presented
a scene of wild dismay and consternation. In vain
did the gallant Stuyvesant order the citizens to arm
and assemble in the public square or market place.
The whole party of Platter breeches in the course of
a single night had changed into arrant old womena
metamorphosis only to be paralleled by the prodigies
recorded by Livy as having happened at Rome at
the approach of Hannibal, when statues sweated in
pure affright, goats were converted into sheep, and
cocks turning into hens ran cackling about the
streets.
The harrassed Peter, thus menaced from without
and tormented from withinbaited by the
burgomasters
and hooted at by the rabble, chafed and
growled and raged like a furious bear tied to a stake
and worried by a legion of scoundrel curs. Finding
however that all further attempt to defend the city
was in vain, and hearing that an irruption of
borderers
and moss troopers was ready to deluge him
from the east, he was at length compelled, in spite
of his mighty heart, which swelled in his throat
until it had nearly choked him, to consent to a treaty
of surrender.
Words cannot express the transports of the
people, on receiving this agreeable intelligence;
had they obtained a conquest over their enemies,
they could not have indulged greater delightThe
streets resounded with their congratulationsthey
extolled their governor as the father and deliverer
of his countrythey crowded to his house to testify
their gratitude, and were ten times more noisy in
their plaudits, than when he returned, with victory
perched upon his beaver, from the glorious capture
of Fort ChristinaBut the indignant Peter shut up
his doors and windows and took refuge in the
innermost
recesses of his mansion, that he might not
hear the ignoble rejoicings of the rabble.
VOL. II. Y
In consequence of this consent of the governor,
a parley was demanded of the besieging forces to
treat of the terms of surrender. Accordingly a
deputation of six commissioners was appointed on
both sides, and on the 27th August, 1664, a
capitulation
highly favourable to the province, and
honourable to Peter Stuyvesant, was agreed to by
the enemy, who had conceived a high opinion of
the valour of the men of the Manhattoes, and the
magnanimity and unbounded discretion of their
governor.
One thing alone remained, which was, that the
articles of surrender should be ratified, and signed
by the chivalric PeterWhen the commissioners
respectfully waited upon him for this purpose, they
were received by the hardy old warrior, with the
most grim and bitter courtesy. His warlike
accoutrements
were laid asidean old India night gown
was wrapped around his rugged limbs, a red woollen
night cap overshadowed his frowning brow, and an
iron grey beard, of three days growth, heightened
the grizly terrors of his visage. Thrice did he
seize a little worn out stump of a pen, and essay
to sign the loathesome paperthrice did he clinch
his teeth, and make a most horrible countenance,
as though a pestiferous dose of rhubarb, senna, and
ipecacuanha, had been offered to his lips, at length
dashing it from him, he seized his brass hilted
sword, and jerking it from the scabbard, swore by
St. Nicholas, he'd sooner die than yield to any
power under heaven.
In vain was every attempt to shake this sturdy
resolutionmenaces, remonstrances, revilings were
exhausted to no purposefor two whole days was
the house of the valiant Peter besieged by the
clamourous rabble, and for two whole days did he
betake himself to his arms, and persist in a
magnanimous
refusal to ratify the capitulationthus, like
a second Horatius Cocles, bearing the whole brunt
of war, and defending this modern Rome, with the
prowess of his single arm!
At length the populace finding that boisterous
measures, did but incense more determined
opposition
,
bethought themselves of a humble expedient,
by which haply, the governor's lofty ire might be
soothed, and his resolution undermined. And now
a solemn and mournful procession, headed by the
Burgomasters, and Schepens, and followed by the
enlightened vulgar, moves slowly to the governor's
dwellingbearing the unfortunate capitulation.
Here they found the stout old hero, drawn up like
a giant into his castlethe doors strongly
barricadoed
,
and himself in full regimentals, with his
cocked hat on his head, firmly posted with a
blunderbuss
at the garret window.
There was something in this formidable position
that struck even the ignoble vulgar, with awe and
admiration. The brawling multitude could not but
reflect with self abasement, upon their own
degenerate
conduct, when they beheld their hardy but
deserted
old governor, thus faithful to his post, like a
forlorn hope, and fully prepared to defend his
ungrateful
city to the last. These compunctions
however
,
were soon overwhelmed, by the recurring
tide of public apprehension. The populace
arranged
themselves before the house, taking off their
hats, with most respectful humilityOne of the
Burgomasters, of that popular class of orators, who,
as old Sallust observes, are talkative rather than
eloquent stepped forth and addressed the
governor
in a speech of three hours length; detailing in
the most pathetic terms the calamitous situation of
the province, and urging him in a constant
repetition
of the same arguments and words, to sign the
capitulation.
The mighty Peter eyed him from his little
garret
window in grim silencenow and then his eye
would glance over the surrounding rabble, and an
indignant grin, like that of an angry mastiff, would
mark his iron visageBut though he was a man of
most undaunted mettlethough he had a heart as
big as an ox, and a head that would have set
adamant
to scornyet after all he was a mere mortal:
wearied out by these repeated oppositions and
this eternal haranguing, and perceiving that unless
he complied, the inhabitants would follow ther
inclinations
,
or rather their fears, without waiting for
his consent, he testily ordered them to hand him
up the paper. It was accordingly hoisted to him
on the end of a pole, and having scrawled his name
at the bottom of it, he excommunicated them all for
a set of cowardly, mutinous, degenerate
platterbreeches
threw
the capitulation at their heads,
slammed down the window, and was heard
stumping
down stairs with the most vehement indignation.
The rabble incontinently took to their heels; even
the Burgomasters were not slow in evacuating the
premises, fearing lest the sturdy Peter might issue
from his den, and greet them with some unwelcome
testimonial of his displeasure.
Y 2
CHAP. IX.
Containing reflections on the decline and fall of
empires, with the final extinction of the Dutch
Dynasty
.
Among
the numerous events, which are each
in their turn the most direful and melancholy of
all possible occurrences, in your interesting and
authentic history; there is none that occasions
such heart rending grief to your historian of
sensibility
,
as the decline and fall of your renowned and
mighty empires! Like your well disciplined funeral
orator, whose feelings are properly tutored to ebb
and flow, to blaze in enthusiastic eulogy, or gush
in overwhelming sorrowwho has reduced his
impetuous grief to a kind of manualhas prepared
to slap his breast at a comma, strike his forehead
at a semicolon; start with horror at a dashand
burst into an ungovernable paroxysm of despair at
a note of admiration! Like unto him your woe
begone
historian ascends the rostrum; bends in
dumb pathos over the ruins of departed greatness;
casts an upbraiding eye to heaven, a glance of
indignant
misery on the surrounding world; settles
his features into an expression of unutterable agony,
and having by this eloquent preparation, invoked
the whole animate and inanimate creation to unite
with him in sorrow, draws slowly his white
handkerchief
from his pocket, and as he applies it to his
face, seems to sob to his readers, in the words of a
most tear shedding dutch author, You who have
noses, prepare to blow them now!or rather, to
quote more literally let every man blow his own
nose!
Where is the reader who can contemplate
without emotion, the disastrous events by which
the great dynasties of the world have been
extinguished
?
When wandering, with mental eye
amid the awful and gigantic ruins of kingdoms,
states and empiresmarking the tremendous
convulsions
that shook their foundations and wrought
their lamentable downfallthe bosom of the
melancholy
enquirer swells with sympathy,
commensurate
to the sublimity of the surrounding horrors
each petty feelingeach private misery, is
overpowered
and forgotten; like a helpless mortal
struggling under the night mare; so the unhappy
reader pants and groans, and labours, under one
stupendous griefone vast immoveable ideaone
immense, one mountainousone overwhelming
mass of woe!
Behold the great Assyrian Empire, founded by
Nimrod, that mighty hunter,; extending its
domains
over the fairest portion of the globe
encreasing
in splendour through a long lapse of fifteen
centuries, and terminating ingloriously in the reign of
the effeminate Sardinapalus, consumed in the
conflagration
of his capital by the Median Arbaces.
Behold its successor, the Median Empire,
augmented
by the warlike power of Persia, under the
sceptre of the immortal Cyrus, and the Egyptian
conquests of the desert-braving Cambyses
accumulating
strength and glory during seven centuries
but shook to its centre, and finally overthrown,
in the memorable battles of the Granicus, the Issus,
and the plains of Arbela, by the all conquering arm
of Alexander.
Behold next the Grecian Empire; brilliant, but
brief, as the warlike meteor with which it rose and
descendedexisting but seven years, in a blaze of
gloryand perishing, with its hero, in a scene of
ignominious debauchery.
Behold next the Roman Eagle, fledged in her
Ausonean aerie, but wheeling her victorious flight
over the fertile plains of Asiathe burning desarts
of Africa, and at length spreading wide her
triumphant
wings, the mistress of the world! But mark
her fateview the imperial Rome, the emporium
of taste and sciencethe paragon of citiesthe
metropolis of the universeravaged, sacked and
overturned by successive hordes of fierce
barbarians
and
the unwieldly empire, like a huge but
over ripe pumpkin, splitting into the western
empire
of the renowned Charlemagne, and the eastern
or Greek Empire of Leo the Greatwhich latter,
after enduring through six long centuries, is
dismembered
by the unhallowed hands of the Saracens.
Behold the Saracenic empire, swayed by the
puissant Gengis Khan, lording it over these
conquered
domains, and, under the reign of
Tamerlane
subduing the whole Eastern region. Then
cast an eye towards the Persian mountains. Mark
how the fiery shepherd Othman, with his fierce
compeers, descend like a whirlwind on the
Nicomedian
plains. Lo! the late fearless Saracen
succumbs
he
flies! he falls! His dynasty is destroyed,
and the Ottoman crescent is reared triumphant on
its ruins!
Beholdbut why should we behold any more?
Why should we rake among the ashes of
extinguished
greatness?Kingdoms, Principalities, and
Powers, have each had their rise, their progress,
and their falleach in its turn has swayed a mighty
sceptreeach has returned to its primeval
nothingness
.
And thus did it fare with the empire of
their High Mightinesses, at the illustrious
metropolis
of the Manhattoes, under the peaceful reign
of Walter the Doubterthe fractious reign of
William the Testy, and the chivalric reign of Peter
Stuyvesantalias, Pieter de Groodtalias,
Hard-koppig-Piet
which
meaneth Peter the Headstrong!
The patron of refinement, hospitality, and the
elegant arts, it shone resplendent, like a jewel in a
dunghill, deriving additional lustre from the
barbarism
of the savage tribes, and European hordes,
by which it was surrounded. But alas! neither
virtue, nor talents, eloquence, nor economy, can
avert the inavertable stroke of fate. The Dutch
Dynasty, pressed, and assailed on every side,
approached
to its destined end. It had been puffed,
and blown up from small beginnings, to a most
corpulent
rotundityit had resisted the constant
incroachments
of its neighbouring foes, with
phlegmatic
magnanimitybut the sudden shock of
invasion was too much for its strength.
Thus have I seen a crew of truant urchins,
beating and belabouring a distended bladder, which
maintained its size, uninjured by their assaults
At length an unlucky brat, more knowing than the
rest, collecting all his might, bounces down with his
bottom upon the inflated globeThe contact of
contending spheres is aweful and destructivethe
bloated membrane yieldsit bursts, it explodes
with a noise strange and equivocal, wonderfully
resembling
thunderand is no more.
And now nought remains but sadly and
reluctantly
to deliver up this excellent little city into the
hands of its invaders. Willingly would I, like
the impetuous Peter, draw my trusty weapon and
defend it through another volume; but truth,
unalterable
truth forbids the rash attempt, and what
is more imperious still, a phantom, hideous, huge
and black, forever haunts my mind, the direful
spectrum of my landlord's billwhich like a
carrion
crow hovers around my slow expiring history,
impatient of its death, to gorge upon its carcass.
Suffice it then in brevity to say, that within
three hours after the surrender, a legion of British
beef fed warriors poured into New Amsterdam,
taking possession of the fort and batteries. And
now might be heard the busy sound of hammers
made by the old Dutch burghers, who
industriously
nailed up their doors and windows to
protect
their vrouws from these fierce barbarians;
whom they contemplated in silent sullenness from
the attic story, as they paraded through the streets.
Thus did Col. Richard Nichols, the
commander
of the British force enter into quiet possession
of the conquered realm as
locum tenant
for the
duke of York. The victory was attended with no
other outrage than that of changing the name of
the province and its metropolis, which thenceforth
were denominated
New York
, and so have
continued
to be called unto the present day. The
inhabitants
according to treaty were allowed to
maintain
quiet possession of their property, but so
inveterately
did they retain their abhorrence to the
British nation, that in a private meeting of the
leading citizens, it was unanimously determined
never to ask any of their conquerors to dinner.
Such was the fate of the renowned province
of New Netherlands, and it formed but one link
in a subtle chain of events, originating at the
capture
of Fort Casimer, which has produced the
present
convulsions of the globe!Let not this
assertion
excite a smile of incredulity, for extravagant
as it may seem, there is nothing admits of more
conclusive proofAttend then gentle reader to
this plain deduction, which if thou are a king, an
emperor, or other powerful potentate, I advise thee
to treasure up in thy heartthough little
expectation
have I that my work will fall into such hands,
for well I know the care of crafty ministers, to
keep all grave and edifying books of the kind out of
the way of unhappy monarchslest peradventure
they should read them and learn wisdom.
By the treacherous surprisal of Fort Casimer,
then, did the crafty Swedes enjoy a transient
triumph
;
but drew upon their heads the vengeance
of Peter Stuyvesant, who wrested all New Sweden
from their handsBy the conquest of New Sweden
Peter Stuyvesant aroused the claims of Lord
Baltimore
,
who appealed to the cabinet of Great
Britain
,
who subdued the whole province of New
Netherlands
By
this great atchievement the whole
extent of North America from Nova Scotia to
the Floridas, was rendered one entire dependency
upon the British crownbut mark the consequence
The hitherto scattered colonies being thus
consolidated
,
and having no rival colonies to check
or keep them in awe, waxed great and powerful,
and finally becoming too strong for the mother
country, were enabled to shake off its bonds, and by
a glorious revolution became an independent
empire
But
the chain of effects stopped not here;
the successful revolution in America produced the
sanguinary revolution in France, which produced
the puissant Buonaparte who produced the French
Despotism, which has thrown the whole world in
confusion!Thus have these great powers been
successively punished for their ill-starred conquests
and thus, as I asserted, have all the present
convulsions
,
revolutions and disasters that overwhelm
mankind, originated in the capture of little Fort
Casimer, as recorded in this eventful history.
Let then the potentates of Europe, beware how
they meddle with our beloved country. If the
surprisal of a comparatively insignificant fort has
overturned the economy of empires, what (
reasoning
from analogy) would be the effect of
conquering
a vast republic?It would set all the stars and
planets by the earsthe moon would go to
loggerheads
with the sunthe whole system of nature
would be hurled into chaosunless it was
providentially
rescued by the Millenium!
VOL. II. Z
CHAP. X.
Containing the dignified retirement, and mortal
surrender
of Peter the Headstrong
.
Thus
then have I concluded this renowned
historical enterprize; but before I lay aside my
weary pen, there yet remains to be performed one
pious duty. If among the incredible host of readers
that shall peruse this book, there should haply be
found any of those souls of true nobility, which
glow with celestial fire, at the history of the
generous
and the brave, they will doubtless be anxious
to know the fate of the gallant Peter Stuyvesant.
To gratify one such sterling heart of gold I would
go more lengths, than to instruct the cold blooded
curiosity of a whole fraternity of philosophers.
No sooner had that high mettled cavalier signed
the articles of capitulation than, determined not to
witness the humiliation of his favourite city, he
turned his back upon its walls and made a growling
retreat to his
Bouwery
, or country seat, which
was situated about two miles off, where he
passed
the remainder of his days in patriarchal
retirement
.
There he enjoyed that tranquillity of
mind, which he had never known amid the
distracting
cares of government, and tasted the sweets of
absolute and uncontrouled authority, which his
factious subjects had so often dashed with the
bitterness
of opposition.
No persuasions could ever induce him to revisit
the cityon the contrary he would always have his
great arm chair placed with its back to the windows,
which looked in that direction; until a thick grove
of trees planted by his own hand grew up and
formed a screen, that effectually excluded it from
the prospect. He railed continually at the
degenerate
innovations and improvements introduced by
the conquerorsforbade a word of their detested
language to be spoken in his family, a prohibition
readily obeyed, since none of the household could
speak any thing but dutchand even ordered a fine
avenue to be cut down in front of his house,
because
it consisted of English cherry trees.
The same incessant vigilance, that blazed forth
when he had a vast province under his care, now
shewed itself with equal vigour, though in
narrower
limits. He patrolled with unceasing
watchfulness
around the boundaries of his little territory;
repelled every encroachment with intrepid
promptness
;
punished every vagrant depredation upon his
orchard or his farm yard with inflexible severity
and conducted every stray hog or cow in triumph
to the pound. But to the indigent neighbour, the
friendless stranger, or the weary wanderer, his
spacious
door was ever open, and his capacious fire
place, that emblem of his own warm and generous
heart, had always a corner to receive and cherish
them. There was an exception to this, I must
confess, in case the ill starred applicant was an
Englishman
or a Yankee, to whom, though he might
extend the hand of assistance, he could never be
brought to yield the rites of hospitality. Nay, if
peradventure some straggling merchant of the east,
should stop at his door with his cart load of tin
ware or wooden bowls, the fiery Peter would issue
forth like a giant from his castle, and make such a
furious clattering among his pots and kettles, that
the vender of
notions
was fain to betake himself
to instant flight.
His ancient suit of regimentals, worn threadbare
by the brush, were carefully hung up in the state
bed chamber, and regularly aired the first fair day
of every monthand his cocked hat and trusty
sword, were suspended in grim repose, over the
parlour mantle-piece, forming supporters to a full
length portrait of the renowned admiral Von
Tromp. In his domestic empire he maintained
strict discipline, and a well organized, despotic
government; but though his own will was the
supreme
law, yet the good of his subjects was his
constant object. He watched over, not merely,
their immediate comforts, but their morals, and their
ultimate welfare; for he gave them abundance of
excellent admonition, nor could any of them
complain
,
that when occasion required, he was by any
means niggardly in bestowing wholesome
correction
.
The good old Dutch festivals, those periodical
demonstrations of an overflowing heart and a
thankful
spirit, which are falling into sad disuse among
my fellow citizens, were faithfully observed in the
mansion of governor Stuyvesant. New year was
truly a day of open handed liberality, of jocund
revelry
,
and warm hearted congratulationwhen the
bosom seemed to swell with genial good-fellowship
and the plenteous table, was attended with an
unceremonious
freedom, and honest broad mouthed
merriment, unknown in these days of degeneracy
and refinement. Paas and Pinxter were
scrupulously
observed throughout his dominions; nor
was the day of St. Nicholas suffered to pass by,
without making presents, hanging the stocking in
the chimney, and complying with all its other
ceremonies
.
Once a year, on the first day of April, he used
to array himself in full regimentals, being the
anniversary
of his triumphal entry into New
Amsterdam
,
after the conquest of New Sweden. This
was always a kind of saturnalia among the
domestics
,
when they considered themselves at liberty in
some measure, to say and do what they pleased;
for on this day their master was always observed to
unbend, and become exceeding pleasant and jocose,
sending the old greyheaded negroes on April fools
errands for pigeons milk; not one of whom but
allowed
Z 2
himself to be taken in, and humoured his
old master's jokes; as became a faithful and well
disciplined dependant. Thus did he reign, happily
and peacefully on his own landinjuring no man
envying no manmolested by no outward strifes;
perplexed by no internal commotionsand the
mighty monarchs of the earth, who were vainly
seeking to maintain peace, and promote the welfare
of mankind, by war and desolation, would have
done well to have made a voyage to the little island
of Manna-hata, and learned a lesson in government,
from the domestic economy of Peter Stuyvesant.
In process of time, however, the old governor,
like all other children of mortality, began to
exhibit
evident tokens of decay. Like an aged oak,
which though it long has braved the fury of the
elements, and still retains its gigantic proportions,
yet begins to shake and groan with every blast
so the gallant Peter, though he still bore the port
and semblance of what he was, in the days of his
hardihood and chivalry, yet did age and infirmity
begin to sap the vigour of his framebut his heart,
that most unconquerable citadel, still triumphed
unsubdued. With matchless avidity, would he
listen to every article of intelligence, concerning
the battles between the English and DutchStill
would his pulse beat high, whenever he heard of
the victories of De Ruyterand his countenance
lower, and his eye brows knit, when fortune turned
in favour of the English. At length, as on a
certain
day, he had just smoked his fifth pipe, and was
napping after dinner, in his arm chair, conquering
the whole British nation in his dreams, he was
suddenly aroused by a most fearful ringing of bells,
rattling of drums, and roaring of cannon, that put all
his blood in a ferment. But when he learnt, that
these rejoicings were in honour of a great victory
obtained by the combined English and French
fleets, over the brave De Ruyter, and the younger
Von Tromp, it went so much to his heart, that he
took to his bed, and in less than three days, was
brought to death's door, by a violent cholera morbus!
But even in this extremity, he still displayed the
unconquerable spirit of Peter
the Headstrong;
holding
out, to the last gasp, with most inflexible
obstinacy
,
against a whole army of old women, who were
bent upon driving the enemy out of his bowels,
after a true Dutch mode of defence, by inundating
the seat of war, with catnip and penny royal.
While he thus lay, lingering on the verge of
dissolution; news was brought him, that the brave
De Ruyter, had suffered but little losshad made
good his retreatand meant once more to meet
the enemy in battle. The closing eye of the old
warrior kindled at the wordshe partly raised
himself
in beda flash of martial fire beamed across
his visagehe clinched his withered hand, as if
he felt within his gripe that sword which waved
in triumph before the walls of Fort Christina, and
giving a grim smile of exultation, sunk back upon
his pillow, and expired.
Thus died Peter Stuyvesant, a valiant soldier
a loyal subjectan upright governor, and an
honest Dutchmanwho wanted only a few
empires
to desolate, to have been immortalized as a
hero!
His funeral obsequies were celebrated with the
utmost grandeur and solemnity. The town was
perfectly emptied of its inhabitants, who crowded
in throngs to pay the last sad honours to their good
old governor. All his sterling qualities rushed in
full tide upon their recollections, while the memory
of his foibles, and his faults, had expired with him.
The ancient burghers contended who should have
the privilege of bearing the pall; the populace
strove who should walk nearest to the bierand
the melancholy procession was closed by a number
of grey headed negroes, who had wintered and
summered
in the household of their departed master,
for the greater part of a century.
With sad and gloomy countenances the
multitude
gathered round the grave. They dwelt with
mournful hearts, on the sturdy virtues, the signal
services and the gallant exploits of the brave old
veteran. They recalled with secret upbraidings,
their own factious oppositions to his government
and many an ancient burgher, whose phlegmatic
features had never been known to relax, nor his
eyes to moistenwas now observed to puff a
pensive
pipe, and the big drop to steal down his cheek
while he muttered with affectionate accent and
melancholy shake of the headWell den
Hard-kopping
Piet ben gone at last!
His remains were deposited in the family
vault, under a chapel, which he had piously
erected on his estate and dedicated to St. Nicholas
and which stood on the identical spot at present
occupied by St. Mark's church, where his tomb
stone is still to be seen. His estate, or
Bouwery
, as
it was called, has ever continued in the possession
of his descendants, who by the uniform integrity of
their conduct, and their strict adherence to the
customs and manners that prevailed in the
good old
times
, have proved themselves worthy of their
illustrious
ancestor. Many a time and oft, has the
farm been haunted at night by enterprizing
money-diggers
,
in quest of pots of gold, said to have been
buried by the old governorthough I cannot learn
that any of them have ever been enriched by their
researchesand who is there, among my native
born fellow citizens, that does not remember, when
in the mischievous days of his boyhood, he
conceived
it a great exploit, to rob Stuyvesant's
orchard
on a holliday afternoon.
At this strong hold of the family may still be
seen certain memorials of the immortal Peter. His
full length portrait frowns in martial terrors from
the parlour wallhis cocked hat and sword still
hang up in the best bed roomHis brimstone
coloured breeches were for a long while suspended
in the hall, until some years since they occasioned
a dispute between a new married coupleand his
silver mounted wooden leg is still treasured up in
the store room as an invaluable relique.
And now worthy reader, ere I take a sad
farewell
which
alas! must be foreverwillingly would
I part in cordial fellowship, and bespeak thy kind
hearted remembrance. That I have not written a
better history of the days of the patriarchs is not
my faulthad any other person written one, as good
I should not have attempted it at all.That many
will hereafter spring up and surpass me in
excellence
,
I have very little doubt, and still less care;
well knowing, that when the great Christovallo
Colon
(who is vulgarly called Columbus) had once stood
his egg upon its end, every one at table could stand
his up a thousand times more dexterously.Should
any reader find matter of offence in this history, I
should heartily grieve, though I would on no
account
question his penetration by telling him he is
mistakenhis good nature by telling him he is
captiousor his pure conscience by telling him he
is startled at a shadow.Surely if he is so ingenious
in finding offence where none is intended, it were a
thousand pities he should not be suffered to enjoy
the benefit of his discovery.
I have too high an opinion of the
understanding
of my fellow citizens, to think of yielding them
any instruction, and I covet too much their good
will, to forfeit it by giving them good advice.
I am none of those cynics who despise the world,
because it despises themon the contrary, though
but low in its regard I look up to it with the most
perfect good nature, and my only sorrow is, that it
does not prove itself worthy of the unbounded love
I bear it.
If however in this my historic productionthe
scanty fruit of a long and laborious lifeI have
failed to gratify the dainty palate of the age, I can
only lament my misfortunefor it is too late in the
season for me even to hope to repair it. Already
has withering age showered his sterile snows upon
my brow; in a little while, and this genial warmth
which still lingers around my heart, and throbs
worthy readerthrobs kindly towards thyself, shall
be chilled forever. Haply this frail compound of
dust, which while alive may have given birth to
naught but unprofitable weeds, may form a humble
sod of the valley, from whence shall spring many a
sweet wild flower, to adorn my beloved island of
Manna-hata!
FINIS.Mr. Will Cottington and captain Partridg of
Rhoode Hand presented this insewing request to the
commissioners in wrighting
Our request and motion is in behalfe of
Rhoode Hand, that wee the Handers of Rhoode
Iland may be rescauied into combination with all
the united colonyes of New England in a firme and
perpetuall league of friendship and amity of ofence
and defence, mutuall advice and succor upon all
just occasions for our mutuall safety and
wellfaire
,
&c.
Will Cottington,
Alicxsander Partridg.As touching the threats in your conclusion,
we have nothing to answer, only that we fear
nothing but what God, (who is as just as merci
ful) shall lay upon us; all things being in his
gracious disposal, and we may as well be pre
served by him with small forces, as by a great
army; which makes us to wish you all happiness
and prosperity, and recommend you to his pro
tectionMy lords your thrice humble and affec
tionate servant and friend
P. Stuyvesant.